
EARLY MODERN SPAIN
 In 1500, Spain faced the great challenge of consolidating the foundations of a new
nationhood in the Iberian peninsula, following the reconquest of national territory from
the Moors in 1492. At the same time, Spain was the bridge between Europe and the New
World, with the exploration of the Americas and the expansion of its empire. Early modern
Spain itself was relatively underpopulated, with fragmented communications, and faced
the challenges of nascent capitalism common to the rest of Europe.
Early Modern Spain: A Social History explores the solidarities which held the Spanish
nation together at this time of conflict and change. The book studies the pattern
of fellowship and patronage at the local level which contributed to the notable
absence of popular revolts characteristic of other European countries at this time.
It also analyses the Counter-Reformation, which transformed religious attitudes,
and which had a huge impact on family life, social control and popular culture.
Focusing on the main themes of the development of capitalism, the growth of
the state and religious upheaval, this comprehensive social history sheds light on
changes throughout Europe in the critical early modern period.
James Casey is Senior Lecturer in European History at the University of East
Anglia.
A SOCIAL HISTORY OF EUROPE
 Series Editor, Richard Evans
Professor of Modern History, University of Cambridge
A SOCIAL HISTORY OF MODERN SPAIN (1990)
Adrian Shubert
EARLY MODERN SPAIN
A social history
James Casey
London and New York
First published 1999
by Routledge
11 New Fetter Lane, London EC4P 4EE
This edition published in the Taylor & Francis e-Library, 2002.
 Simultaneously published in the USA and Canada
by Routledge
29 West 35th Street, New York, NY 10001
© 1999 James Casey
All rights reserved. No part of this book may be reprinted or
reproduced or utilized in any form or by any electronic,
mechanical, or other means, now known or hereafter
invented, including photocopying and recording, or in any
information storage or retrieval system, without permission in
writing from the publishers.
British Library Cataloguing in Publication Data
A catalogue record for this book is available
from the British Library
Library of Congress Cataloging in Publication Data
Casey, James, 1944–
Early modern Spain: a social history/James Casey.
p. cm. —(A social history of Europe)
Includes bibliographical references and index.
1. Spain—Social conditions—To 1800. 2. Spain—
Economic conditions. 3. Spain—Civilization—1516–1700.
Spain—Civilization—18th Century. I. Title. II. Series:
Social history of Europe (Routledge (Firm))
HN583.C37 1999
306´.0946–dc21 98–31118
CIP
ISBN 0-415-13813-2 (hbk)
ISBN 0-415-20687-1 (pbk)
ISBN 0-203-02643-8 Master e-book ISBN
 ISBN 0-203-20423-9 (Glassbook Format)
CONTENTS
Acknowledgements vi
Map 1: Physical Iberia vii
Map 2: Historic regions of Spain viii
Map 3: Places mentioned in the text ix
Introduction 1
1 An inhospitable land 4
2 The fewness of people 19
3 The limits of a peasant economy 43
4 Treasure and the cost of empire 61
5 Feudal lords and village potentates 87
6 Patricians and paupers: the urban commonwealth 111
7 The consolidation of an aristocracy 138
8 Obedience to the law 165
9 The policing of the family 192
10 The community of the faithful 222
Conclusion 250
Notes 254
Bibliography 270
Index 292
ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS
I would like to thank the editor of the series, Richard Evans, for suggesting the idea
of this book, and for his helpful comments later on the text. At the publishers,
Heather McCallum and Ian Critchley provided the guidance required for its completion.
I owe a debt to the staff of the University of East Anglia library, particularly
Barry Taylor, for his imaginative purchase of history books in Spanish, and the
excellent team at inter-library loans.
I have benefitted over many years from the encouragement and support of
colleagues in Spain. I would like to thank, among many others, Ricardo García
Cárcel and Xavier Gil Pujol of Barcelona, Vicent Olmos and Emilia Salvador of
Valencia, Francisco Chacón and Juan Romero Díaz of Murcia, and Inmaculada
Arias and Juan Luis Castellano of Granada.
Map 1 Physical Iberia
Source: Bernard Reilly, The Medieval Spains (Cambridge 1993).
Map 2 Historic regions of Spain
Source: David Reher, Town and Country in Pre-industrial Spain (Cambridge University Press 1970).
Map 3 Places mentioned in the text

1
INTRODUCTION
The early modern period lacks, almost by definition, the clear features of its predecessor
and successor, the medieval and modern worlds. One may say that it is an age of
transition, characterised by at least three broad lines of development, in all of which
the protagonist of this book, Spain, played a crucial and controversial role. In the
first place there was the growth of towns and the market economy, precursor of the
Industrial Revolution. One of the turning-points in this process was, of course, the
discovery of America and the opening-up of a world economy. Spanish writers—the
so-called School of Salamanca—made a significant contribution to our understanding
of the changing structure of the market, laying the foundations of the modern science
of economics.
Spain was equally involved in that other transformation of the early modern
world, the rise of the bureaucratic state. Anthropologists have made us aware of
the function of kinship and clientage where the state is weak and where politics
cannot be easily separated from the business of everyday life. Spain was one of
the pioneers in the creation in the sixteenth century of a modern polity, as the
great archives of Simancas still testify, supplemented by a trail of official paper all
the way down to the local level. Yet the country remained down to the twentieth
century notoriously evasive of control from the centre, as the volume of work
done by social anthropologists since the pioneering study of Pitt-Rivers (1954)
ably attests. In any case the attempt of a stronger state to assert its authority
through its army and bureaucracy is one of the characteristic features of the early
modern period in Europe as a whole, and it had enormous consequences for the
whole process of social and economic development. Historians sometimes call it
the Age of Mercantilism, an alliance of power and profit which laid the basis of
capitalism in the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries. Undoubtedly the failure
of Spain to protect its own merchants, ships and American treasure helped preserve
older forms of social life for longer than in other parts of Western Europe.
Linked to this traditionalism and, as an older Protestant or liberal historiography
would have it, partly reinforcing it, was the influence of the Catholic Church.
The early modern period had been born, in Spain as in the rest of Europe, under
the sign of the Renaissance, that burst of enthusiasm for the humane, memorably
2
INTRODUCTION
summed up by Michelet as the discovery of the world and of man himself. The
care for nature, and the careful observation thereof, undoubtedly laid the basis of
the scientific revolution which would transform the old world out of all recognition.
The writings of the Spanish humanist Luis Vives (1492–1540) are among the
most beautiful of the Renaissance world in this respect, pregnant with significance
for the future. But his native country was to take another route, becoming the
champion of the Counter-Reformation, in a mixture of political and religious commitments
which are still controversial, and, it has to be said, not well understood. For Michelet,
the Counter-Reformation aborted the work of the Renaissance, condemning much
of Europe to absolute monarchy and the tyranny of aristocracy, before the French
Revolution took up again the torch of liberation. The link between religion and
economic or social forms struck Joseph Townsend, a Wiltshire rector and sharpeyed, though fair-minded, observer of Spain in the course of his perambulations
through the country in 1786–7. The excessive ornamentation of the churches in
Barcelona, he thought, was due to the gold and silver of the Indies, which ‘came
upon them by surprise, and found them unprepared to make a proper use of the
abundant treasure’.1
Much of the most exciting work in social history nowadays is being done in
the realm of popular culture, in the sense of the exploration of the values and
solidarities perceived by ordinary people themselves rather than in terms of structures
imposed upon them by the historian. There has been a departure from the overarching
framework of modernisation which once gave the economist a privileged place as
guide to the past. It is certainly a more humane approach to the lives of our ancestors,
and its focus is the small-scale community—the family, the neighbourhood, the
village. It poses obvious problems for the historian who would attempt to write a
social history of the nation-state. No doubt the challenge, in the case of Spain, is
that of making sense of the constant interplay between centre and periphery—
between the great forces of capitalism sweeping in from America and the ‘timeless’
life of the peasantry, between the king’s judges and tax-collectors and the local
elites whose networks of influence constituted an alternative source of power, and
finally between the priest or inquisitor and the local wielders of spiritual power,
folk-healers and visionaries.
In general, the fascination of pre-industrial Europe lies in understanding ourselves
better through the reconstruction of the experiences of those who faced challenges
and lived by values other than our own. The struggle of humanity with the environment
has now become so specialised and professional that it hardly enters the consciousness
of most of us that food, clothing and shelter are something more than items of
exchange. Perhaps the first great triumph of social history was in the field of
historical geography—the exploration of local communities through a proper understanding
of their natural environment and an intuitive sympathy with the material and
moral civilisation which they developed in response. This was the memorable
achievement of the Annales School in the early part of this century. And it was also
the French who pioneered the technique of historical demography as a way of
3
INTRODUCTION
getting at the history of the silent majority. It was the social anthropologists who
reminded us that economics and demography are, in a sense, dependent on one
other factor, sometimes undervalued by the local historian: the creation of viable
and stable political entities. Otherwise life is apt to be brutish and short. Hence
the preoccupation of the social anthropologist, as we noted, with the exploration
of solidarities, and in particular with kinship. That the beliefs of people about
what they are doing may be of relevance to the social historian was amply demonstrated
by Max Weber in his seminal essay of 1904, The Protestant Ethic and the Spirit of
Capitalism. Social historians need few promptings nowadays to take this approach.
In the pages that follow, an attempt will be made to explore the character and development
of Spanish society between about 1500 and about 1800 from some of these viewpoints.
Given the size of the country and the length of the period, the task will not always
be easy. Dominating the historiography of Spain has been the phenomenon of economic
and military decline from the status of a world power. Attempts to understand and
arrest this decline give a certain coherence to the period. The change of dynasty in
1700, from Habsburg to Bourbon, perhaps marked a less radical break than is sometimes
imagined, as the government pursued efforts to maintain the American empire and
a large fleet in the Atlantic, although the old interference in northern and central
Europe, characteristic of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, was abandoned. If
Spain became a lesser power on the European horizon in the eighteenth century, the
long-standing problems of a weak economy and an unbalanced social structure continued
to generate political debate, and provide the historian with new insights into the
character of Spanish civilisation as a whole.
Thus, Chapters 1 to 4 seek to explore some of the structural constraints on the
economy, which kept the country in a ‘frontier’ situation, as it were—under-populated,
ill-integrated—long after the political reconquest from the Moor. Though Spain had
major handicaps stemming from the physical environment, the crucial factor in this
traditionalism must surely be social and political relationships. In a pioneering essay,
the philosopher Ortega y Gasset argued that his country—alas for it—had never
fully experienced feudalism. A too numerous warrior nobility and fortress towns
created a kind of egalitarian and decentralised commonwealth, which the failure of
empire tended to reinforce. This is the basic framework of our analysis in Chapters
5 to 7, which look in turn at the nature of late feudalism, the integration of townsmen
into a culture of honour and dependence, and the difficult equilibrium achieved
between the monarchy and its more powerful subjects. Finally, the stability and
longevity of that commonwealth depended on a certain culture of civility or good
citizenship—on attitudes to law and order, on loyalty to family and clan, on respect
for the gods and the precepts of morality—whose transformation in the early modern
period laid so many of the foundations of the world in which we still live.
4
1
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
A country of which ‘we had little experience or knowledge in the days of our forefathers’:
such was the impression which the Venetian Michele Suriano carried home with
him at the end of his embassy to the Spanish court in 1559. At the western extremity
of the ancient and medieval worlds, cut off from Europe by the Pyrenees (a more
impenetrable, if less lofty, barrier than the Alps), Spain had been locked for more
than seven centuries in those civil wars known as the Reconquest, which ended with
the fall of the last Muslim kingdom of Granada in 1492, and which determined that
the country would belong to Christendom rather than to Islam. Stretched out ‘like
an ox-hide’, in the words of the famous classical geographer Strabo, writing in the
first century BC, Iberia appeared at the time as a poor, mountainous land, ‘whose
soil is thin—and even that not uniformly well watered’. With few cities, and few
good harbours between Tarragona and the Pillars of Hercules (the western limits of
the ancient world), the peninsula nevertheless possessed one navigable river, which
fertilised its banks and stimulated trade—the Baetis, or Guadalquivir (‘Great River’),
as the Moors were to rebaptise it. From these lands of Seville and Cordoba came the
grain, wine and olive oil which were exported in quantity to Rome, and here was to
be the heart of Muslim power for centuries after the fall of Rome.
Though Spain made a distinctive contribution to classical civilisation, the general
impression of later writers, not least Spaniards themselves, was that the country
had been somewhat on the margin. In his introduction to one of the early geographies
of the peninsula, that of Méndez Silva in 1645, the historiographer Pellicer commented
that few classical writers, either Greek or Roman, had left adequate accounts ‘of
matters affecting us’. Things had got worse as a result of the political chaos caused
by the Arab invasions, and he thought that it was only now that a proper inventory
of the country, its people, resources and history, could be made.
Pellicer was neglectful, as most of his contemporaries were, of the work of the
Arab geographers. The Arab invasion of 711 might be regarded as a continuation
of those links with Africa which since prehistoric times and with the Carthaginians
had led to the transfer of manpower and culture across the Straits of Gibraltar.
But the Spain that we know took shape through a long guerrilla war against Islam,
led by Christian chiefs who had taken refuge in the impenetrable Cantabrian and
5
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
Pyrenean mountain chains. One of these, the king of León, began to reassert old
notions of Hispanic unity, under himself as Emperor (Alfonso VI 1065–1109).
His control of the increasingly important pilgrimage site of Santiago de Compostela—
famed throughout Christendom, along with Rome and Jerusalem—no doubt explains
his pre-eminence. The emergence of a more tangible unity among the different
Christian kingdoms was a slower process: by the thirteenth century León and
Castile had been definitively united, and the Crown was beginning to be looked
upon as an inalienable trust rather than a private patrimony which could be divided
among several sons. The subsequent dynastic unions of Castile with the Crown
of Aragon (marriage of Isabel of Castile with Ferdinand of Aragon in 1469), and
then with Portugal (sucession of Philip II to the Portuguese throne in 1580) completed
the restoration, as men believed, of that old Roman Iberia, promising a new Augustan
age of peace and prosperity.
To say, as did the Venetian ambassador in 1559, that other Europeans had had
‘little experience’ of the Spaniards before his own day, is somewhat misleading.
The Mediterranean coastline had been in continual contact with the south of France
since the early Middle Ages. James I of Aragon (1213–76), the famous conqueror
of the Balearic Islands and Valencia from the Moors, was the son of the countess
of Montpellier, and the culture and language of his new conquests were to be
largely that variety of Occitan which obtained in Catalonia. But James’s father,
Peter II, had been killed in 1213 at the decisive battle of Muret, which gave control
of the Languedoc to the king of France, in the name of a crusade against the
Albigensian heresy, and ended effectively any Spanish pretensions north of the
Pyrenees. However, the expansion of the Crown of Aragon along the Mediterranean
coast of Iberia in the following generation opened up new possibilities of trade
and naval power. Thanks to the resources of those great emporia, the cities of
Barcelona and Valencia, an Aragonese maritime empire began to take shape, with
the conquest of the islands of Sicily (1282) and Sardinia (1323–4), and mainland
Naples (1435). Castile, high up on the central tableland and turned away from
the Mediterranean, was developing significant naval and commercial links through
Biscay with the cities of north-west Europe in the later Middle Ages. Its conquest
of Granada gave it control of navigation through the Straits of Gibraltar. In the
same year (1492), it patronised the voyage of Columbus, which opened up the
Atlantic world to commercial activity of a kind which would soon outstrip that of
the old inland sea of Europe and North Africa.
One further political event must be considered before we can situate Spain
within the early modern world. The succession of the Habsburg Charles V, grandson
of the Catholic Kings, Ferdinand and Isabel, to the Spanish Crown in 1516 brought
these southern realms right into the heart of European politics at a particularly
sensitive time, that of the Reformation and the beginning of the wars of religion.
With Charles V, Spain found her destinies yoked to some of the most wealthy,
but most fought-over areas of Europe—Flanders, Franche-Comté, eventually Milan
(1535–40), not to mention Austria and the German empire, which, after his retirement,
6
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
was assigned to Charles’s brother and not to his son, the Spanish king Philip II
(1556–98). Charles V, a Fleming by birth and French by tongue, had no fixed
headquarters and spent much of his time outside Spain, though returning there to
prepare for death. In the reports of the Venetian ambassadors at this time, Spain
tends to figure merely as one part of a federal empire. Antonio Tiepolo (1567)
may be the first to signal a new reality. He would pay more attention to Spain
than to the other states of the monarchy, he told the senate, because it was ‘the
most important of all the realms of this most serene king’.
In the history books the period between the treaties of Cateau Cambrésis (1559)
and Westphalia (1648) is conventionally known as that of the hegemony of Spain,
arbiter of the destinies of Europe. Thereafter a much weakened Spain, stripped of
her European possessions in a series of treaties culminating with Utrecht (1713),
tends to fade from the textbooks. Yet this state maintained through much of the
eighteenth century the third most important fleet in Europe, after that of Britain
and France, and, as mistress of much of America, continued to play a significant
role in the Atlantic world. It is only with the defeat of the Spanish navy at Trafalgar
(1805), and the subsequent loss of control in America, confirmed by the independence
of most of the former colonies by 1825, that Spain passed definitively to the second
rank of European powers.
In its heyday the empire conferred on this rather poor, once marginal European
country, a unique attractiveness. Perhaps the most gifted and certainly the most
eloquent of the Venetian ambassadors, Leonardo Donà (1570–3), conveys all the
excitement which men of the time felt at the reports of the conquests of Mexico
and Peru, and marvelled at a court masque to celebrate the birth of a son to Philip
II, in which the portrayal of the submission of two Indian princes ‘gave us foreign
observers an idea of how great is the power of Castile’. And later ambassadors,
like Girolamo Soranzo (1608–11), were dazzled by the silver and gold landed at
Seville, the pearls and diamonds at Lisbon. Even the financially exhausted and
militarily crippled Spain of 1664–6 could still impress Lady Ann Fanshawe, wife
of the British ambassador with the ‘curiositys brought from Italy and the Indies’,
the silver and chocolate (still a novelty) from America, the lacquered or ivory
cabinets from India or Japan. The sense of cosmopolitanism, at least in Seville
and at court, and of being at the heart of the world was captured in the saying,
reported by the French traveller Jouvin in 1672, ‘that mass is said at every hour of
the day in some part of their empire, that the sun shines there all the time, for
when it has set in Spain it is casting its rays in America’.1
This imperial radiance was associated with a golden age of Spanish art, literature
and learning. Spanish treatises on government, on warfare, on the exploration of
the New World became particularly popular in the sixteenth century, followed by
an admiration for poetry, plays and novels. Sir Richard Fanshawe, husband of
Lady Ann mentioned above, was a gifted translator of Spanish and Portuguese
poetry. Inevitably the far-flung nature of the Spanish dominion led to a study of
its language and culture, even by its enemies. Queen Elizabeth may have been the
7
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
last British monarch to read and speak Spanish, an example imitated by her chief
secretary Burghley. The Puritan party at court— men like Sir Philip Sidney and
Edmund Spenser—were under the spell of Spanish romances of chivalry. One of
Secretary Walsingham’s correspondents wrote in 1582 that he was learning the
Spanish language, ‘which I plainly see that he who would go about in the world
ought to know’.2
Most people nowadays will think of El Greco, Velázquez, Murillo—and, of course,
also of Cervantes—when they evoke the Spanish Golden Age. But Spanish painting—
and even more the rich tradition of polychrome sculpture—was less appreciated
abroad initially than Spanish books. Some interest was shown by foreign merchants
in Murillo, during and soon after his own lifetime; but Spanish art remained to be
discovered by the Romantics—like the country itself, which began to attract gentlemen
of leisure (as distinct from merchants and ambassadors) during the later eighteenth
century. In 1779 Secretary of State Floridablanca deplored the fact that ‘some
foreigners are buying up in Seville all the canvases that they can acquire of Bartolomé
Murillo and other famous painters, and sending them abroad’, and he introduced
new restrictions.3
 Joseph Townsend’s sensitivity to the beauties of the Alhambra
palace in Granada in the course of his visit of 1787 is an early symptom of the
Romantic appreciation of the exotic, which would heighten sympathy for things
Spanish in nineteenth-century Europe.
But for most of the early modern period Spain was trying to live down its
Moorish past. The indefatigable traveller and art critic Antonio Ponz, whose journeys
across his native land in the 1770s and 1780s are such a mine of information for
the social historian, was typical of the classical temper which marked the culmination
and waning of early modern civilisation. For him, the Spanish cities, with their
narrow, crooked streets and intimate, rambling buildings had to be explained away
as an unfortunate legacy of the Islamic period. The Venetian ambassadors shared
a similar impression. Federico Badoero in 1557 found most Spanish towns ‘neither
beautiful nor clean’; and his successor Francesco Soranzo in 1602 commented
that, compared with their European counterparts, ‘they are remarkable neither
for the splendour of their buildings, nor for the beauty of their streets, nor for the
grandeur of their public squares’. The qualities which later generations would
come to admire, the intimacy of the little squares and labyrinthine neighbourhoods,
held little attraction for the classical mind.
The Venetians, and more generally the Italians, were not only the arbiters of
good taste in the sixteenth and much of the seventeenth centuries, but also the
supreme exponents of political philosophy. They first drew attention to the paradox
of Spain: a great empire which seemed very insecurely balanced on the shoulders
of a poor and backward people. Giovanni Botero (1544–1617), one of the pioneers
of political economy, helped shape contemporary views of Spain as a giant with
feet of clay through his influential writings. He had no first-hand knowledge of
the country until a visit he made there in 1603–6, well after he had published his
criticism. But from Strabo and from travellers’ tales he could find out enough to
8
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
make some telling points. ‘Generally mountainous and lacking in water’, Spain
had few rivers, therefore few opportunities to build markets and towns, or expand
her population. The Spanish temperament, as described in the classical authors
and as appeared to be confirmed by the persecutions and wars of Botero’s own
day, was more attuned to war than to the arts of peace. ‘No country is more
lacking in crafts and industry,’ he thought.
The peninsula lay, in some senses, with its back to Europe. The Pyrenees had
few accessible passes. The fertile Mediterranean coastline, the natural gateway to
Europe, had few good harbours, and backed on to the high, bare continental
plateau of Castile, the meseta. The best harbours, and the easiest communications
with the interior, by mule if not by river, faced west, out into the long uncharted
waters of the Atlantic. The central tableland had an average altitude of 660 metres
(just under 2,200 feet), making the country the most elevated in Europe after
Switzerland. A high, squat landmass, Iberia generates a kind of continental climate
of its own, with extremes of heat and cold.
Three main features determine the climate of the peninsula. First there is its
southerly latitude—considerably to the south of most of Italy, for example. Then
one has to take into account the altitude of much of the landmass, which can lead
to cold and snow in Old Castile and León, that is those areas to the north of
Madrid and the Guadarrama mountains, which bisect the meseta in two. Here the
average altitude rises to 1,000 metres above sea level, where, according to a saying
related by the Venetian envoy in 1525, there are ten months of invierno (winter)
and two of infierno (hellfire).4
 The third factor shaping the climate of Spain is the
westward thrust of the peninsula out into the Atlantic, exposed, therefore, to the
cloud, winds and rain from the great ocean. The north-western seaboard, including
Galicia and its great pilgrimage centre of Santiago de Compostela, tends to get a
lot of rain. Even the south-west, including the fertile valley of the Guadalquivir,
is swept generously by the rainclouds in autumn and spring. But the altitudes
there are generally low (200 metres on average), and the southerly latitudes lead
to rapid evaporation, creating problems of aridity particularly in the summer months.
One of the great conditioning influences on the peninsula has been, as Botero put
it, the ‘lack of water’. In general, as one gets further back from the Atlantic shoreline,
rising gradually to altitudes of 800–1,000 metres in the eastern and northern mesetas,
the rainclouds peter out. About half of the landmass gets under 500 millimetres
(about 20 inches) of rain a year, creating what is known as a semi-arid climate.
Linked to the question of aridity is the lack of tree-cover, commented upon by
travellers in the early modern period. A narrow belt—perhaps one-tenth of the
surface area—along the Pyrenees, Cantabrian Mountains and Galicia can boast a
good natural cover of chestnut, beech and grass. But south of the Cantabrians the
landscape is and was steppe-like, on the high Castilian plateau. Antonio Ponz
commented on the consequences: the erosion of the soil, the evaporation of what
moisture there was, the shortage of firewood and the lack of building materials.5
The chestnut, needing the rains of north and west Spain, ventured timidly down
9
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
as far as the Tagus (or beyond, in the west). But the characteristic tree of the
Castilian steppe was the stubby, drought-resistant evergreen oak. A kind of climatic
frontier was crossed south of the Guadarrama mountains and south of the Tagus
River, as one entered New Castile. Here the olive, dreading frosts and happy with
little water, came into its own. Further south still, beyond the Sierra Morena, one
came to the old Arab heartland of Andalusia, which linked up, via the mountainous
kingdom of Granada, with the other Moorish stronghold of south-eastern Spain,
Valencia. These areas were famed for their warmth and fertility. The Andalusian
Pedro de Medina, in one of the early geographies of Spain (1548), praised Valencia’s
river banks ‘lined with roses and flowers’, with ‘poplars, pines and other trees’.
And that other pioneering geographer, Rodrigo Méndez Silva (1645), found it
full of ‘gardens, orchards, groves’.
Overall, Méndez Silva’s impression of Spain was flattering: a land of ‘abundance’,
blessed with ‘the most agreeable, temperate climate in all Europe’, half-way between
the cold of France and the heat of North Africa. But the future Philip II is found
writing to his father in 1545 that the country could never match the subsidies
paid by France to its monarch: ‘The infertility of these realms is well known to
Your Majesty, and one bad year can throw our people into poverty.’ And the Jesuit
historian Mariana lamented towards the end of the century that lack of rainfall
often meant that ‘the harvest will not repay the cost of farming’.6
The great problem facing most of the peninsula was the thinness of the soil
(aggravated by deforestation) and the irregular distribution of water. Much of the
northern tableland receives less than 500 millimetres (about 20 inches) of rain a
year, much of southern Castile under 400, the higher figure generally being taken
as the lower limit for comfortable farming. In the fertile basin of the Guadalquivir,
where the Atlantic breezes bring in up to 700 millimetres a year, the supply is
concentrated in torrential spring downpours; here the problem is to prevent evaporation
during the intense heat of summer.
One of the features of the Iberian landscape which is still marked is the great
contrast between regions. Not only is the central plateau difficult of access from
the Mediterranean, but it is itself traversed by mountain barriers. We may start
with the Cantabrian Mountains to the north, shielding Castile from the Bay of
Biscay. Here the Christian armies had taken refuge in the eighth century from the
Moorish invaders, and from here had launched the campaigns of Reconquest.
The Iberian sierras, sweeping south from there towards the Mediterranean coast,
helped foster the separate political identity of the Crown of Aragon, a medieval
frontier only partially overcome with the marriage of Ferdinand and Isabel in
1469. Then the Central System, with its centrepiece the Guadarrama mountains
to the north of Madrid, separates Old from New Castile. The Christians had built
up their towns and settlements behind the Guadarrama, in the land of chestnut,
snow and Romanesque churches, before launching the hardest-fought part of the
Reconquest, the struggle of the twelfth century for control of New Castile. After
New Castile, the Muslims were entrenched behind the Sierra Morena in Andalusia,
10
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
and beyond and below the Iberian mountains in Valencia. They lost control of
these in the thirteenth century. The Sub-Baetic mountains and the desert country
of the south-east guaranteed the survival of the last Moorish kingdom, that of
Granada, until 1492.
Though the mountains of Spain help to explain some of the human and political
development of the peninsula, they were not in themselves great impediments to
communication, if the will was there. The Pyrenees and Cantabrians certainly posed
formidable problems, with only a limited number of crossings which man or beast
could use. The other mountain ranges were more easily passable, at least in the
good season. The altitude of the central tableland itself meant, though, that in winter
many of the sierras received 20–40 inches of snow, sufficient to block the higher
passes for two to three months of the year.7
 The papal nuncio Camillo Borghese
was held up on the road from Aragon to Castile by snow in January 1594, as had
been the king himself shortly before, travelling in the opposite direction from Castile
to Aragon to hold a parliament there at the beginning of February 1585. The Cortes
(parliament) of Castile urged in 1588 that ‘it would be most useful to erect high
stone plinths on the mountain passes to mark out the road, for it happens day after
day when the snows fall…that travellers lose their way and fall into the ravines’.8
In pre-industrial Europe traffic tended to follow the rivers, and here Spain was
at a clear disadvantage. As the Venetian ambassador noted in 1602, ‘there are few
rivers, and none of them can be called really navigable’. Of the five great rivers of
the peninsula, four—the Duero, Tagus, Guadiana and Guadalquivir—flowed into
the vast emptiness of the Atlantic; only the Ebro linked up with the heart of the
classical and medieval world, the Mediterranean. But such discussion is academic,
since none of the five was easy to navigate anyway. They carry at times a great
volume of water, when the snows melt near their source, or when the autumn
rains fall; but then they run very low in the heat of summer. And the steepness of
the fall from the central tableland to the coast, particularly on the Mediterranean
side, creates rapids—rendering the Ebro, for example, unsafe in places. Plans were
afoot in early modern Spain to tame the rivers. The Cortes of 1583–5 held long
debates on making the Tagus navigable, from Toledo to Lisbon, according to
plans submitted by the great Italian engineer Giovanni Batista Antonelli. The
date was significant: the Crown of Portugal had been assumed by Philip II in
1580, and it was hoped that if the Tagus could be made safe for boats, trade
between the Portuguese and the Spanish would flourish and ‘a good basis would
be laid for strengthening that perpetual peace and friendship which it is necessary
should exist between us’. Alternatively, any ‘stirring or disturbance or hint of
such in Portugal’ could be the more easily countered by sending troops down by
boat. The technical problems—lack of water in summer, rapids—could be mastered
‘with weirs and dams’. Hopes were expressed that the Duero and the Guadalquivir
(from Seville up to Cordoba) might be made navigable in the same way.9
The impressive engineering feat was actually achieved, as regards the Tagus,
by 1588. But the cost of maintaining the locks seems to have been too great, and
11
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
the river reverted to its former state within a few years. Economic factors were
clearly more important than engineering. Seville had expressed concern that goods
from the New World would now reach the central tableland through Lisbon; León
protested that its network of fairs would no longer attract English, Flemish or
French goods imported through the Cantabrian ports, since these would now also
take the route to Lisbon. In fact, the Tagus was made navigable on the strict
condition that only the wares of Portugal and Portuguese Asia should be allowed
up the river at all. With such a restriction in force the whole enterprise was surely
not cost-efficient, and its abandonment can hardly cause surprise.
It required the more centralist government of the Bourbons after 1700, and
particularly the enlightened absolutism of Charles III (1759–88), to take up the
challenge anew. Joseph Townsend was able to inspect the herculean enterprise of
making the Ebro navigable, with 2,000 soldiers and 1,000 peasants digging away
earth for canals. It was the intention to link up these with another big canal traversing
Old Castile, so that the Mediterranean could be joined to the Bay of Biscay. The
Castilian canal had actually been initiated in 1752 under the marquis of Ensenada.
As Townsend noted in 1786, Spain needed long years of peace in order to complete
this gargantuan task; but within a few years of his writing the country was swept
into the whirlwind of war against the French Revolution and Napoleon, which
led to the collapse of the old regime. The canals were never finished.10
Unable to be exploited for navigation, the rivers set up obstacles of their own
to communication. Though the main ones had long been bridged, the smaller
often exercised the ingenuity of the traveller desirous of crossing them. Antonio
Ponz was indignant that the main road south-east from Madrid could be cut when
the rains came, at a point only five and a half kilometres out of the imperial
capital, at the ford of Vallecas. Yet from this village had to come every day ‘a great
part of the bread which is eaten in Madrid’. Three leagues (16.8 kilometres) further
on, one had to cross the Jarama by a small ferry-boat; but if the river was in spate,
one had to swing some thirty kilometres south to the nearest bridge, which lay in
the vicinity of the royal palace of Aranjuez. On the road south from Madrid to
Toledo, commented Ponz at another time, just four small bridges would make all
the difference; but the villages along the way preferred to spend their money
building church towers—‘a rather mistaken form of piety’, when benevolence towards
one’s fellow man seemed the first duty of religion as the Enlightenment was coming
to believe.11 The need for bridges across the smaller rivers was not really appreciated
in an age when travel was so intermittent, and when the expense fell on the locality.
A majority of deputies to the Cortes of 1586–8 criticised the government for authorising
too many schemes for bridges, without offering any funds of its own to help along
the work.
The main rivers had adequate provision anyway since medieval times. There
were four bridges across the Tagus, for example, between Toledo and the Portuguese
frontier. On the other hand the supply could not be regarded as generous: thus
there was no crossing of the Guadalquivir between Seville and Cordoba. And the
12
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
bridges that did exist were not always reliable. So the Valencian Cortes of 1563
complained that the crossing of the Xúquer and Corbera, which cut this Mediterranean
kingdom in half, was ‘very dangerous, because the bridges over these rivers are of
wood, and so usually when the floods come they break…and persons and animals
are occasionally drowned’. But though the local town, Cullera, was authorised at
this time to levy a toll in order to build in stone, it had to confess in 1585 that the
engineering techniques were beyond it: the river bottom was too sandy, the pillars
simply sank, and it returned to a pontoon bridge. Silting was a major problem in
the lower reaches of many Spanish rivers, given the steepness of their drop to the
coastal plains. This was the reason that there was only a pontoon bridge across
the Ebro at Tortosa—an inviting target for incendiaries in 1640 when the Catalan
rebels tried to cut the main coastal route south to Valencia. And it proved impossible
to build a stone bridge over the river at Seville, for all the wealth and power of
that city. By comparison one understands the pride with which the chronicler
Escolano could speak in 1610 of the five stone bridges across the Turia at Valencia
city, ‘each two shots of an arquebus from the next, something which it would be
hard to find in any other great city in the world’.12
As one accompanies travellers and chroniclers round the peninsula one gets a
vivid impression of a vast, underpopulated and uncharted world. Travel was an
adventure. You can choose, wrote Ponz, between being scorched on the roads in
summer for the lack of trees, or lose your way in winter, with snow, floods and
lack of food. On the main highway from Barcelona to court, in the vicinity of
Zaragoza, the inns were as bad as the roads, he wrote: short of everything the
traveller needed. The count of Gondomar, ambassador to England between 1613
and 1618, got to know the roads well between Madrid, then capital of a world
empire, and the Cantabrian ports. His verdict was that ‘travelling through (Spain)
is more painful and uncomfortable than through any deserted region anywhere in
Europe, for there are no beds to be had, no inns, no food’.13
In days when horse-power was crucial for getting about, Spain suffered a further
disadvantage. The French cleric Barthélemy Joly noted in 1603 that on crossing the
Pyrenees one left a land of horses and entered one of mules and ponies. Spain could
boast fine Arabian thoroughbreds, but they were scarce, and the smuggling of horses
abroad to France was an offence so grave that it came under the jurisdiction of the
Inquisition. The problem basically was that ‘in almost no part of Spain is there hay
or oats, just barley and short straw, as unappetising as one of our mats’. And, Joly
went on, it was hard to find horse combs, stable-litter or trained stable-lads in the
inns.14 Don Quixote had, of course, to content himself with a nag, the famous Rocinante.
Spain was, above all, the land of the mule. The parliaments of Philip II specified
how many leagues a hired mule could be expected to travel in a day, and how much
the guide should be paid. Do not pay the muleteer in advance, advised the papal
nuncio Borghese in 1594; rather, give him what he needs by the day to buy fodder,
and insist that you will not pay for extra days caused by the tiredness or illness of
his animals along the way. Here and in Borghese’s careful annotations of the amount
13
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
of money the traveller will need to carry, and the quantity of provisions, there
emerges the overwhelming uncertainty of travel in the early modern period. One
had to keep a record of the towns where one could hope to find food, lodging,
facilities for changing money, before pursuing the next stage of one’s journey. Parts
of the diary of Borghese’s contemporary, Bernardo Catalá de Valeriola (1568–1607),
an inveterate traveller between his native Valencia and the court, reflect the informal
mapping of routes which the prudent man did for himself in those days.
The routes across the peninsula, in fact, are not always those most familiar to
us nowadays. The highway from Valencia to Catalonia did not follow the coast as
it does nowadays, but swung inland through the hill country towards the now
half-forgotten but then busy staging-post of Sant Mateu. In Sant Mateu the master
of the chivalric order of Montesa held his court, and one could therefore be sure
of food and protection. Travellers heading north from Madrid towards the Cantabrian
ports preferred the easier but longer route via the large town of Valladolid. Urgent
dispatches of letters or of fish from the coast might take the modern path over the
Somosierra Pass, but there was no proper road here until the 1780s and none
suitable for carts until some time after that. Similarly travellers from the court to
Valencia would find it easier to take the more circuitous route via the strategic
corridor of Almansa (used by the Bourbon armies in 1707 to force their way into
the Habsburg-controlled Mediterranean kingdom) rather than risk the direct but
dangerous mountain pass which led down from the meseta to the coast. Though a
road had been opened here in 1427 to facilitate Valencian access to the wheatfields of the central tableland, it remained down to the end of the old regime a
twisted, uneven track, cut by mountain torrents and infested by bandits.15
Perhaps more surprising was the poor state of communications between the political
and commercial capitals of empire, Madrid and Seville. The direct road nowadays is
through the pass of Despeñaperros (‘Dog’s Leap’), but work on this was only begun
in 1779. There seems always to have been a crossing in this vicinity: the Venetian
ambassador Navagero probably used it in 1525 when he referred to the utterly ‘depopulated
and barren’ countryside through which he passed. Building a decent route through
Despeñaperros required not only feats of engineering, but also the strengthening of
security against bandits, which Charles III tried to achieve by planting colonies of
German farmers in the vicinity. Before then the main road lay further to the west,
through the now half-forgotten Almodóvar del Campo, which boldly told the king’s
commissioners in 1575 that it was ‘a vital and obligatory stage between the two provinces’
(of Castile and Andalusia), having no less than ‘twenty public inns’ to cater for the
traffic.16 Nearby the ‘Royal City’ of Ciudad Real was founded by Alfonso the Wise,
after the conquest of Andalusia, in much the same spirit as Charles III’s colonies near
Despeñaperros, with the aim of securing the main road south.
The most frequented route south, since classical times, lay through Extremadura,
towards the Portuguese frontier. The generally lower altitudes and milder climate
of this Atlantic façade of the meseta may have facilitated settlement. The ruins of
the famous Roman city of Mérida are in this region, once at the centre of a major
14
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
network of communications, which led up to Salamanca, the great university town
of the later Middle Ages and on to the fairs of León. Down this route came most
of the transhumant sheep, which were the wealth of the peninsula, to their winter
pastures, and along it went most of the Conquistadors and settlers of the New
World. Here the shrine of Guadalupe began to rival Santiago de Compostela from
the fourteenth century. But from that time a gradual shift in population, wealth
and communication took place towards the east, as the last threat from the Muslim
stronghold in Granada receded.
Routes had to be built up in segments, through a proliferation of settlements
which conferred security and markets. How else can we explain the importance
of a little town like Torre de Juan Abad (300 families), which claimed in 1575 to
be ‘on the royal highway used by the carts which cross the Sierra Morena coming
from Seville and Granada and Andalusia to the court of Madrid and La Mancha’?17
No doubt the roads here were easier for carts than further west; but perhaps the
access to the markets of the flourishing towns of Baeza and Ubeda, gems of the
Renaissance but now off the beaten track, had something to do with it as well.
The modern period has seen a concentration and simplification of the network of
communications as the old pattern of local exchanges ceases to have much meaning.
How big was Spain for the traveller in the days of the mule? Ponz once noted
that in Castile men counted by leagues (5.6 kilometres), and in the Crown of
Aragon by how far one could travel on foot in an hour—‘which for the traveller
comes to the same thing’.18 The Cortes of 1579–82 expected the hired muleteer to
cover nine or ten leagues in a day. Generally, therefore, 50–60 kilometres would
seem to constitute a good day’s journey at the time. Leaving Valencia on 25 June
1603, the diarist Bernardo Catalá de Valeriola tells us that he reached Madrid,
some 350 kilometres away, on 30 June, while his return in winter took slightly
longer, from 8 to 14 December. It took the papal nuncio Borghese seven days to
get from Madrid to Valencia in the summer of 1594, while Joseph Townsend spent
fourteen days in a hired carriage, drawn by seven mules, to cover twice that distance
between Barcelona and Madrid in May 1786.19 On the scale of those days, and
with no navigable rivers, Spain constituted a formidable landmass: a fortnight to
get from the chief Mediterranean port, Barcelona, inland to the capital, Madrid,
and easily another ten days to get from there down to Seville, gateway to the New
World.
The mail could achieve faster speeds, it is true. A regular postal service was set
up between Valencia and Madrid in the early sixteenth century, with riders guaranteeing
to cover a minimum of ten leagues a day, and, if they were paid extra, up to
twenty leagues (112 kilometres), which seems to have been regarded as a kind of
physical limit. By the early seventeenth century the ordinary mail left Madrid on
Sunday and arranged to get to Valencia by Wednesday. The king’s business could
be dispatched a little faster. The Cortes of 1645 accepted that grievances could be
submitted to Madrid, considered, and a reply returned all within ten days. But
this was an emergency procedure, and the very length of the interval perhaps
15
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
suggests some of the limitations to the exercise of political authority from the
centre in those days.
Returning to the ordinary traveller, one may note the improvements which
were being introduced towards the end of the old regime. After 1763 stage-coaches
offered a regular service, once a week, from Madrid to Barcelona or Seville. They
promised to cut the old journey time in half, to just six days; but they remained
scarce and expensive. No doubt improvements to the roads and the mountain
passes under Charles III made such speeds increasingly feasible. But the roads in
much of the peninsula remained very uncertain down to the nineteenth century.
Théophile Gautier noted how difficult it was to find the road between Malaga
and Cordoba in 1840—‘a fanciful road, hardly even a beaten track, cut by deep
ravines at every step’. And George Borrow shortly before lost his way between
Salamanca and Valladolid on the Queen’s highway, which seemed to him more
like ‘a medley of bridle-paths and drift ways, where discrimination is very difficult’.20
Travellers’ tales gradually built up a sense of what Spain was like, but it was a
slow process. Maps had been devised first for the seafarer, showing coastlines and
havens—the famous portolan charts. The Catalan—Mallorcan school had built up a
pioneering reputation for making these, a work ably pursued by the House of Trade
in Seville after the discovery of the Indies. But it is somewhat paradoxical that the
interior of Spain itself should have been so badly known. The chronicler Escolano
complained in 1610 about the inaccuracies in the classical maps of Ptolemy and
others, on which much reliance had still to be placed. They gave no latitudes, he
commented, or projections from the poles. Because the technical skills of engraving
were better there, maps of the peninsula tended to be produced in Flanders; but
sheer ignorance of Spain as a country meant that even the famous Ortelius map
‘has shuffled the true names and positions of almost all towns’, at least in the kingdom
of Valencia. Escolano was left to speculate ironically whether future generations
would think there had been two Valencias, that of Ortelius and the real one.21
The sixteenth century saw heroic attempts to map the peninsula, but in ways
which may strike later generations as not fully scientific. What has been called
the ‘first guide to Imperial Spain’ —though perhaps the epithet belongs to Fernando,
the son of Christopher Columbus, who attempted a similar task a generation earlier—
is that published by Pedro de Medina in 1548. Dedicated to the heir to the throne,
the future Philip II, it aimed to teach him about the mighty nation over which he
would one day rule. Medina was famous for his cartography of the Atlantic, where
Spanish ships ruled the waves, and for his history of the dukes of Medina Sidonia,
his fellow Andalusians and patrons. These twin interests, geography and history,
are reflected in his ‘Great and Memorable Things of Spain’ (1548). After a historical 
introduction, he comes in the twenty-fourth chapter to a ‘description’ of the country.
He admits that he could have followed a division by the great rivers, and, indeed,
in Chapter 170 he has some useful things to say about the mountains of the peninsula
and the watersheds of the rivers. But he will proceed, he tells us, by kingdoms
and historic provinces. His purpose is to describe the ‘wealth’ of the land in a
16
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
sense that is no longer current— that is, its grandeur and its cultural patrimony, as
well as its material resources. His selection of places for comment is often more
informed by their historical associations than by their geographic importance.
Philip II, to whom Medina dedicated the work, was responsible for impressive
attempts of his own to map the resources of his realm. One of these was the famous
Relaciones—questionnaires of 59 and 45 headings sent out in 1575 and 1578 respectively
to the local authorities throughout Castile and the Indies. The information was
needed, ran the preamble, to promote ‘the honour and dignity of these kingdoms’,
and their ‘reputation and grandeur’. As with Pedro de Medina, the object was
only partly utilitarian. Thus there were questions about the great men and historical
monuments of the locality, as well as about its population and production.
The other great geography of imperial Spain is that of Rodrigo Méndez Silva,
published in 1645. Doubly an outsider, as a Portuguese, whose compatriots were
just then struggling for independence against the monarchy, and the descendant
of converted Jews in trouble with the Inquisition, he threw himself with enthusiasm
into a description of Iberia along the familiar lines. There is some geography,
with descriptions of the crops, population and industry of the different regions;
but fundamentally the country is visualised in moral rather than physical terms,
as a federation of communities, whose wealth lies in their patrimony—their historical
monuments, in the broad sense, rather than their material resources.
The reader of Medina or Méndez Silva would come away with only a hazy
notion of what the country looked like. The best of these cosmographies, in the
sense of an inventory of the patrimony, physical and cultural, of a people, were
inevitably done at the local level by men who had a deep knowledge of their own
surroundings. One of the pioneers was Martín de Viciana, a gentleman somewhat
down on his luck, who practised as a notary, and who travelled round the kingdom
of Valencia in the 1560s asking the local authorities about the population and
production and notable features of their districts. He was followed in 1610 by the
priest Gaspar Escolano, more erudite and more classically minded, who nevertheless
retained a sharp enough eye for the world he saw about him, for numbers of
people, distances, types of crop. Both Viciana and Escolano, who are among the
outstanding products of a school of historiography which was beginning to flourish
in their own day, much as in Elizabethan England, were basically interested in the
patrimony of their people in the broad sense. They will situate a town more by
reference to its founding myth than to the less exciting criterion of economic significance.
There were attempts made at mapping in the more modern sense. Philip II
commissioned Pedro Esquivel, professor of mathematics in the university of Alcalá
de Henares, to carry out a survey of the peninsula in 1566. One of those who
worked with Esquivel affirmed ‘that it is no exaggeration to say that since the
creation of the world no region thereof has been described with more care, effort
and accuracy’.22 But the work was probably too great for one team, and was not
completed. Some of the maps of seventeenth-century Spain, produced in Flanders
and relying on second-hand information, were accurate enough. That of Blaeu,
17
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
published in Amsterdam in 1672, provided latitudes and gave a scale of Spanish
leagues and German miles. The traveller would have a fair idea of the lie of the
rivers, but not of mountains or roads.
Certainly the seventeenth century witnessed a stirring of the Spanish authorities
in this matter. The Portuguese cartographer João Batista Lavanha was commissioned
by the Aragonese to map their kingdom in 1613–4, and Philip III wrote to the
Valencian Generalitat (committee of the estates) in 1617 asking them to expedite
‘a map or description’ of their own province since Aragon and Catalonia were
finishing theirs. But it was not until near the end of the century that what has
been called the ‘first modern map’ of Valencia was produced, in 1693. Commissioned
by the viceroy and executed by the Jesuit Cassaus, it was designed to show physical
relief and main roads, in order to facilitate the movement of the new state militia
instituted the year before.23
Cassaus only gave the main roads, and was not precise about elevations. There
was consequently much left to do in the eighteenth century. The great reforming
minister the marquis of Ensenada, in a memorial of about 1748, spoke of the need
for a proper mapping of Spain: ‘We have no detailed ones…There is no one who
is able to engrave them, and we have to rely on faulty ones imported from France
and Holland.’ There was a need to employ more accurate instruments of measurement,
such as those being developed in Paris and London, and map design itself would
have to be improved, ‘either by bringing in foreign craftsmen, or sending our
young artists to Paris to learn about maps’.24 Under Ensenada’s inspiration, Tomás
López began his mammoth task in the 1760s and 1770s of collecting information
from all over Spain for a series of regional maps and descriptions. He produced
maps of Granada in 1761 and Valencia in 1762, but was still sending out questionnaires
at much later dates. In 1777–8 his list of fifteen questions distributed to the parish
priests and local authorities of the kingdom of Valencia included requests for
information about shrines and historical monuments, in the spirit of the sixteenthcentury cosmographies. But there were five questions about population and economy,
and three which could be broadly labelled as topographical. The parish priests
were thus invited to submit their own sketch maps of the locality, ‘and will give
the names of the mountains, where they begin to rise and fall, and a fair estimate
of the time it would take to cross them, or of how big they are’. Inevitably such
dependence on local informants led to the kind of uncertainties highlighted by
one of the priests in his reply—that he could not do the inspection in person, that
he would have to rely on ‘people who I do not know if they will tell me the truth’,
and he suggested that López take a horse and go round the places himself.25
Eventually it was on foot that the information was gathered for the culminating
map of the old regime, that of Antonio Joseph Cavanilles on Valencia (1795). A
priest (like Cassaus) and a tutor to aristocratic families, Cavanilles became interested
in the work of French naturalists and was appointed professor of botany in Madrid.
Entrusted by the Crown with a survey of the vegetation of the peninsula, he decided
on his own initiative to add observations on geography and agriculture, ‘since we
18
AN INHOSPITABLE LAND
had hardly anything on the situation and character of mountains, and geography
in general was very inaccurate’.26 Beginning with his native Valencia he trekked
through this rugged Mediterranean territory for three years, though he was no
longer young, at forty-six years of age, when he started. But his efforts resulted in
a classic of geographical literature, and a fitting conclusion to the centuries of
effort by Spaniards to get to know themselves better. It was left to the military in
the nineteenth century to carry this physical inventory of resources to its completion.
19
2
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
The concern with the mapping of Spain was part of the inventory of resources which
marked the growth of the early modern state. One critical aspect of the same process
was a new attention to population. Echoing a familiar theme, the Venetian ambassador
Mocenigo noted in 1631 that ‘the Spains, the states of this king in Italy and all the
Spaniards scattered throughout the Indies do not come to two-thirds of the twenty
million people’ on which the arch-enemy France could count.1
 Since the classical
geographer Strabo, whose ideas had been given a new lease of life by Giovanni
Botero (1589), the geography (and warlike temper) of Spain was held to be inimical
to cities and to a numerous population. In an age when populousness was associated
with prosperity and the arts of peace, Spain’s lack of people tended to be held up as
a reproach. ‘All nations marvel at the decline of our population,’ wrote the later
president of the Council of Castile, the count of Campomanes in 1774—though, in a
change of emphasis which would mark the advent of modern times, he warned that
a numerous population by itself was not necessarily a good thing.2
At the outset, one may note the impressive range of materials available for a
study of demography in Spain, testimony to the pioneering formation there of a
modern state and church. There were already good medieval censuses, of a fiscal
kind, for the Crown of Aragon. But the first comprehensive survey of Castile was
made in 1534, and it excluded nobles and clergy since these did not pay taxes.
Additional censuses were made of the royal domain—omitting many seigneurial
estates whose owners collected the taxes (alcabalas) for themselves—in 1552, 1561,
1585–7 and 1596–7. To crown a century of effort came the universal survey of all
households in Castile in 1591, in connection with a new turn of the fiscal screw,
the introduction of the millones. It was not until the seventeenth century that the
Crown of Aragon attracted the attention of the Treasury, with good censuses of
Valencia in 1646 or of Aragon in 1642, for example. Valencia, indeed, had already
been investigated pretty thoroughly in the sixteenth century, since her Morisco
population constituted something of a security risk.
One of the fascinating aspects of this whole process is—as with maps of the terrain
—how slowly a reliable picture of the population was built up. The government had
taken great pains to find out how many Moriscos were in the kingdom at the time
20
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
of the expulsion in 1609. Bleda, writing in 1618, must have consulted these state
papers when he calculated 340,672 persons expelled; but the Venetian ambassador
Gritti at the same time (1619) was putting abroad a much higher figure— 600,000—
which would soon become conventional wisdom as an illustration of the price that
Spain paid for her religious fanaticism. The fallibility of memory in an age of essentially
oral communication meant that the contours of population may not always have
been present in political calculations. Olivares overestimated, with disastrous results,
the numbers of Catalans in 1626 when he approached them for military cooperation;
and it is puzzling that the government resorted to a hasty count of the Castilian
population in 1646 when it already had a more accurate, recent survey of 1631—
which lay forgotten in the state archives until the present day.3
Military and fiscal reorganisation under the Bourbons in the eighteenth century
created new sources for the demographic historian. Taxes on income led to inventories
of the manpower of the Crown of Aragon, listing in some cases individuals and
not just households. This was the model which the marquis of Ensenada tried to
follow in Castile between 1750 and 1754, listing persons and ages in one of the
most complete censuses for any pre-industrial population (though the proposed
income tax could not be implemented). The famous Enlightened minister, the
count of Aranda, was responsible in 1768 for the first survey of Castile and his
native Crown of Aragon together. But the first modern census of Spain as a whole
is reckoned to be that of his successor, the count of Floridablanca, in 1787. The
latter’s motives were avowedly to show the advance of population, and hence of
civilisation, under Enlightened Absolutism, ‘so that foreigners may see that the
kingdom is not quite as deserted as they and their writers believe’. On the eve of
the age of Malthus, this optimism may serve as a monument to a more traditional
outlook on populousness as a source of wealth.
The Catholic Church had played its part, alongside the state, in making Spaniards
aware of their human resources. Its care was to police its flock, and, as elsewhere
in early modern Europe, it began to keep records of baptisms, marriages, Easter
communions, confirmations and burials. If the individual became aware of himself
as a citizen in the early modern period it was surely first as a member of this
Christian commonwealth. Biographies of ordinary Spaniards can be reconstructed,
particularly from the diocesan archives which record movements from childhood—
changes of neighbourhood, the hunt for work—in the effort to counter bigamy
among the very mobile population of Spain. The system was only set in place
gradually. One of its preconditions was the catholicisation of this frontier society—
the forced conversion or expulsion of the large Jewish population in 1492, of the
Moors in 1502–25 and the eventual expulsion of the latter in 1609–14. Spain,
down to 1609, presents a unique opportunity for a study of the life-cycle of those
nominal converts to Christianity, the Moriscos. But it is not until the later seventeenth
century, some time after the Moorish expulsion, that parochial and diocesan registers
become full enough to permit any very detailed demographic work.
21
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
From the Castilian fiscal censuses, supplemented by those of the Crown of
Aragon at neighbouring dates, and using a multiplier of four persons per household
(now favoured instead of older and higher ratios), historians now estimate the
population of Spain as follows:4
1534 4,698,000 persons
1591 6,632,000
1787 10,138,000
More work clearly needs to be done on Spanish demography in the seventeenth
century. This period of decline has generally been the orphan of historians, its
censuses less studied because they seem to lack the rigour of those of the sixteenth
and eighteenth centuries. We have to rely at present on regional estimates. Thus,
there would have been some 5,240,888 persons in the Spanish heartland, the kingdom
of Castile in 1591, and only 4,520,782 in 1631. This sharp downswing in population
during the years in which Spain was losing her hegemony as a world power seems
to be characteristic of much of the rest of the peninsula as well, and will have to
be explained from a variety of perspectives in succeeding chapters. By 1712–17,
when the first general count of the Spanish population as a whole was made by
the new Bourbon dynasty, the population had probably recovered to its old peak
of 1591, in spite of the disasters of the War of the Spanish Succession; but the
figures are regarded as uncertain.
The initial expansion of population, visible during the sixteenth century, was
probably a continuation of a movement already under way since the later Middle
Ages, and was no doubt fostered by the internal peace and economic expansion
which followed the unification of the country under the Catholic Kings. But growth
seems to have slackened rather early on in Spain’s career as an imperial power. The
parish registers of Old Castile already record a stagnation of births by about 1570,
with a real decline setting in around 1590, particularly in urban areas.5
 To the south,
in the emptier lands of New Castile and Murcia, a continuing process of colonisation
staved off the fall of baptisms until about 1620. But the middle decades of the
seventeenth century witnessed a crisis of natality which seems to have been pretty
general throughout the peninsula. The worst-affected areas were probably Old Castile,
where population levels were cut by 30 to 40 per cent, and Valencia, where numbers
of people by 1646 had fallen to the level of a century before.
Recovery set in during the later seventeenth century, as Spain gradually abandoned
what may be regarded as its over-reach for world supremacy. The coastal periphery,
Andalusia, Valencia, Catalonia, recovered earliest. In Castile the curve of baptisms
generally did not get back to its old height until well into the eighteenth century.
It was not until 1787 that Old Castile, León and Extremadura had recovered the
manpower of 1591. And even then it figures in the pages of Antonio Ponz as
littered with museum towns and abandoned villages. In the more communicable,
maritime parts of Spain population expanded fast in the eighteenth century: by as
22
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
much as 1 per cent per year in Valencia, and by only a little less in Catalonia. But
the expansion, in a still essentially agrarian society, was fragile. Droughts and
bad harvests after 1762 led to soaring mortality, particularly on the inland meseta
of Castile.
In 1591 three-quarters of the Spanish population lived on this central tableland.
It had emerged from medieval times, to judge by its profile in 1534, with a heavy
concentration of settlement along the milder Atlantic façade, along that famous
‘route of silver’ which had led, since Roman times, up from Seville through Mérida
towards the headquarters of the ‘legion’, León. To the east, a hotly disputed frontier
between Moors and Christians, from Granada up through La Mancha, had kept
population to under ten inhabitants per square kilometre. Between 1534 and 1591
there was a filling-up of some of this empty quarter. The average density of Castile
and Andalusia rose from 10.70 to 15.85 inhabitants per square kilometre.6
 These
figures, however, require to be broken down further by region. Old Castile and
Andalusia had between 20 and 30 inhabitants per square kilometre in 1591, as
against a figure of under 15 for New Castile, and one of under 8 for the kingdom
of Granada, weakened by a recent, bitter civil war and the expulsion of its Moorish
people. Whatever the explanation, this was well below the averages for France
(34) or Italy (44) at the time, and may explain some of the acerbic comments to be
found in the pages of the Venetian ambassadors or of Giovanni Botero. Catalonia,
which is now one of the most densely populated parts of Spain, emerges from its
census of 1553 with only 10.6 inhabitants per square kilometre, well below the
figure for the bleak tableland of Old Castile, which at the time was the political
and, thanks to its woollen industry, the economic heart of Spain. Equally the
fertile and now densely populated Valencian region had only 13 inhabitants per
square kilometre in 1565 (but this is a crude average of the harsh sierras and the
prosperous coastal plain, which had between 20 and 50).
By 1787 Spain as a whole had achieved an average density of 20.58 inhabitants,
as compared with around 50 in France at the time.7
 At the present day the agrarian
heartland of Old Castile and León has still about 27 inhabitants per square kilometre
as it had in its sixteenth-century heyday. May one see this as a kind of upper limit
for agrarian economies? Average densities in the agricultural regions of Western
Europe at the present time are between 25 and 50—as they were in the more favoured
parts of the Continent, like France and Italy, in pre-industrial times. What seems
to have characterised early modern Spain was a gradual filling-up of a frontier
zone, a rise from around 10 inhabitants per square kilometre in 1500 to double
that figure by 1800. In the process the old agrarian heartland of the peninsula was
by-passed, as trade and population developed especially on the coastal plains and
near the only good communications which Spain had: the sea routes.
Early modern Spain created for the traveller the impression of emptiness. The
villagers of Bienservida in New Castile told the king’s commissioners in 1575
about their sierras full of ‘wild animals like the boar, venison, the doe, mountain
goats, hares, rabbits and partridges’, while, on the edge of the Sierra Morena, La
23
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
Calzada mentioned also the wolf, ‘and some bears have been seen in the district’.
The grouping of settlements in many parts of the peninsula reinforced the sense
of desolation. Joly, travelling in 1603 on the highway which led south-west from
Zaragoza towards Madrid, commented: ‘The landscape is all so dry that it is almost
completely uninhabited, with the settlements grouped near water.’8
 All the greater
was the contrast with the oases of cultivation—the coastal plain of Valencia, or the
foothills of the Pyrenees from the Basque Country to Catalonia. In 1685 the Jesuit
Marcillo commented that the dispersed settlement in well-watered Catalonia meant
that ‘the whole province looks like one continuous city’.9
The country had emerged in 1492 from a long internal war between Christian
and Moor, and the process of recolonisation was to continue for some time after
that. The first wave of the Reconquest had given the Christians control of the
lands north of the Tagus (capture of Toledo 1085) and Ebro (Tortosa 1148). Though
most of the Castilian Muslims seem to have fled south, those of Aragon often
surrendered on terms which allowed them to hold on to their land, and down to
the early seventeenth century their settlements, on the right bank of the Ebro,
comprised about a fifth of the population of the kingdom of Aragon. The crusading
warfare reached its peak of intensity in the twelfth and thirteenth centuries, with
the gradual Christian advance into New Castile and Andalusia (capture of Seville
1248), and by the Aragonese and Catalans into Valencia (1238). As before, those
Muslim communities which surrendered were allowed to keep their land, outside
the strategic centres. Western Andalusia was quickly emptied of its Muslims, who
fell back on the still-independent kingdom of Granada; but their Valencian brothers
held their ground, still constituting a third of the population of that kingdom by
the time of the definitive expulsion in 1609. The last crusade, the war for the
taking of Granada, lasted between 1480 and 1492, and followed the traditional
pattern of sieges and negotiations, which left most of the Muslim population in
place though under Christian rule. The gradual process of erosion of native rights
also followed: the encroachment of settlers, against whom a population without
written title-deeds was ill-protected, and the new pressure of the Counter-Reformation
church and state, which led to rebellions and persecution, and the eventual expulsion
of all the Moriscos from Spain in 1609–14. There were approximately 319,000 of
them at the time, a small percentage of the overall population; but their removal
from Valencia, and earlier in 1570 from Granada, created much dislocation in
those territories.10 In the long, slow recolonisation which followed, the dispersed
hamlets characteristic of the Moors, possibly reflecting original tribal settlement,
were regrouped into bigger villages.
Though imperial Spain managed to export warfare abroad for most of the time,
the demographic costs of imperialism were high. There were, first, the internal
frontiers opened up by rebellions against billeting, conscription or taxation, which
acquired particular resonance in the struggles for independence of Catalonia 1640–
52 and Portugal 1640–68. And the War of the Spanish Succession 1700–13 took
the form of a major civil war between Castile and the Crown of Aragon.
24
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
But it was the continuing burden of providing manpower for the upkeep of
empire which represented the really significant drain on the country’s resources.
The army of Flanders held about 70,000 men at full strength during the monarchy’s
long struggle to maintain its hegemony in northern Europe between 1567 and
1648.11 Of these about a tenth were Spaniards, drafted in from the peninsula via
Italy, and the rest were mostly Italian, German or Flemish mercenaries. The
overall size of the imperial forces—including the Atlantic and Mediterranean fleets,
as well as garrisons in Italy and the Caribbean—is hard to estimate exactly, but
may not be far off the 140,000 men which Olivares calculated for the Union of
Arms in 1625.
Initially the army had relied on volunteers. Philip II was looking for about
9,000 men a year in the later sixteenth century, Philip IV for 12,000, at the peak
of conflict between 1635 and 1659.12 The Venetian ambassador Donà had remarked
in 1573, when the peninsular population was buoyant, that ‘they can find between
9,000 and 10,000 infantry to serve outside Spain with ease, but they would have
some difficulty in getting any more than that’.13 Philip IV and Olivares were reduced,
in fact, to a form of conscription to raise the large contingents they needed.
But conscription was really only systematised under the Bourbons. They needed
quite large forces at times, particularly in the War of the Spanish Succession and
in the campaigns of Philip V (1700–46) to establish his children on Italian thrones.
At the same time the stripping away of the European possessions of the Spanish
Crown (especially at the Treaty of Utrecht 1713) made it less easy to recruit foreign
mercenaries. Nominally the Bourbons still reckoned on fielding 70,000–80,000
men—a total somewhat, but not drastically inferior to the old imperial army of the
Habsburgs. To find these, the quintas were introduced in 1702–4, conscripting one
out of five young men by a process of lottery. In 1770 the regulations were tightened
up, and it was specified that from lists of unmarried men, 17 to 35 years of age,
soldiers would be drawn to serve eight years at a time. Skilled workers, professional
people and nobles were exempt. There were riots in Catalonia against the new
system in 1773, and it proved unworkable in Castile too. Quotas of men were
assigned instead to local communities, as they had been on and off since the days
of Olivares, leaving them free to decide how to raise the contingents, whether by
conscription or offering bounties to volunteers.14 The peace-time strength of the
army seems to have been only about half its nominal tally of 70,000–80,000 men.
Half of these were volunteers, often still foreign mercenaries. Many of the rest
were ‘vagrants’, sentenced to the colours by the courts as part of the moral policing
so typical of governments in the Age of the Enlightenment.
Of the young men who left Spain for the wars of the Habsburgs, the Valencian
writer Escolano and his Italian contemporary Botero concurred for once that barely
one in ten would ever return. Whether the loss to the economy was significant
was a question posed by some, who regarded the exiles as the dregs of the community.
Certainly the army was a real presence in the minds and calculations of young
Spaniards of the early modern period. The Valencian chronicler Porcar (1560–
25
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
1628) refers several times to his page-boy, Pere Pau Lauro, who could not settle
down either to study or to follow his father’s trade as a tailor, but who took
himself off to the wars several times, only to slink home after a few days or weeks.
Porcar observed the increasing difficulties which the captains were having in finding
volunteers, and he recorded the first whipping of deserters— two sixteen-yearolds—in 1626.15 The experience of war had social consequences which went beyond
the immediate loss of manpower. Cervantes records its potentially disturbing effects
on the local community in his account of one young man, who had left his village
at twelve and returned at twenty-four years of age, ‘dressed as a trooper, ablaze
with colour’, and who ran off with one of the girls. One of the villagers recalled:
‘we would be standing there with our mouths agape, as he told us of all the adventures
he had had’.16
The Venetian ambassador Navagero did not think that the Christian settlers
would put down roots in Granada: ‘They go off with a greater will to the wars
or to the Indies,’ he wrote in 1525. It was, perhaps, unfortunate that vast new
frontiers should have opened for Spain, in Africa, in northern Europe and Italy,
but, above all, in America just at the time when Iberia itself was settling down
to a long internal peace. The chronicler Fernández de Oviedo gives a vivid picture
of the colonisation fever which gripped peasants and artisans round Seville in
1513 as Pedrarias Dávila prepared his expedition for Darien: ‘there were many
who sold the lands and belongings they held from their fathers. Others, less
crazy, mortgaged them for a few years, leaving a certain income for one that
was less so; while others walked out on their masters, forfeiting their wages.’
During Las Casas’s recruiting campaign of 1518 the justices and preachers were
told to extol the bounty of the Caribbean islands of Hispaniola, San Juan, Cuba
and Jamaica. The needy of Castile, ‘who live poorly and pay high rents’, would
come into their own out there.17
We cannot know exactly how many people left for the Indies. The Spanish
government tried to keep a check on the morals and religion of the fortune-seekers,
and its records in the House of Trade in Seville are a monument to the early
development of the bureaucratic state. But the task was beyond the resources of
the period. The official licences to emigrate, fascinating documents in their own
right, average 400 a year when it seems that more than ten times that number of
people were sailing with the fleets. The best recent calculations are for 5,274 emigrants
a year between 1561 and 1600, falling to 3,869 in the years when the Spanish
population was reaching its nadir, 1626–50.18 If we said that there was an average
of 4,000 persons leaving Spain a year to make their home in America over the
early modern period as a whole we should not be too far wrong. Given that most
of the emigrants were young men, and that there can only have been about 200,000
males in their late teens and early twenties when Spain’s population was at its
peak in 1591, the drain must have been quite considerable. Emigration tended to
proceed by fits and starts, in the kinds of recruiting campaigns of 1513 and 1518
which we mentioned above. It was difficult for the poor to make the trip to the
26
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
Indies on their own, since the voyage cost some 30 or 40 ducats, a year’s wages
(or near enough) of a wage labourer around 1600.19 Nearly two-thirds of a sample
of emigrants studied between 1493 and 1559 came from the old ‘silver route’,
stretching up from Seville through Extremadura towards León and Old Castile.
Long-established movements of population had built up, no doubt, the traditions
and contacts which facilitated emigration from there.
The consequences of this emigration for Spain are hard to estimate exactly.
Countering Botero, the Valencian chronicler Escolano in 1610 suggested that the
Indies generally appealed to ‘turbulent persons without resources, who are attracted
by the smell of gold; and we are well rid of them, like an evil humour from the
body’. And he pointed to the ‘flocks of French’ coming into the peninsula to take
their place, ‘leaving the rigours of their own land for the profound peace and
Christian devotion which they know Spain enjoys’. These words were written by
a man whose impressions of France were formed by the long nightmare of the
Wars of Religion. But the story of French migration across the Pyrenees goes
back further—to the thirteenth century when the shepherds of Montaillou brought
their flocks down to pasture on the southern slopes, and beyond that to the great
pilgrimages starting in Paris or Vézelay towards the shrine of Santiago de Compostela.
And it was carried forward in the sixteenth century by the influx of American
silver into Spain, which meant, as Barthélemy Joly pointed out in 1603, that a
labourer could earn twice what he was getting in France.
Joly found all the servants to be French in the great Catalan convent of Santes
Creus, as were most of the bakers and craftsmen at the important shrine of Montserrat.
This immigration was at its height in the years between 1540 and 1620 when the
Barcelona hospital of the Holy Cross regularly recorded a third of its sick poor as
coming from beyond the Pyrenees. Joly was told by his countrymen about their
motives for leaving home: taxes (at least in the autonomous kingdom of Catalonia)
were lower and life, in general, was better for the common man than in France,
‘where the peasant is harshly treated’.20 The migrants had come mostly from, the
Massif Central. Rather like the Spanish outflow to the Indies, parties of young
peasants were rounded up by entrepreneurs and guided south. The journeys seem
to have begun in late spring or early summer, and to have continued even in time
of war between Spain and France.21 Most probably intended to return home after
they had made their fortune; a few of those whom death surprised in Granada
were in possession of the silver reals which would enable them to move away
quickly. But others invested for the future in their adopted environment. Between
10 and 16 per cent of marriages in selected Catalan parishes between 1576 and
1625 involved a bridegroom from north of the Pyrenees.
Ten years’ residence and marriage to a Spanish girl conferred citizenship—at
least, once cities (like Valencia from the later sixteenth century) ceased to maintain
full citizen registers of their own. In fact, it was increasingly the monarchy which
began, in the seventeenth century, to arrogate this power to itself. From 1635
there began a newer, harsher kind of warfare between Spain and France, which
27
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
did not quite seal the frontier but made life increasingly difficult for outsiders.
From 1637 the traditional reprisals against an enemy were raised to a new level of
bureaucratic efficiency, with a more systematic registration of French nationals
and their belongings. Those who had not been resident for ten years or married
to a Spaniard were subjected to a tax which seems to have been arbitrary, designed
to favour those who were useful to the government and perhaps to encourage
others to leave. The Council of Aragon was informed in 1637 that ‘more than
8,000 French have gone away, men who were employed in ploughing and other
servile occupations’. Though some of the local authorities, like the Valencians,
deplored this further blow to population, the outsider could no longer feel so
comfortable in the new age of the proto-nation state. Overall the number of French
in Spain was calculated at 200,000 by the French ambassador in 1626, falling to
around 80,000 in the report of his successor towards the end of the century, at
which level it remained in the estimates made for the French Directory in the
1790s.22
One of the intriguing features of the mobile, frontier society of early modern
Spain was a fairly young age at marriage. Many of the samples from the parish
registers of the late sixteenth and seventeenth centuries suggest that men, and
particularly women, were marrying rather earlier than their counterparts north
of the Pyrenees—women at around twenty years of age in Valladolid, at twentyone or twenty-two in Cuenca, at twenty to twenty-two in villages which have
been studied in the kingdom of Valencia.23 One might have expected the economic
difficulties of the seventeenth century to have modified the pattern in some areas—
at least in regions of falling population like Castile. The city of Toledo complained
around 1620 that in the old days ‘a journeyman or peasant would marry his
daughter to a youth who had no money so long as he had a calling’, but the
decline of manufactures over the last decade had meant ‘that there are not now
the tenth part of the marriages and baptisms there used to be’.24 In the provincial
capital of Cuenca, where economic opportunity was drastically reduced over
the early modern period by the destruction of the woollen manufacture, the age
at first marriage of women did tend to creep up, but only slightly: to 22.6 years
by the later eighteenth century.
Our first complete picture of the Spanish marriage system comes in the census
of Floridablanca (1787). Just over a quarter (27.56 per cent) of women were then
married under the age of twenty-five, the watershed from which peasant marriage
became frequent in the rest of Western Europe. The figures are somewhat hard to
interpret since they suggest a great contrast between average age of women at
first marriage of twenty-two or twenty-three years in the south and east— Andalusia,
Valencia, New Castile—and twenty-four or twenty-five in the north and west—Old
Castile, the Basque Country, Asturias. In Galicia, one of the better-studied areas,
the age had been rising over the eighteenth century from twenty-four to about
twenty-seven.25 To complete the picture one may note that celibacy rates—calculated
as women over fifty who had never been married at all—were 10.19 per cent of the
28
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
Spanish female population as a whole in 1787. But the proportions vary from as
little as 6.89 per cent in fertile and prosperous Valencia to as much as 15 or 20 per
cent in poor, overcrowded Galicia.
It is tempting to see a correlation between these marriage patterns and economic
opportunity. But clearly the correspondence is not always exact. Francisco Benlloch,
whose description of the Valencian settlement of Llombai in 1756 is a classic of
writing on the peasantry, noted that there were no jobs in the village other than in
agriculture and little emigration; yet after the father’s death his children divided
up the inadequate holding, ‘to their own impoverishment, which will lead to debt
and eventually to misery’. As we have noted, the Valencian region at this time
was one of near universal and early marriage. In Asturias, which did have a rather
late age at marriage, Jovellanos deplored the excessive subdivision of land which
was still going on among the peasantry in 1782: ‘I have seen a farm which not
many years before was intended for a single peasant split among five.’26
Quite a lot of research is now being done on the social and economic context
of peasant marriage, which involves attention to household structure and inheritance.
In medieval Spain, as one might expect in a frontier society, great emphasis
was placed on facilitating population. The custom was that of equal inheritance
by all the children, male and female, and marriage seems to have been a partnership
between the man and the woman. Thus, though the early laws of Castile limited
the amount which a bridegroom could give his wife—the bridewealth or arras—
to one-tenth of his own estate, in practice land, cattle and clothes were often
assigned to the bride amounting to half the property. Customs were similar in
the Crown of Aragon; thus, in thirteenth-century Valencia the system of germanía
(brotherhood, or partnership) meant that a widow would often expect to take
half her husband’s estate.27
As the frontier closed, older laws began to be resurrected, designed to safeguard
the integrity of the peasant holding. The dowry began to take on greater importance—
the transfer of property from the girl’s parents—and this led to a clearer separation
between the belongings of the husband and wife. By the fifteenth century in Valencia
the peasant widow could no longer take half the holding, but must content herself
with the return of her dowry, in addition to the jointure or creix (usually one half
the dowry) which had been promised her in the original marriage contract.28 The
arrangements certainly left widows with much property. In Castile, by this time,
the general rule was that the widow should take back her dowry, together with
the arras promised by her husband, in addition to one half the acquisitions (gananciales)
made jointly. These were generally estimated at half the remainder of the estate,
since comparatively few husbands entered marriage with an inventory of their
own possessions (capital).
It was a characteristic of Spanish, and particularly Castilian, law and custom
to favour women. The Castilian tradition had been that girls inherited equally
with boys. Even in the Crown of Aragon, where Roman law and patria potestas had
more sway, the medieval system favoured division of at least part of the patrimony.
29
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
The characteristic feature of the closure of the frontier, and of the consequent
concern with protecting the patrimony, was to limit the legítima, the legal minimum
of the estate which each child must receive at the death of his or her parent. Thus
in the kingdom of Valencia the thirteenth-century laws had required a parent to
divide at least a third and up to a half of his holding in this way; but fourteenthand fifteenth-century legislation reduced this to just five shillings to each child. In
Catalonia the Cortes of 1585 reduced the legítima to one-fourth of the patrimony.
Even in Castile, long home to an egalitarian tradition, the major legislation of
Toro (1505) revived Visigothic law which permitted a father or mother to leave
one child an increment (mejora) of one-third of the estate. Finally, laws of 1530,
1574 and 1623 tried—not very successfully—to limit the dowries given to daughters
on their marriage to at most five years’ income of the parent. All of these measures
reflect a closing of the frontier—a concern with protecting the family estate against
fragmentation, without, however, endangering the marriages of the next generation.
Along the Pyrenees, from the Basque Country through Aragon to Catalonia
the tradition tended to favour a single heir. One can still admire in the solid farmhouses, of mountain stone, the visible link with a fifteenth- and sixteenth-century
past. Sometimes the same family is still in possession, with charters going back to
that period, and with a burial site within the village church which cements it to its
ancestors. This has been the most Catholic part of Spain down to modern times,
its religion anchored in a solid material culture. In spite of the concern for keeping
the farm together, however, and a fairly marked tendency to place younger children
in the ranks of the celibate clergy, Catalonia had a robust demography. There was
a relatively young age at first marriage here in the seventeenth century —twentytwo or twenty-three years for women—while in 1787 nearly a third of Catalan
women were married by the age of twenty-five as compared with just over a quarter
in Spain as a whole.29
Much depended here on arrangements for the transmission of accommodation
and property to the younger generation. At his marriage the Catalan heir was
expected to bring his bride into the parental home, where his father and mother,
unmarried brothers and sisters might still be living. Just over a fifth of households
in early eighteenth-century Girona seem to have been ‘multiple’ (consisting of
two or more married couples); but the proportion fell to under 10 per cent during
the rest of the century. It is still not clear, in fact, just how common the extended
household was in Spain as a whole. Studies being conducted in Valencia, where
the Pyrenean single heir did not exist, suggest that married children might often
enough live with their parents for a time.30 The pattern was probably common
among substantial farmers, who required additional labour. Certainly in a sample
of six parishes of the city of Granada in 1752 a good quarter of propertied households—
artisans and peasants as well as the bourgeoisie—would have kin of some kind
living with them. And, though nuclear families and division of inheritance were
clearly the norm, cooperation among families could counter the effects of fragmentation.
The censuses require to be studied in depth. Thus in the Granadan village of
30
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
Orgiva in 1750 the eighteen-year-old María Torralva, ‘a maiden and a pauper’,
living alone with her fifteen-year-old brother Josef, turns out on inspection to be
related to another María Torralva, some distance away, a 58-year-old peasant woman
who had reared the younger María ‘from a very tender age’.
One of the areas where the multiple family household may have been most
common was Galicia. The law of inheritance there was that of Castile, specifying
equal division of the holding, but a high celibacy rate (as we noted above),
delayed marriage and frequent emigration led, in practice, to a system reminiscent
of rural Ireland in more modern times where one child, often the youngest,
assumed de facto headship of the home while the elder siblings left to make
their careers abroad. In the eighteenth-century Tierra de Montes, for example,
9.6 per cent of households contained two or more married couples, and another
15.8 per cent incorporated one or more dependent relatives.31 The Galician families
were large, the land already densely populated; the province lived by exporting
its surplus manpower, and restricting the succession to the family farm, in practice
if not in law. With a population of 1,400,000 eighteenth-century Galicia sent
out every year 25,000–30,000 of its young men—and women—to harvest the wheat
in Castile and Portugal. Bands would set out in April or May, walking for between
a fortnight and three weeks to reach the grainlands of the south, before returning
home with their earnings in the autumn.32 The end of the wheat harvest in Castile
coincided with the feast of Saint James of Compostela (25 July), and the Galician
diaspora helped to keep alive devotion to their regional saint, who became the
patron of all Spain.
Many of the migrants, in fact, never returned to Galicia: one can find them
(like the French) surprised by death along the way, having worked for several
years among the widespread little Galician communities of the towns of southern
Spain. The Spanish countryside, in general, lived in symbiosis with its towns.
Studies of the parish registers of places like Cordoba, Cartagena, Medina del Campo
suggest that nearly a third of those marrying in the early modern period had
come in from outside; in the case of Madrid the proportion was double that. In
one parish of Medina del Campo, then the centre of the great Castilian fairs, over
a quarter of the men listed in one census of 1570 subsequently left town. In the
regional market town of Cuenca, according to the invaluable mid-nineteenth-century
record, the turnover of population was of the order of 10 per cent coming in and
10 per cent going out every year.33 But immigrants to Cuenca, though they might
ease the pressure on the resources of their families back in the countryside of
New Castile, had to wait slightly longer before marrying—twenty-four years of
age for women, as against twenty-three for their rural cousins in the early modern
period. In the city of Valencia, according to the census of 1787, many might never
marry at all: 18.10 per cent of women over fifty had never been married, as against
only 6.89 per cent in the kingdom of Valencia as a whole.
Marriage was geared to economic opportunity: ‘mankind grows and declines
in proportion to the supply of food,’ wrote Cavanilles in 1795. But the overall
31
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
reproduction of the Spanish population depended as well on the fertility of these
marriages. In Cuenca between 1680 and 1729 a woman, marrying on average at
twenty-three years of age, would produce 6.2 offspring if she was still living with
her husband at the end of the fertile period—a somewhat lower ratio than that
found by Goubert in his classic study of the Beauvaisis. Given that most marriages
were interrupted before the end of the wife’s fertile period, the actual number of
births per couple was always considerably smaller anyway—5 or 6 in the parishes
studied in the kingdom of Valencia in the seventeenth century, and 5.25 in Galicia,
but falling to just over 4 as marriage was retarded there in the eighteenth century.34
One assumes that in many parts of seventeenth-century Spain, with population
falling but the age at marriage still relatively young, the ratio of children to married
couples must have been low.
There are several factors to be borne in mind in this connection. In the first
place many women must have been marrying widowers, given the high mortality
of the seventeenth century which we shall explore in a moment; and secondly
lack of economic opportunity must have led to many births outside marriage. In
the rural areas, it is true, illegitimacy was not particularly high: between 1 and
3.5 per cent of births in Catalonia, around or under (sometimes well under) 1 per
cent in the Valencian parishes of the seventeenth century. In Galicia, with high
celibacy and delayed marriage, illegitimacy rates reached 5 per cent in the eighteenth
century, which may be a maximum for rural Spain under the old regime. But in
the towns the numbers of foundlings grew in the bleak seventeenth century—from
around 4 to around 8 per cent of births in Seville, with a similar proportion in
Madrid.35 Some of these foundlings were not illegitimate children, and many were
brought in from the surrounding countryside as more foundling hospitals were
set up in the bigger towns during the sixteenth century. Nevertheless it is significant
that around 10 per cent of baptisms in seventeenth- and eighteenth-century Granada,
and as many as 15 per cent in Madrid, were the products of unknown parents
(counting both foundlings and those formally declared to be illegitimate). Such
figures presented a considerable challenge to the society of the time. As the economist
Sancho de Moncada wrote in 1619, it was not sufficient just to breed more children
in order to restore the population of Spain, and he pointed to North Africa where
early marriages and numerous offspring had failed to arrest depopulation. The
main thing was ‘a well-ordered commonwealth’, where children were properly
reared and found jobs in order that they themselves should found stable families.36
Writers of this time, in fact, pointed to the broken homes of Castile, where the
father was forced to take to the roads, or emigrate, abandoning his family.
Mortality among foundlings was, as in the rest of Europe, exceptionally high.
But even ordinary infant mortality gave no cause for satisfaction. Between 40 and
50 per cent of those born in the Valencian parishes studied in the seventeenth and
eighteenth centuries would not survive until adulthood. The situation in eighteenthcentury Galicia was a little better: three out of five babies would live to become
adults, which may explain some of the demographic pressure experienced by that
32
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
province. The critical period was the first year of life when between a fifth and a
third of the newborn might expect to die. But the sheer hardship of life meant
that expectation of life at the higher ages was not very good either. The economist
Caxa de Leruela wrote in 1631 of ‘so many countrymen who…by the time they
reach 45 or 50 years of age…are aged and broken by the work of ploughing’.37 In
the census of 1787 just over a quarter of the population was aged forty or above,
including 14.5 per cent who had survived their fiftieth birthday. In common with
the rest of pre-industrial Europe, Spain was predominantly a country of young
people: nearly three-quarters of its inhabitants younger than forty, 35.9 per cent
younger than sixteen. In conjunction with the considerable number of foundlings
in the cities, and the widows and remarried widowers everywhere, this plethora
of the young created problems of care. From the studies made of early modern
Cuenca, seventeenth-century Granada and selected parishes of Old Castile it would
seem that one marriage in five involved a widow or widower. Broken homes no
doubt led to the cases of child abandonment to be met with in the records—of the
ten-year-old Bernardo Moreno from Galicia, who had come south to Cordoba
‘with some men from his homeland’ and been taken in by a local farmer, or of the
Portuguese Francisco Rodríguez who had found his way to Montilla ‘when he
was just a child and not capable of reasoning’, and who sought to marry in 1640
Antonia María, a waif from Cordoba, who had been taken in by a tailor who had
found her ‘wandering the streets lost’, when she was only six. These cases come
from the registers of the bishop of Cordoba, who, like his colleagues, was supposed
to keep a check on the movement of those marrying outside the parish in which
they were born.
We have to imagine a landscape dotted with small communities—25,000 of
them in the peninsula as a whole, ‘including Navarre and Portugal’, according to
the chronicler Escolano in 1610. There were two great cities—the imperial capital
Madrid and its commercial counterpart Seville, which at their peak in the early
seventeenth century reached around 130,000–150,000 inhabitants each. Below
them came a scattering of regional capitals—Valencia, Granada, Toledo, Valladolid,
Barcelona—with at most 50,000 (a kind of upper limit, perhaps, for a pre-industrial
administrative and market centre in the Europe of that time). Below these came
the market towns, with between 5,000 and 20,000 people—the centre of the Old
Castilian fairs, Medina del Campo, would have had just under 15,000 at its peak,
and the main port for the export of wool to Italy, Alicante, had 5,000 at most
under the Habsburgs.
Concentrations of population in pre-industrial Europe inevitably posed exceptional
problems of hygiene. An adequate supply of clean drinking water could not be
taken for granted. German and Italian engineers were called upon in 1526 and
1569 to try to pump the waters of the Tagus uphill to the houses of Toledo, without
damaging the eight mills and the eight sluice gates (for irrigation) which lay in
the vicinity. But down to the early nineteenth century, when George Borrow visited
the town, the water from the Tagus was regarded as unsafe for drinking, and the
33
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
inhabitants preferred to collect rainwater in cisterns of their own. River supply
was generally safer, though, than that from wells. Seepage from sewage and parish
cemeteries contaminated the wells in Seville. And in Valencia the diarist Porcar
tells us that he took advantage of the drought of the winter of 1626–7 to have his
well scraped, for the second time in four years.38
Great technological skill had to be employed to circumvent these obstacles.
Seville relied partly on water brought fifteen miles from Alcalá de Guadaira along
an aqueduct built by the Muslims, and on that from Carmona, twenty miles away,
running along another Roman aqueduct. A network of underground pipes, made
of lead, carried the water to the fountains which stood in every little square and
directly to a few of the chief households. Even small towns showed considerable
ingenuity: Xàtiva, with about 8,000 inhabitants, had by the middle of the sixteenth
century a new aqueduct to add to the old one, both bringing water from a league
or so away. At least a quarter of the houses had their own piped supply.39
Disposal of sewage was perhaps more of a problem. Valencia had a network of
underground sewers inherited from the Romans or Arabs. On Sundays, when the
irrigation of the fields outside town was stopped, the full force of the river was
allowed to run through them. At periodic intervals—1614, 1621, 1625—the diarist
Porcar records the opening up of his street to get at the sewers for cleaning. The
municipal authorities organised the operation, but local householders paid the
bill.40 In the cities of the central tableland, either because of scarcity of water or,
more probably, because of a lack of importance in Roman and Arab times, the
disposal of waste was less well organised. The papal envoy Borghese complained
in 1594 of the ‘insufferable stench’ in the streets of Madrid, where urinals had to
be emptied directly into the streets; and Joly remarked on a similar phenomenon
in Valladolid. It was only in the later eighteenth century that a network of sewers
was laid in Madrid.
All towns tended to use the streets as convenient dumping grounds for household
rubbish. Despite the sewers, Valencia was not a noticeably clean town, at least in
late spring when the silk grubs were removed from the cocoons and thrown out.
Since the streets were mostly unpaved, this and other waste was gradually broken
down, until the peasants from the surrounding fields came in to scrape it all up
for manure. But the jurats (municipal magistrates) had to forbid them in 1615 to
use spades or other tools of iron in the process, since they carted off too much of
the street itself.
The lack of paving turned the streets into mudbaths when the rains fell in
autumn and spring, and the first victim was the great religious processions, as the
good priest Porcar was careful to note in his diary. Some of the Valencian and the
most frequented Sevillian thoroughfares were given a covering of brick or rubble
by the early sixteenth century. The Catholic Kings ordered Toledo to be paved in
1502, at the cost of the householders. But travellers tended to comment on the
dank, labyrinthine aspect of many Spanish towns, with their twisted streets. The
jurats of Valencia complained in 1393 that their city had been built by the Moors,
34
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
‘after their fashion, narrow and cramped’. Despite their efforts at town-planning,
and the laying out of avenues like the Alameda in Seville (1574), or the straightening
of streets in Valladolid after the great fire of 1561, Antonio Ponz still found the
cities of Spain often in conflict with classical standards of beauty at the end of the
old regime.
More of a danger to public health was the existence of cemeteries within the
built-up area. The middle classes were regularly buried in the body of their local
parish church, the less well-off in a yard outside. In the churchyard the corpses
were given only a light covering of earth, pending the decomposition of the flesh
and the transfer of the bones elsewhere. In sixteenth-century Seville there were
complaints of ‘dogs often disinterring the bodies and eating at them’, and of the
dumping of rubbish nearby.41 Regularly there would be scrapes of the churchyard
to remove the bones. Porcar recorded several during his stay as priest in San
Martín (Valencia), in 1596, 1615, 1620 and 1628. A dirty operation, it was carried
out at night, in winter. In 1787, in answer to increasing concern with public health,
Charles III forbade burial in cities, except for those with private chapels. A new
cemetery was built outside the walls of Madrid in 1809, but it seems only to have
been in regular use from the mid-nineteenth century.
One of the major inconveniences of the Spanish habitat was generally agreed
to be the lack of wood in the peninsula—of firewood for boiling water and cooking,
of timber for building. In 1786 Antonio Ponz launched a sweeping condemnation:
‘The houses of the poor are wretched in the extreme because of the dearth of
timber…Basic furniture, like chairs and tables, are scarce and meanly fashioned.’
Almodóvar del Campo told the king’s commissioners in 1575 that it had to bring
its timber all the way across La Mancha, from the sierras of Cuenca and Alcaraz,
‘and the cost means that there are few good houses or buildings here’. The peasant
houses which Jovellanos met with in 1782 on his way from Madrid north to Asturias
were made of sun-dried bricks, or of tapia, blocks of clay and pebbles three foot
square. Houses like this ‘can be easily run up, but just as easily fall to pieces with
the action of the sun and rain’. It would be better to bake proper bricks in a kiln—
‘if there was any (firewood) to bake them with’.42
‘The whole house is a single round room,’ wrote the magistrate Eugenio de
Salazar of one Asturian village he visited in 1560, ‘and the humans share it with
the pigs and cattle.’ Most peasant houses used their upper storey, if they had one,
as a store. The Jesuit missionary Pedro de León was accommodated in this kind
of loft by the villagers of Extremadura in 1592, so low that he had to squat, and
damp. He could see the sky through the rushes which constituted the roof, and
‘counted the stars’ as he dropped off to sleep.43 In La Mancha more villages seem
to have had tile than thatched roofs, to judge by the Relaciones of 1575; and in
the neighbouring kingdom of Valencia the peasants were adamant that they could
not live in the thatched houses which the recently expelled Moors (1609) had
inhabited. Some indications from the province of Cordoba, bordering on Extremadura,
would tend to suggest that thatch was commoner as one moved west.
35
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
In the cities artisan dwellings were like ‘cages for birds’, according to one observer
of Toledo in 1576. They were narrow, with only a step ladder to the first floor.
Joly found their counterparts in Valencia to consist of a living room downstairs,
‘lit only by the light from the front door’, leading out to a yard at the back with its
well providing water for cooking or washing, and up to a single bedroom on the
first floor. The houses of the upper classes were spacious but scarcely comfortable
in a modern sense. Joly commented on the absence of privacy, the fact that the
rooms led directly one into another, and that the bedrooms were mere ‘alcoves’ —
a word borrowed from the Spanish term alcoba.
44 Lack of glass for windows—oiled
canvas was used in winter very often, and lattice screens in summer —possibly
explains the long, blank walls of streets in Cordoba or Toledo down to the nineteenth
century. Houses turned in on themselves, in the Roman and Arab fashion, round
the inner patio. The more cosmopolitan centres like Seville, according to its historian
Morgado in 1587, were beginning to rebuild ‘with plenty of windows giving on to
the street’. And in a court town like Valladolid, rebuilt after 1561, Joly could
admire the balconies which were an essential part of the spectacle of fiesta.
Lack of wood not only explained, for Jovellanos, the poverty of Castilian dwelling,
but also its cooking, with a reliance on stews. The Cortes of 1580 noted how
reliant the Old Castilians were on gruel or porridge rather than bread—on boiling
rather than baking their rye, millet or barley. The same body emphasised that
some form of grain or bread was the bulk of the peasant diet: the shepherd would
have his ‘bread crumbs fried in suet or milk, or just bread and water’, the villager
‘bread with some stew of vegetables and a little bacon, or, in Lent, chickpeas
instead’.45 Eight fanegas (about four and a half hectolitres) of wheat would be consumed
by an individual in a year, thought Sancho de Moncada in 1619; eighteen by the
average family, thought another of the economic writers in 1638.46 It was generally
agreed that each of these fanegas would produce forty-two standard loaves of one
and a half Castilian pounds (690 grams). In other words, something like our modern
large supermarket loaf (800 grams) would need to be provided for each adult
male every day.
Wheat was the basic ingredient of bread throughout Spain, but the bran was
sometimes mixed in to give a cheaper loaf. In bad years round Cordoba barley
was baked into bread, according to the Cortes of 1593, and in the wetter lands of
the north-west chestnuts might give ‘a very savoury flour’, according to the agricultural
writer Alonso de Herrera. On the drier Mediterrnean coast, the carob might be
pressed into service, thought Herrera. A folktale from the Alicante region recounts
how a child, seeking carobs in the loft to still his hunger, was frightened by the
echo of his voice in the empty room: ‘that is the voice of the month of May,’
explained his father drily, the phantom of hunger which invaded lofts and stores
just before the new harvest.47
If bread was the staple, olive oil was its condiment over much of the south and
east. Martínez de Mata reckoned around 1650 that an artisan household in Toledo
would consume about three arrobas (48 litres) of oil a year in lighting but chiefly
36
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
in cooking. And then there was wine—‘the soul of the worker, the hoer and the
reaper’, as the deputy for Seville told the Cortes of 1593. The Toledo artisan,
thought Martínez de Mata, might drink just over 66 litres of the stuff every year.
Meat was consumed in small quantities, averaging out at about 50 grams a day
per person according to random calculations for Murcia, Valladolid and Valencia.
But it was 350 grams which was being served up to each person every day at the
table of the duchess of Gandia in 1676.48 On Fridays, on vigils of religious feasts
and during the forty days of Lent—in all perhaps a third of the year—meat was not
permitted anyway, though the special Bull of Crusade allowed its purchasers to
consume milk, cheese and lard. Inevitably, therefore, as the jurats of Valencia
told the king about 1643, ‘the most necessary part of the diet of the inhabitants of
this city is fresh and salt fish’. Even in inland La Mancha the peasants mention
fish as an important food in the Relaciones of 1575.
On the grainlands of the central plateau the real problem was the irregularity
of the harvest due to drought. Ponz wrote of the dangers facing the peasantry of
La Mancha through their too great a dependence on a single crop. On the northern
edge of this great plain the hills of La Alcarria offered a wider variety of foods—
not only small flocks of sheep, but ‘vegetables, honey, fruit, fish and game’, in
pursuit of which the peasants of the lowlands would come when famine struck.
The year before, 1786, hunger and fever had swept La Mancha. ‘Then did I see,’
wrote one high-placed observer, ‘hundreds of the wretched inhabitants… trekking
from village to village, trying if they could to beg their way to Madrid, the father
and mother covered in rags…and the children naked and exhausted.’49 The Jesuit
Luis de Palma recorded the great hunger of 1585 when ‘entire villages’ from La
Mancha had descended on Toledo clamouring for food. ‘People are dropping dead
by the wayside,’ wrote the deputies of Zamora about the great hunger in Galicia
in the spring of 1608. Or they reach Zamora ‘in such a state that they die soon
afterwards’. We fear an outbreak of plague, they went on, ‘for this is mostly or
always caused by famine’.50
Bubonic plague was probably the most feared of the diseases in Spain as in the
rest of Europe during the early modern period. In the eighteenth century, certainly,
malaria, smallpox and other illnesses were worrying the authorities, and even in
the seventeenth century it would seem that typhus and diphtheria were greater
killers.51 Typhus was brought to western Europe in the war for the reconquest of
Granada (1480–92), and it seems to have stayed on to do great damage in the
Hispanic world throughout the early modern period under the name of tabardillos.
Characterised by violent, delirious fever and small, purplish eruptions on the
skin, it is compatible with some of the symptoms described for the Valencian and
Sevillian plagues of 1647–9. The aetiology of typhus, in fact, is much like that of
plague. Transmitted by lice or fleas, its favoured habitat is crowded, squalid conditions
such as those to be found in many towns. In Cuenca typhus may have been the
most frequent single cause of high mortality, with outbreaks in 1606, 1631, 1710,
1735 and 1804, followed by plague in 1599, 1647 and possibly 1684.52
37
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
Whatever their exact nature in any particular case, epidemics were capable of
bringing the life of great cities to a standstill in the seventeenth century. This period
witnessed some graphic portrayals of death in art, but its peculiar fascination for
the historian of the plague may be that it was then that medics and statesmen really
began to combat it in a systematic way. In general, over the sixteenth and seventeenth
centuries the plague erupted here and there at intervals, battening on regions or
communities before moving on. There was no national epidemic as such—not even
the great Castilian plague of 1596–1602, or the Mediterranean outbreak of 1647–
52—but rather a series of localised outbreaks, resembling a kind of war of attrition.
One can get a better idea, perhaps, of the recurring impact of epidemic if one
looks at just one community over time. Valencia, with its 50,000 people, was
alleged to have lost 11,000 (from the district as well as the city) in 1489–90. Then
came the ‘many deaths’ of March to July 1508, when 300 people a day were dying
in the city—fifty times the usual mortality rate for a pre-industrial city, if we can
trust the chronicler. There were further outbreaks in July 1519, which contributed
to the panic leading up to the revolt of the guilds that year, and again in June
1530, in July 1557 and through to the summer of 1559 when some 30,000 died in
the kingdom of Valencia as a whole.53 Valencia escaped the plague of 1564 in
neighbouring Aragon, and that of 1589 in Barcelona. The great Castilian epidemic
of 1596–1602 nipped towns like Xàtiva, strategically situated along the main road
from the meseta to Valencia, but it failed to penetrate deep into the Mediterranean
lands. These were battered soon after, however, by contagion from Italy (the plague
of Milan immortalised by Manzoni’s novel) in 1630, and from Algiers in 1647.
This last of the great Valencian plagues is particularly well documented, thanks
to the efforts of a Dominican friar, Francisco Gavaldá, who ran one of the plague
hospitals and who was an exceptionally acute observer. He tells us that 16,789
persons died, nearly a third of the city’s population. ‘I only put down those I
could check in the records’, he tells us modestly.54 The epidemic spread through
the province and along the Mediterranean coast, down to Andalusia and up to
Catalonia. In Seville perhaps 50,000—again, over a third of the population—were
killed. The great plague of 1647–52 was followed by another in 1676–85 with its
focus in Andalusia, spreading along the Mediterranean again towards the towns
of southern Valencia—Orihuela, Elx, Crevillent. By comparison with these periodic
disasters the eighteenth century seems a haven of tranquillity.
Determining when a plague outbreak actually began is not easy. The chronicler
of Segovia, Diego de Colmenares, conveys a vivid sense of the apprehension and
uncertainty as sickness and rumour of sickness began to mount. Though the great
Castilian epidemic only reached Segovia in February 1599, ‘from the year 1596
the towns of Vizcaya and some in Castile were infected with a virulent and contagious
illness…with swellings or tumours and carbuncles in the groin, on the throat and
under the arms; the pulse began to race and become irregular, followed by sweating
and vomiting’. Ortiz de Zúñiga, chronicler of Seville and eye-witness of the terrible
events there in 1649, also conveys the build-up of tension. ‘From the year 1646
38
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
the plague had been nipping the port towns of Andalusia.’ But it was after the
floods of 4 April 1649 that people in Seville began complaining of ‘dizziness,
nausea and upset stomachs’. Then, later in the month, came ‘violent fevers, lumps,
carbuncles, bubos and other kinds of deadly complications’. When people were
dying at the rate of 500 a day—perhaps thirty times as many as would normally
have died in a city that size—the authorities declared a state of plague.55
There was considerable reluctance, of course, to take such a step because it
meant a virtual blockade of the infected city. There had been sickness in Cadiz
since the end of 1648, but Seville only closed its gates against this port in
February 1649 after the annual fleet for the Indies had cleared harbour. But
there was also genuine uncertainty about the symptoms of plague. The panel
of doctors assembled by the viceroy in the spring of 1648 could not agree
whether the recent epidemic in Valencia had been plague or not. Some of the
early symptoms reported in Seville and Valencia—particularly the dizziness
and fever—might be typhus. It was only in 1898 that the plague bacillus was
identified, and typhus only fully understood in the early twentieth century.
The pattern of outbreaks in Spain seems to conform, though, to what we know
of plague in the rest of pre-industrial Europe. Generally there had been a bad
harvest the year before—in August 1598 round Segovia, according to Colmenares,
and in Valencia before 1647, according to Gavaldá. These observers were inclined
to blame the weakened physical condition of the poor as an explanation of
why the disease took hold; historians nowadays think in terms of the import
of grain and of the accompanying rats, though it has to be said that there are
few references to rats in the Spanish or European literature of the period. The
mixture of humidity and heat, though, seems to have provided ideal conditions
for the flea, the real carrier of plague and typhus, to multiply—as in April
1649 after flooding in Seville. And —though the plague erupted in Segovia in
February 1599—the chronicler Colmenares referred darkly to ‘the autumn, always
an unhealthy time’, with its mixture of warmth and rain. And in Valencia the
plague of 1647 reached its height in October.
The blockade of infected areas was the first general response to epidemic, as
on 21 May 1649 when a government decree forbade the entry to Madrid of people
and goods coming from Seville and other Andalusian towns on pain of death.
Contemporaries blamed outbreaks on contagion—on the two ships from Flanders
which had touched at Santander in 1596, on a ship from Algiers docking in Valencia
in 1647. But the decision to interrupt communications was harrowing. What was
one to do, for example, with the 114 Christians ransomed from slavery in Algiers,
who had landed in Valencia in October 1647? The panel of doctors voted that all
their belongings should be destroyed, their bodies shaved and immersed repeatedly
in sea-water during a strict quarantine. Enforcing quarantine was not, however,
easy: in Valencia in 1647 the nobility fled at an early stage to their country houses,
and Gavaldá tells us that the full penalty was never imposed on those who came
in from infected areas, while in Barcelona fugitives from the besieging Castilian
39
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
army seem to have kept the plague going over the winter of 1651–2.56 Part of the
problem was jurisdictional. As early as June 1599 the city of Valencia dispatched
commissioners to the frontiers of the kingdom to ward off contagion from Castile;
but in January 1600 when the disease took hold in Xàtiva it could only demand
that all persons who had come from there since Christmas should leave the capital,
and turned to the king’s judges to punish those who had broken the quarantine at
the frontier.
An interesting feature of the seventeenth century, in fact, is the increasing coordination
of quarantine measures at national level. In Segovia in 1599 it was the bishop and
aldermen who were in charge. But in Seville and Valencia in 1647–9 the intervention
of the Crown is more apparent—in particular through the creation of ‘Health Committees’,
associating royal judges with the municipal magistrates for the first time. Gavaldá
notes the reluctance of the Valencian jurats to sacrifice their traditional prerogatives
in the matter. By the summer of 1649 the Crown had posted guards along the
Sierra Morena to seal off Andalusia, and the year before distributed copies of
Luis de Mercado’s excellent tract on plague (1598) to local authorities. The setting
up on a permanent basis of a Junta de Sanidad in Madrid in 1720 at least facilitated
the coordination of information— which Gavaldá, for one, regarded as vital and
its absence a major handicap in 1647.
Within an infected city the burden of administration had to be left, of course,
to the local authorities. Gavaldá gives a vivid sense of the early, tentative responses,
and the growth of self-confidence by a process of trial and error over the summer
and autumn of 1647. The first steps were generally to collect reliable information
about the sick, who would be transported to isolation hospitals set up often
outside the walls. The dead were supposed to be collected—by slaves and amnestied
prisoners—and buried in special lime pits outside the city. In Seville there are
reports of corpses being dragged out of houses secretly at night and abandoned
in the street, or in the porch of a church, their belongings thrown, after them,
without waiting for the municipal carts. The plague pits in that city were a horrific
spectacle, reports Ortiz de Zúñiga, with the piles of bodies ‘barely covered with
earth giving off an intolerable stench’, and ‘corrupting the air’, which promoted
further infection.
The so-called ‘miasma’ theory, by which plague was attributed to this kind of
putrefaction, gave creditable results in practice. It led the Valencians to send round
carts collecting rubbish for the first time, to householders being instructed to
clean the fronts of their houses every day, and to the repeated scrubbing of hospital
floors. ‘Cleanliness is one of the greatest foes of plague,’ commented Gavaldá,
who had first-hand experience of running a hospital. In Seville there were blazing
bonfires of rosemary and thyme, in Segovia of juniper to purify the air; and perhaps
the fires kept burning within the hospitals for the same purpose made the environment
less hospitable for the flea.
Doctors played a crucial role in all these epidemics. Juan Tomás Porcell, a Sardinian
educated in Salamanca, practised the first systematic (and rare) autopsies on plague
40
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
victims in the hospitals of Zaragoza in 1564.57 With an already distinguished school
of anatomy, Spain contributed notably to the European literature on this disease.
The therapy was, admittedly, experimental. The doctors noted, in Cordoba in
1649 as in Valencia two years before, that bleedings (that universal remedy of
early modern medicine) were counterproductive, weakening and killing the patient.58
All doctors could do was to help the pustules mature, and, for the rest, provide
good food and a clean environment in which nature would take its course. The
medical authorities in Valencia stressed the importance of food, and parish deputies
were instructed to provide each home where a sickness had been reported with ‘a
quarter of a chicken, a portion of mutton, biscuits and sweets’.
One of the interesting features of the therapy, in fact, was the concern— perhaps
attributable to the theory of bodily humours—with keeping the patient in good heart.
Segovia, like Seville, forbade bells to be tolled for the dead, ‘to alleviate some of the
frightful sadness’. And in Seville the magistrates sent musicians through the streets
‘so that our humours should not turn to gloom and melancholy’. In Valencia in
1647 the viceroy ordered that business was to proceed as usual; the courts continued
to sit, the corn exchange to open its doors, and royal officials were forbidden to
leave their posts. But in other cities—where the doctors could agree that they were
dealing with plague—there were stricter measures against public assemblies: the closure
of schools and theatres in Segovia and Seville, for example.
A dilemma arose with regard to religious processions. Explanations of disease
in terms of magic were not much honoured in Spain, where the careful legalism
of the Inquisition discounted most reports of witchcraft. Typically it was a doctor
attached to the Inquisition of Seville who cast scorn on the idea that pestilential
powders (invoked in some parts of Europe) could spread disease.59 More room
was made—as by Ortiz de Zúñiga—for the influence of the stars on the bodily
humours. But the more common explanation was in terms of a punishment for
sin. Inevitably, therefore, prayers were organised to beg God’s mercy. There
were big processions in Seville in the early months with statues and relics. In
Valencia they walked through the streets, ‘some with rough cords bound tightly
at the waist, others dragging huge chains, and others carrying heavy crosses’,
accompanied by 400 girls, ‘all barefoot, with their hair hanging down and their
faces covered with black veils’. But Gavaldá, Dominican friar though he was,
felt that it would be more prudent to stay at home and pray, and his compatriot,
the Jesuit Arcayna, referred to the medical opinion that women and children
were laying themselves more open to infection by these exhausting penances.60
Barcelona suspended processions shortly after the outbreak of plague there in
1651. In general, the church seems to have cooperated quite happily with the
secular authorities in this matter, and the emphasis was always on the physical
rather than metaphysical explanation of disease. Valencia spent 200 pounds in
March 1600 on ‘good works and masses’ against the threat of plague, but 4,000
on checking the health of immigrants at the frontier.
41
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
How much damage did plague do? Recovery rates in hospital could be quite
high. Several hundred left those of Segovia at the end of the epidemic of 1599, in
a joyful procession, accompanied by their priests and doctors on horseback. The
unfortunate ones were generally those who had contracted the pneumonic plague
or typhus—those in Valencia or Seville who were gripped by sudden delirious
fevers and carried off within twenty-four hours. And it was chiefly the lower classes
who suffered. No nobleman died in Valencia, Gavaldá tells us, ‘because, except
for the royal officials and one or two others, all left town’. His own figure of
16,789 dead may be too high; but the best recent estimates still suggest up to a
third of the city population died. The tendency in recent demographic study, in
Spain as in Europe, is to play down the effect of epidemics. Even the great Castilian
plague of 1596–1602 which claimed 600,000 lives—perhaps one in ten of the population—
only made its impact felt gradually, in the downswing of marriages and births in
the 1620s. But it is hard to decide whether this fall was due to the missing cohort
of young victims of the great plague, or to the bleak economic prospects for marriage
at the later date.61
Though plague could devastate rural districts as well as cities, it was always a
relatively localised phenomenon. Thus Ortiz de Zúñiga witnessed the great number
of immigrants arriving in Seville after 1649—not enough, though, to prevent wages
shooting up, nor to fill even by his own day (1677) ‘the great number of houses
left empty, and even entire neighbourhoods’. In Valencia the plague of 1647 could
hardly have come at a worse time since the kingdom was in the front line against
the Catalan rebels and their French backers. The Valencian garrison in the border
fortress of Tortosa had to be reduced to half-strength, and the French stormed in
during June 1648. The Valencian guilds refused any men because of the recent
plague, but 2,000 were somehow assembled from the hinterland, though the viceroy
warned that they would be hard to feed since the ports were closed due to quarantine.
When in November 1650 the government launched its big offensive for the recovery
of Tortosa, the city of Valencia was able to furnish a contingent of 500 men, and
other sources brought the total from the little kingdom to over 4,000—the biggest
army the Valencians had assembled in modern times, and a unique tribute to
their demographic resilience after one of their worst plagues.
The cost of plague, though, went well beyond the drop in manpower. The
Valencian silk-workers complained about the harm to their trade caused by the
closure of the port, only opened in April 1649. Towns had to borrow to meet the
costs, not least of the food provided for the poor. A tax of two shillings in the
pound on the price of wine was one lasting memorial to the Valencian plague of
1647. In Segovia priests ‘went round the houses of the nobles and wealthy citizens,
whose servants went back with them carrying blankets, sheets, shirts, suits of
clothes and delicacies for the hospitals’.
The psychological aspect of plague has also to be taken into account. The
spectacle of so much death seems to form a backdrop to the pessimism of the
Baroque—a sense of disillusion with this world, so characteristic of Spanish art
42
THE FEWNESS OF PEOPLE
and literature of the Golden Age. ‘In no time does vice have such a free rein as in
time of plague,’ wrote Gavaldá, as social order broke down, as neighbours turned
from each other in fear, as women were left to fend for themselves and men turned
to robbery. Yet one would also have to stress a heightened awareness of divine
power, reinforcing the Counter-Reformation message. Segovia voted in 1599 to
dedicate a day every year to honour Saint Roque, patron saint of plague victims;
and the enduring monument to the plague of 1647 is the basilica of Our Lady of
the Forsaken, a masterpiece of the Valencian Baroque. It is hard not to feel that
the grimness of seventeenth-century plagues owe something to the greater information
we have about them than about their predecessors. The collection of information
by authorities is one of their most impressive aspects, part of that inventory of the
resources of Spain which was proceeding in the early modern period.
43
3
THE LIMITS OF A
PEASANT ECONOMY
One of the characteristics of the early modern world was the acceleration of that
process conveniently if loosely described as the transition from feudalism to capitalism.
It was a complex phenomenon, in which economic, social and political factors interact
with each other. We shall focus here on agriculture, though the full story will only
gradually unfold in the course of the rest of the book. Traditional interpretations of
Spain suggested the survival there into modern times of traditional farming and an
impoverished peasantry, whose restlessness contributed powerfully to the collapse
of nascent democracy in 1936. More recently, a revisionist view has been put forward,
which draws attention to the ‘Spanish miracle’ of the eighteenth and nineteenth
centuries, when production and markets seemed to flourish.1
 Yet, on the eve of the
modern age, the survival of peasant farming was perhaps the most characteristic
feature of the rural landscape—an empty landscape for the statesmen of the Enlightenment:
still not fully settled or properly exploited.
A major challenge facing the Spanish farmer was that of the sheer lack of water
for cultivation. ‘If we were only to bleed the rivers,’ wrote the great Jesuit philosopherhistorian Mariana in 1598, ‘we would not only get more grain but have a healthier
countryside.’ Considerable technical ingenuity was, in fact, devoted to this problem.
The great dam at Tibi was built between 1580 and 1594, fertilising the dry lands
of Alicante. Spanning a gorge 78 metres wide, to a height of 45 metres, it was
surely the most impressive engineering feat of its kind in pre-industrial Europe—
‘really worthy to rank with the works of the Romans for its grandiose and ingenious
construction’, wrote Escolano shortly after it was completed. But it never actually
delivered as much water as was hoped, and other projects—like the proposal of
Toledo in the Cortes of 1583–5 to tap the River Tagus—bore even less fruit.
Part of the problem was the sheer immensity of the technological challenge.
The rivers of Spain tend to run through broken terrain mostly unsuitable for
agriculture, and their flow is uneven—torrential in winter, sluggish in summer. As
Jovellanos noted in 1795, government intervention would be needed on a considerable
scale to strengthen the banks, to cut deep canals through the hills and to provide
locks to level off the flow. Such coordination of effort only became fully available
in the twentieth century. In the early modern period individual towns had to bear
44
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
the brunt of planning and costs, and their endeavours, though sometimes heroic,
were generally insufficient. Vilanova de Castelló (Valencia) borrowed heavily over
several generations between 1587 and 1645 to build and maintain an irrigation
canal. The interest on the debt amounted to nearly 7,000 Valencian pounds a
year, dwarfing a municipal budget of just 1,000.2
There was also the problem of getting agreement of towns downstream to
the diversion of their water. Plans were drawn up in 1616 to irrigate large tracts
of Catalonia through the Urgell canal, but nothing was achieved until the nineteenth
century. The government wanted the local proprietors to foot the bill, but they
were nervous about an expected fall in wheat prices if production was to soar
upwards as anticipated.3
 In fact studies of the main regions of irrigation— Valencia
and Murcia—would tend to suggest that comparatively little was achieved in the
early modern period to add to the infrastructure set in place by the Romans and
Arabs. The huerta of Valencia, one of the marvels of its time, was perpetually
short of water until the nineteenth century when the canals were improved and
artesian wells dug. Before that the farmer might only be able to irrigate his
fields once every three weeks in summer.4
 This was no good for market-gardening,
and much of the huerta was used for the standard crops of the arid land: wheat,
vine and olive.
Where there was an adequate supply of water, this combined with the warmth
of the sun to give some of those oases of cultivation for which Spain was famed.
Along the banks of the river of Jaén, known to the Arabs as the Guadalbullón
(‘the river of silver’), were trees laden with cherries, plums, pomegranates, apricots,
pears, apples and walnuts, standing amid the vegetable patches and the fields of
flax and hemp, according to the proud listing of the local chronicler. But more
generally, perhaps, access to water enabled farmers to ride out the uncertainties
of the Spanish climate as they struggled to get in their crops of grain. The great
Aragonese geographer Asso noted in 1791 that the Monegros might give fifteen
times the wheat seed sown if it rained, but in dry years ‘not even the seed can be
recovered’.5
 The Monegros is an extreme case of a drought-prone area. But the
problem was general enough. In the very dry autumn of 1626 and early spring of
1627 none of the unirrigated lands of Valencia could be ploughed or sown, according
to the grim reports of the ministers responsible for introducing the additional
taxes demanded by Olivares’s government.
Another of Olivares’s targets in 1626 was Catalonia, which looked so prosperous
that it must have money to spare for the king. The Jesuit Manuel Marcillo was to
praise the province in 1685 for its dispersed settlement, which kept the farmer
close to his fields and fostered good arable cultivation. The pattern of settlement
had many causes, but access to water was surely a factor. Along the banks of
rivers, wrote the Valencian chronicler Escolano in 1610, one found ‘innumerable
settlements’. Navagero, travelling through Spain in 1525, found the Basque Country
well-peopled: ‘everywhere you see little villages, hamlets and farms, which makes
a very pleasant picture’. How different were his comments on the road from Andalusia
45
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
north through New Castile, with its ‘empty and desolate landscape’ and its ‘uninhabited
and uncultivated countryside’. Such comments were sometimes ill-informed and
misleading. But commentators of the early modern period were aware of the benefits
to be derived from close attention to digging and weeding by a locally resident
farming family.
Agriculture is an art, wrote Jovellanos in 1795, and like other arts ‘draws its
principles from science’. Early modern Spain produced a number of distinguished
writers, whose work is at once a reflection of the scientific orientation of their
society and of the practical challenges facing the farmer. The outstanding name is
that of Gabriel Alonso de Herrera (1470?–1540?). Son of a rich peasant of Talavera
de la Reina, he was attached as a page to Archbishop Talavera (to whom he may
have been related) when the latter took charge of the recently conquered see of
Granada. There he got to know Moorish writings on agriculture, and had also
the opportunity to travel in France and Italy. Through his brother who was professor
in the new university of Alcalá de Henares, founded by Archbishop Cisneros,
Herrera received the backing of that influential prelate and patron of humanism
to publish his treatise of 1513 on agriculture. The book is a monument in its own
way to Renaissance learning, collating information from the classical writers like
Columella (himself a Spaniard of the first century AD) but subjecting them to the
test of personal observation. The author’s brother Hernando wrote that the nobles
abandoned the fables of chivalry to read this fascinating revelation of the real
world, and the peasants themselves ‘no longer meet in taverns on holy days but
read and learn what they must do when they get back to work’.6
Some laughed at this pretention. Various deputies to the Cortes of 1580 opposed
a subsidy for the reprinting of yet another treatise on agriculture, that of Juan
Valverde de Arrieta (1578), on the grounds that farmers scorned such books, quite
rightly, since their prescriptions ‘are taken from ancient and foreign authors’ who
knew little of local conditions. But Arrieta, Lope de Deza (1618) and Fray Miquel
Agustín (1617) constitute, along with Herrera, major contributions to our understanding
of Iberian farming. Herrera’s book became a classic: there were twenty-nine editions
over the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries (including several Italian and one
French translation), and, though it seems to have declined in popularity during
the eighteenth century, it was reissued as a guide to good practice by the Economic
Society of Madrid as late as 1818.
A common feature of these works is their reverence for nature. They prefer,
certainly, the order imposed by man to the wilderness beloved of the Romantics;
but they are acutely sensitive to the unity of natural phenomena—the influence of
the stars and the relationship between different kinds of plants and the human
organism. Check on the phases of the moon, warned Father Agustín, before killing
your animals, shearing your sheep or pruning or grafting your trees; and similar
advice was extended by Arrieta to the manuring of the soil. Herrera set out the
tasks of the agricultural year ‘according to the waxing or waning of the moon’,
and, like Lope de Deza, was sure that astrology could help forecast the weather.
46
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
But he also urged the farmer to look around him, at the colour of the sky at dawn
and at the season of migration of swallows and cranes, in a significant step forward
in humanity’s slow inventory of the physical universe.
The emphasis in these writings is more on fertility than on productivity—on
the balance which one can achieve with nature rather than on its transformation.
As Herrera pointed out, a year of fallow, perhaps more on poorer soil, was the
key to good farming. Continuous rotation, with flax and maize planted after wheat,
was only for well-watered and well-manured fields. And neither water nor manure
should be applied in excess, since the one tended to leach the soil, the other to
burn it and foster weeds. The principal task of the farmer, on the dry lands of the
central tableland, was to turn the soil frequently in order to counter the loss of
natural moisture through evaporation. Plough the fallow ‘to the palm of a hand’
(21 centimetres) in autumn, advised Arrieta, and spread manure; then plough
again, a bit deeper, before Christmas, so that the rains penetrate. Then turn the
soil over the following May, allowing the sun to kill weeds at the root; and, finally,
sow your grain that autumn, driving the plough in 42 centimetres. ‘The more
ploughings the better’, thought the Catalan agronomist Father Agustín, though
the rhythm would be dictated by the type of soil and the climate. The fallow
would have to be well-worked and manured between about All Saints’ Day (1
November), when the rains softened the earth, and the beginning of Advent (the
four weeks before Christmas) or Saint Andrew’s Day (30 November), when the
wet and cold made the land inhospitable. In the kingdom of Toledo, thought Lope
de Deza, the sun would bake the fallow too hard for ploughing by Saint John’s
Day (24 June), but the Old Castilian farmer might continue for another month.
The main purpose of ploughing in these southern latitudes was to counter
evaporation; hence, as Herera noted, ‘you must always plough crosswise, cutting
across the furrow you have just made’. This stood in marked contrast to the familiar
ridge-and-furrow pattern of fields in northern Europe, where the main concern
was drainage. The long fields there had evolved in the Middle Ages in order to
facilitate the heavy plough with its team of oxen or horses which were needed in
damp clay. But in the Iberian peninsula the fields tended to be squat, reflecting
the transversal movement of which Herrera spoke. But did this ploughing lead to
good cultivation? Antonio Ponz believed that it turned the earth too lightly, leaving
the seed exposed to winter frosts and to being eaten by birds. Arrieta had suggested
that the ploughshare would need to bite to a depth of 42 centimetres at sowing,
and Pérez del Barrio (1697) even advocated 63.7
 Often, it seems, Spanish ploughs
were not sturdy enough to achieve these depths. The Aragonese economist Asso
suggested in 1798 that the farmer had to wait until the autumn rains thoroughly
soaked the earth before being able to cut through, thus casting up damp clods
instead of finely pulverised soil and creating the right environment only for thistles—
a constant plague round Zaragoza.
Contemporaries identified two aspects of the problem. Townsend paid particular
attention in the course of his travels to the construction of the ploughs themselves.
47
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
The typical Roman or swing plough of the peninsula, with an iron share but no
coulter or mouldboard, seemed suitable to its task on light soils. Townsend noted
that the angle of the share could be adjusted to allow the plough to bite less deeply
at the first breaking of the fallow, more deeply when sowing. If there was a problem
of dampness, mouldboards could be fitted to allow ridges to be formed. But there
seemed to be areas of the peninsula—for example, between Madrid and Toledo—
where either the soils were too heavy or the ploughs were too short of wood and
iron to bite deeply enough into them.8
 More of a problem was the condition of the
draught animals. The traditional plough animal had been the ox. Sometimes badly
utilised—Caxa de Leruela in 1631 and Townsend in 1791 noted that the system of
traction in parts of the peninsula involved the animal in pushing with its forehead
against a cross-beam rather than in pulling with its chest against a yoke—it was
nevertheless sturdy and ploughed deep. Townsend observed lots of oxen between
Malaga and Granada at the end of the eighteenth century, and they were still about
two-thirds of the stock used round Segovia at the time.9
 The ox, indeed, continued
to be used down to modern times when heavy land needed to be broken for the
first time. But a closure of the frontier and a shrinkage of pasture made it at once
less necessary and something of a menace (for example, to vines or market gardens).
Also, it was a lumbering, costly animal. It required an outlay of 20–25 ducats,
according to an estimate put before the Cortes of 1593–6, and about double that
amount in 1631, according to the economic writer Caxa de Leruela. Meanwhile a
horse could be had for 12–14 ducats, according to another report to the Cortes in
1624. But the horses of Spain, as we noted earlier, were generally of poor quality,
short of proper fodder, and too reliant on barley in New Castile and Andalusia or
on the carob bean in Valencia. Instead, recourse was had to the hybrid of horse
and donkey, the resistant and nimble mule. However, mules were not cheap. To
draw a plough a farmer would need ideally two of them, costing the princely sum
of 200 ducats—several years’ wages for an agricultural labourer and accessible to
most peasants only on two or three years’ credit.10 The rise of the mule, thought
Arrieta, was senseless: it led the peasant into debt and ousted the sturdier ox. But
Father Agustín noted that ‘a pair of mules can do the work of two yoke of oxen’;
and Lope de Deza explained the shift in terms of the mule’s adaptibility to a wide
variety of carrying tasks. In general, the rise of the mule in the sixteenth and
seventeenth centuries surely reflected the greater urbanisation of the Spanish countryside—
the shrinkage of pasture at the expense of market gardens and vines which required
shallower ploughing.
One of the great conflicts in early modern Spain was, as Caxa de Leruela phrased
it vividly, that between Cain and Abel, between pasture and arable.11 This frontier
land seemed to be experiencing something akin to the range war of the American
West—the battle between the rancher and the dirt-farmer. At first sight the quarrel
seems unnecessary in a country like Spain where so much wilderness still survived.
Viciana’s chronicle of 1563 describes the empty spaces which characterised particularly
the south of the kingdom of Valencia; while around Jaén, in Ximénez Patón’s
48
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
chronicle of 1628, the boar, deer and mountain goats still abound in the wellwooded mountains. As late as 1842 George Borrow wrote of the mountains separating
Galicia from Castile, covered with chestnut groves, as ‘haunts of the wolf, the
wild boar and the corzo or mountain-stag’, while in the Guadarrama Mountains
separating Old and New Castile ‘you may wander days and days…without coming
to any término (townland)’.12
In fact, the waste was integrated into a system of shifting cultivation, adapted to
the poor soil and shortage of rain. In the Relaciones of 1575–8 the villages of Nava
del Pino and Sacaruela refer to the process of clearing scrub through setting fire to
it, creating a fertile seedbed from the ashes which would yield richly for a year or
two before the site was abandoned again to nature. As late as the middle of the
nineteenth century the chronicler Las Casas-Deza described vividly the practice in
some parts of his native province of Cordoba. Beyond the circle of well-tilled lands
radiating out two or three kilometres from town came the hill country, where ‘they
cut down the plants in March and April, so as to set fire to it in August; then they
cast the seed in due time and cover it over with one cut of the plough’.13 The damage
done to tree cover was extensive. Round Valladolid Ponz noted that such shifting
cultivation on poor soil had turned the land into pàramos—windswept steppe, lacking
vegetation and subject to erosion, of little use to man or beast. Shortly afterwards
Cavanilles was to condemn similar wasteful practices in Valencia.
Such extensive farming was only made possible by the lack of individual title to
property. Much of the country was held as common land, which belonged to the
townships. If it was valuable it might be leased out (propios), but most seems to have
been classed as baldíos, ‘empty land’, where even municipal boundaries were not
clearly demarcated and possession resided with occupation or with the king. Some
25–30 per cent of the Tierra de Campos (Valladolid) was common land in the sixteenth
century, and a quarter of the lands of the province of Segovia still in the middle of
the eighteenth century after two centuries of sale of commons by the Crown.14
After all, the Castilian tableland had developed as a pastoral region, home of
the fine merino wool from the thirteenth century. Intense heat in summer, leading
to scarcity of grass, drove sheep throughout the Mediterranean basin up into the
hills in search of fresher pastures. Spain developed an ‘inverse transhumance’:
because of the high altitudes in Old Castile, its sheep had to move away from the
snow and cold, seeking milder winter pastures in the lowlands of Andalusia and
Extremadura. Aragonese herds made a similar trek down to the coastal plain of
Valencia. Transhumance was widespread over the peninsula and often small scale,
from hill to plain and back again, following the seasons. As a result there tended
to be a community of pasture in certain areas—throughout the old Muslim kingdom
of Granada, for example, and in the kingdom of Valencia, though not without
protests from individual townships, eager to safeguard their own grassland.
The best-known of these transhumant arrangements is that of the Mesta, which
grouped (essentially) the herds of Old Castile and León and escorted them south
in winter to Extremadura and Andalusia. It was set up in 1273, just after the
49
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
recovery of Andalusia from the Moors. Anyone with ten sheep could apply to
belong to the guild. In practice it was a costly business to transport sheep so far,
only justified if one owned merino sheep which produced the fine wool increasingly
in demand in the manufacturing towns of Flanders in the late Middle Ages. Almost
by definition, one might say, it was an organisation which catered to a minority of
landowners. Because the Crown received a considerable portion of its revenue
from the duty on the export of merino wool, it surrounded the Mesta with privileges,
notably allowing it to have its own magistrates (the alcaldes entregadores), who would
adjudicate disputes over pasture and keep the range open. Ponz still witnessed, at
the end of our period, the millions of sheep on the move south from late September
or early October every year, in flocks averaging 10,000 head, each under its mayoral
and his fifty assistant shepherds. They would cover 100–160 leagues (550–900
kilometres) in just over a month or so. In the winter pastures of the south the
lambs were born, protected by enclosures of brushwood and nets erected by the
shepherds. Then, the following spring, came the long trek back, to reach the shearing
stations of the Guadarrama Mountains, at the entrance to Old Castile, by the
month of May. The shearing would last a month or so, after which the flocks
moved on to their summer pastures in the north where the shepherds were kept
busy supplying them with salt during the mating season.15 The whole odyssey
was one of the most distinctive features of Castilian rural life.
Much effort has gone into quantifying it. There were nearly 3,000,000 transhumants
in the Mesta in the early sixteenth century, falling back to under 2,000,000 by the
early seventeenth, then recovering to 3,500,000 by the middle of the eighteenth
century—even 5,000,000 by the end of the century, according to Ponz. Despite the
reverses suffered in the seventeenth century in harmony with other aspects of the
depression of that period, it is clear that transhumance remained a permanent
feature of Castilian rural life in the old regime. In order to assess the full importance
of pastoralism one has to take into account, in addition, the estantes, the nonmigrating herds. If the Mesta provided Europe with fine wool, these—as the deputy
for León reminded the Cortes of 1587— kept Spain itself supplied with meat and
wool. Four times the number of the transhumants, thought Caxa de Leruela in
1631, they numbered about 15,000,000 head in the great fiscal survey of Castile
in 1750–4, though falling to 8,000,000 by the end of that century.16
Concern about the shrinkage of herds was most forcibly expressed in the late
sixteenth and in the seventeenth century, though one might have thought that the
increase of population in the eighteenth represented a greater threat to pasture.
Certainly contemporaries were aware of a general fencing-off of the open range.
The pastoralists themselves were divided: Xèrica (near Segorbe) asked in the Cortes
of 1626 for permission to fence off its own extensive pastures ‘since the herds
which come down from Aragon to spend the winter in Valencia do great damage’.
And the Castilian law of 1602 stripping the alcaldes entregadores of jurisdiction over
non-Mesta flocks seems to be part of the same trend, towards a desire by local
pastoralists to keep more of their district under their own control.
50
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
Caxa de Leruela noted in 1631 that the law of 1602 simply weakened the pastoral
interest as a whole, which was threatened by the advance of arable. The sale of
baldíos for enclosure was one way in which the Crown had been trying to raise
money since the later sixteenth century.17 As in Tudor England, enclosures aroused
much moral anguish. It was only in the later eighteenth century that new currents
of economic thought extolled the virtues of private enterprise, and only in 1766–70
that a series of government decrees positively encouraged the break-up of the commons.
The earlier sales were almost furtive, and often illegal given that the Cortes regularly
attached conditions forbidding sales to its vote of subsidies to the Crown. Nevertheless,
there was a gradual shift from public to private ownership: the sale of commons
under Philip II affected between 25 and 30 per cent of the surface area of the Tierra
de Campos, and by 1751 over a quarter of the arable in the Tierra de Coca (Segovia)
had been taken in from the commons since the sixteenth century.18
When enclosures were for arable, thought Caxa de Leruela, they ultimately
did more harm than good. The cutting down of trees, the setting fire to the undergrowth,
the eventual abandonment of marginal land which earlier farmers, with good reason,
had refused to plough, all led to a general deterioration of the environment for
both peasant and shepherd. Though the Crown supposedly sold only land which
had already once been farmed, and though a law of 1501 allowed the Mesta to
stop the conversion of any of its pasture to arable, Caxa de Leruela (himself a
magistrate of that institution) noted how difficult it was in practice to enforce this
ruling since there was no proper inventory of the wastelands. Another decree of
1492 had forbidden owners of land once rented to the Mesta to offer the lease to
anyone else at a higher rent; nevertheless the pressure of the market ensured that
leases trebled in value in the first half of the sixteenth century.19
Caxa de Leruela was aware of the hostility of contemporary society towards
the Mesta as a corporation of privileged herd-owners who were holding down
land which might be developed for more productive purposes. It was the basic
aim of his book to counter these accusations and to demonstrate how vital pastoralism
was to the whole ‘mechanism of society’. Men need bread, but also clothes, and
the procurement of these created the ‘trades, exchanges, jobs, callings and manufactures’
on which civilisation itself had developed. From wool, therefore, began the division
of labour and the building of towns. The alleged selfishness of the big rancher
was an illusion: most of the herds of Spain were small and a necessary complement
to agriculture, not only for the manure and traction they provided, but, more
generally, through their ease of transfer and sale, which enabled the peasant to
raise cash to pay taxes, rent and dowries. Just what social class Caxa de Leruela
had in mind is not entirely clear. He suggested that 500 sheep and 20 mules or
their equivalent might constitute a ‘moderate’ herd, adapted to the farming which
a householder might carry on himself, and too small to be ‘coveted by the wealthy’.
Compared with the 40,000 sheep owned by the royal monastery of the Escorial,
or the 20,000 of the duke of Infantado or the 25,000 of the duke of Béjar, such
figures might indeed seem modest. But even 500 sheep seem to have been considerably
51
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
beyond the resources of most Castilian farmers. Two-thirds of the flocks even of
the Mesta consisted of under 100 head in the middle of the sixteenth century.20
Caxa de Leruela was, no doubt, right to suggest that a healthy pastoralism was
an indispensable complement to a healthy agriculture. The problem was perhaps
less one of shrinkage of land for pasture—there still seems to have been enough of
that even at the end of the eighteenth century—than of a shortage of capital to buy
and maintain sheep. Certainly there was a period of crisis, reflected, for example,
in the complaints of Cuenca to the Cortes of 1577 that its herds had fallen by half
over the last fifteen years. Like Burgos at this time, it blamed less the advance of
arable than the crisis in the wool trade—the blockage of the traditional export
market with the war in Flanders since 1567, and the general impoverishment of
rural society caused by the increase of taxation to sustain Spanish arms abroad.
In other words, the herds of Spain—so enduring an ingredient of its rural prosperity—
were not so much in competition with arable as victims of a similar recession.
A paradox, as it might seem, of the enclosure movement was that it occurred at
a time when the rural population was in decline. There was a drop from the later
sixteenth century not only in the number of sheep but also in the cultivation of
the arable. A major index of this phenomenon is the record of the tithes or tenth
parts of the harvest collected by the church in Spain as in the rest of Christian
Europe. The tithe varied in its incidence, being most carefully assessed on grain
but often compounded for a lump sum in the case of secondary crops like vegetables.
The mulberry and the carob, so important in the kingdom of Valencia by the
seventeenth century, tended to be lightly taxed since they had not been widely
grown in the thirteenth century when the rules for tithe were set down—as the
clergy complained to the Cortes of 1626. The tithe, therefore, can give us at best
only an approximation to the real state of the harvests. This is all the more true
since it was generally farmed out for a lump sum to tithe-farmers, whose actual
collection can only be checked in a few places by reference to local parish records.
More often the historian has to deflate the price paid for the tithe-farm by an
index of prices in order to arrive at an idea of the actual fluctuations of the harvest.
Much research has been carried out in Spain in recent years on this subject,
and we are beginning to see the profile of agricultural production over the early
modern period. There are, perhaps, few surprises, with the curve of grain output
corresponding roughly to that of population. Between the 1580s and 1630s there
was a fall of about 40 per cent in the harvest of wheat and barley in Castile.
Recovery set in during the later seventeenth century—in Castile, perhaps in Andalusia,
certainly in Murcia and Valencia.21 By the middle of the eighteenth century the
old peak of 1580 was attained again. Thereafter the bad harvests of the 1760s
highlighted some of the underlying problems of a traditional economy geared to
the production of grain.
The agricultural revolution of modern times, which would permit population
to break through the ceiling of about 40 inhabitants to the square kilometre,
depended on a variety of factors. The key was probably less the application of
52
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
new knowledge than of an intensification of techniques already known. The
decline of the fallows allowed a finer, more continuous tillage of the soil, creating
better conditions for the germination of grain. But in order to eliminate the
fallow— as it had been, for example, in the Valencian huerta since medieval
times— one needed a good supply of water and manure, and some guarantee
that the crops intercalated between the grain would find a market. The secret
was to plant crops which rooted in layers of the soil not touched by wheat—
turnips in eighteenth-century England, which served as fodder for the cattle,
thereby increasing the supply of manure for next year’s grain harvest. In 1513
Herrera noted that the farmer could plant millet in May or June after he had
lifted his barley, ‘burning the stubble first’, or flax in March ‘on land which
has given turnips for Lent’. And, ‘as in Lombardy’, one could plant turnips
after wheat, using them either as fodder for cattle or as a green manure to be
ploughed back into the soil, thereby increasing its fertility. In Catalonia it was
this ‘robbing of the fallow’ —the planting of turnips and vetches between years
of wheat—which was giving the province its air of rural prosperity in the eighteenth
century.22
But Valencia and Catalonia were now some of the more densely populated
parts of Spain, with the network of markets which made it possible to dispose of
cash-crops. On the central tableland a more scattered population would find it
hard to integrate legumes or root-crops into its traditional cycle of grain and fallow.
Short of humus, the clay surface bakes hard in the summer and turns water-logged
after the autumn rains. It was conventional wisdom that such a surface needed a
year of continuous ploughing to make it fit for sowing wheat in the following
autumn— ‘after the rains and frosts have rotted the earth well (in winter), and the
sun in the following months has baked and pierced it’, in the words of Lope de
Deza.23 An equally compelling reason for the retention of a fallow one year in
two, or even two years in three, as was the practice in parts of early modern
Spain, was to assure pasture for the numerous flocks of sheep. The stubble provided
an essential supplement to the parched waste which constituted grazing in so much
of the central tableland. In Old Castile, particularly, the regulation of the fallow
became an integral part of village life from at least the sixteenth century. Grain
was cultivated in open fields, split into parcels which had to follow a common
rotation, so that the herds could wander freely after harvest.24 The enclosures of
the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries made some inroads, but not as many as
might be expected. Vineyards were increasingly fenced off. But perhaps one of
the worst effects of enclosures was to aggravate the divorce between pasture and
arable which has been a handicap for the rural economy.
In the westerly parts of the Meseta, where the soil is sandy and leached by the
Atlantic rains, the tendency has been in modern times for pasture to dominate,
and for fields to be ploughed intermittently. Part of this system must have been
reinforced by developments in the early modern period. Following the long wars
of attrition against Portugal after that country asserted its independence in 1640,
53
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
the flight of the peasantry along the frontier had led to many despoblados (deserted
villages) —in one area just 13 were left out of 127. The empty land was turned into
an open range for ‘powerful herd-owners’, to the detriment both of local farmers
and local flocks. Further south, in Andalusia, a similar divorce between those
who owned big herds and those who had large tracts of arable has also been
noted for the middle of the eighteenth century.25 The problem may be compared
to that facing much of Africa today—the separation between the pastoralist who
occupies and defends an open range, burning vegetation in his path, and the arable
farmer, too poor to secure the flocks which might manure his fields.
A combination of integration of cattle with arable, and of better tillage through
the planting of fodder crops on the fallow was the kind of formula which evaded
early modern Castile. On the well-ploughed, irrigated huertas of the Mediterranean
coastline productivity was as high as anywhere in Europe in the old regime: ten
or fifteen times the seed in the case of wheat, or twenty hectolitres of grain harvested
per hectare.26 Extensive cultivation in the dry lands—the burning of shrubs and
the mixing of the ashes with the virgin soil—could give yields nearly as high as
this in years when it rained. But on the typical biennial fallow of the central tableland
the farmer could expect to get back just five times the seed he had sown, or just
over 600 hectolitres per hectare, according to figures given in the middle of the
seventeenth century by Fray Juan Martínez, Dominican confessor to King Philip
IV.27 The yields do not seem to vary much over our period, according to the
records of even the bigger farms in the eighteenth century.
Inevitably the bigger population of the eighteenth century had to be maintained—
decreasingly well, it would appear—on the product of marginal land brought in
from the waste. But a major new factor was the increasing commercialisation of
the rural economy. Cavanilles observed of his native Valencia in 1795: ‘There is
no doubt that twice the amount of land is now being cultivated in this kingdom as
at the beginning of the century; but there can be little question either but that the
greater part of the new acquisitions are planted with carob, olive, almond, vine
and mulberry.’28 One of the reasons for the supplanting of the ox by the mule,
thought Caxa de Leruela in 1631, was the spread of vineyards (for the lumbering
ox damaged the vine and ate the leaves). Three-quarters of the vines, he went on,
had been planted since the beginning of the century. But already the Cortes of
1579–82 had been concerned that ‘the planting of vines is spreading apace, and
many idlers live by this business’, reducing the amount of land available for wheat.
In 1513, in a much less populated country, Herrera had warned that viticulture
was very labour-intensive and that the farmer might find employment for his
slaves in this way, if he had any. Inevitably, one feels, the increase of population
during the rest of that century would find its outlet partly in the tending of vines.
The problem was that the wine was often not very good, and local landowners
tried to protect their own markets by regulations excluding or delaying the import
of other vintages. For the agrarian writers of the time the rise of the vineyard
symbolised the breakdown of the moral autonomy of the village. It led to the new
54
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
popularity of the mule, increasingly necessary not only to plough vineyards but
also to cart the wine to town and to bring back the luxuries which were contributing
to the moral decline of the peasantry. Some say that wine helps the poor to pass
their troubles, wrote Caxa de Leruela. But this is either disingenuous or a remedy
for despotic government; for if idleness, to which the multitude is prone, and
wine take hold in the villages, ‘which are the homes of diligence, care and hard
work’, then it is all up with the rest of the commonwealth.29
Mulberry was another of the growing commercial crops of early modern Spain.
So great had been the expansion in the valley of the Xúquer, wrote Escolano in
1610, that ‘small villages have been turned into populous towns’ —places like
Carcaixent and Algemesí, which rose to become royal towns in the later sixteenth
century on the profits of silk. Mulberry groves, about 4 per cent of the irrigated
land of Alzira in 1580, occupied 7.5 per cent by the middle of the seventeenth
century, while another three-quarters of the fields were lined with mulberry trees
at the edges. In the marquesate of Llombai mulberry plantations accounted for 11
per cent of the irrigated land in 1581, rising to as much as 36.6 per cent in 1699,
not counting the trees scattered here and there in other fields.30 Curiously, perhaps,
Valencian mulberry was always irrigated, which produced an abundant leaf but
may have harmed its quality. Nevertheless, it was clear that by the end of the old
regime large sections of the Valencian peasantry were being kept alive by the
products they sold in the urban market.
Wine and mulberry are two of the more spectacular success stories, but everywhere
we can find the penetration of cash-crops into the villages. Elx, short of water for
wheat, had an abundance of olive and sodawort which combined to give a good
soap much in demand abroad; and her neighbour Crevillent wove the esparto
grass of her arid territory into mats and sandals, ancestor of the later shoe industry
in that region. The villages of La Mancha also give the impression of being very
much in contact with the outside world, according to their replies to the government
inquiry—the Relaciones—of 1575–8. Generally well supplied with bread and wine of
their own, they had often to import their timber, fish, iron, even their olive oil,
and sometimes their fruit and vegetables. Manzanares, with its 700 mostly peasant
families, ‘brings in its olive oil from Andalusia and its fish from Seville, Cartagena
and Malaga, and iron for its ploughs…from Vizcaya, and wood from Alcaraz and
Cuenca and Tierra de Segura and other parts, and its silk and other merchandise
from Toledo and elsewhere’.31 The huge consumption of candles in processions
and illuminations of houses during fiestas demanded an abundant supply of wax,
and considerable attention is devoted in the pages of Viciana (1563–4) to an inventory
of the beehives scattered over the kingdom of Valencia. In many of the highland
parts of the same territory there were the caves, eight or nine metres deep, where
snow was packed over the winter, from where it was ferried down to the scorched
plain in summer to keep food fresh.
But the most important of these now half-forgotten rural exchanges was
surely that in salt. Salt was a vital commodity in so many ways: ‘The supply
55
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
of salt is very necessary and important,’ affirmed the Valencian Cortes of 1563,
‘both for the life of man and for the preservation of the herds, and [as part of]
other kinds of food.’ It had been a monopoly of the Crown in Valencia and the
rest of the Crown of Aragon since the Middle Ages, and it became one in
Castile in 1563. Spain had good salt-pans along its coast and was, indeed, one
of the principal sources of supply for the rest of Europe. But the commodity
itself was so basic and yet located in so few places that its distribution always
caused great concern. The poor functioning of the royal monopoly in the kingdom
of Valencia—the scarcity of supply and high prices in the original nine gabelles
or salt depots—called forth constant complaints in the Cortes of the sixteenth
and seventeenth centuries.
Overall, trade seemed vital to the peasantry. Not more than one household
in thirty, claimed the Cortes of Castile in 1579–82, could get by with just what
it grew for itself. Towards the middle of the seventeenth century the economic
writer Francisco Martínez de Mata stressed the value of manufactures to the
peasantry. The land was finite, and peasant fathers needed other resources if
they were to place their children in life. It was from their cottage industries of
serge and worsteds that ‘they paid for the cost of ploughing and upkeep of
their herds, and for the furnishing of their houses, and gave work to their
poorer neighbours’. Already the Cortes of 1579–82 had conjured up the image
of the hill country round the great weaving towns of Segovia, Cuenca and
Toledo, where the putting-out industry meant that ‘there was no man or woman,
however old or useless they might be, nor boy or girl of whatever age, who
would not find a means of livelihood’ —before the rise of taxation had destroyed
the manufactures.32
No doubt it would be a mistake to generalise from these impressions, which
were often designed to plead a special case. An insight into the real obstacles to the
full integration of the rural economy into the market system comes from the splendid
account of the three villages of the marquesate of Llombai in the kingdom of Valencia,
written by the governor of that estate, Francisco Benlloch, for his mistress the duchess
of Gandia in 1756. The population of 597 families had excellent raw silk and good
wine for sale, and they lay along the main route from Castile to Valencia, which in
those days passed through Almansa and Xàtiva. They also needed to buy much of
their bread, vegetables and clothes. But trade was sluggish, as the governor noted,
depending on the visits of itinerant traders who would charge a third more for what
they had to sell than the goods were worth. The need was for shops, where goods
could be stored all the year round; but these required capital.33 Also the local silk
was sometimes available for sale and sometimes not.
Not long after, Jovellanos gives us yet another perspective on the limitations
of the rural economy based on his observations of 1782 in the course of a journey
to his native Asturias. Rural manufactures were everywhere: the villages made
their own ‘linen, serge, rough clothes and sackcloth, hides, stockings, and all
that goes to clothe and shoe a person, together with furniture, crockery and
56
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
rural tools’. Yet this rural industry could not create enough employment to retain
the young people. The peasants needed to be able to sell more to the urban
market, and for that technology and capital needed to be brought in to show
them how to make good-quality articles out of the wood, iron and flax in which
their region was rich.34
The more general problem over most of Spain was simply the blockages in the
distribution of the basic product: grain. Grain was a crop which often had to be
traded like any other. Large amounts accumulated in the barns of the feudal lords,
landowners, tithe-farmers and royal bailiffs awaiting a purchaser. The trade in tithes
often seemed particularly obnoxious, and there were attempts to limit the right of
the clergy to export bread from the local community and sell it where the price was
higher. Such a conflict had surfaced already in one petition of the Valencian Cortes
of 1533. And it underlay much of the indignation of the great Valencian jurist Tomás
Cerdán de Tallada against tithe-farmers, who speculated in a commodity which
piety would reserve for the poor. The Valencian peasants were not self-sufficient,
he noted in his treatise of 1604. Harvesting their wheat in June, they had to sell it
cheap in order to pay rents and debts which were generally due at Saint John’s Day
(24 June); but then they had to buy it back at an inflated price in the autumn for
sowing.35 It was a similar problem which the deputy for Soria highlighted in the
Cortes of Castile in 1623: the peasants ‘ordinarily sell the wheat which they harvest
in August in order to pay their debts, and during the remainder of the year they
buy it again at a dearer price both for seed and to keep themselves fed’.
The grain trade never functioned smoothly. In the first place the transport of
such a bulky commodity by land always posed problems. The economic writer
Fernández Navarrete noted in 1626 how difficult it was for Andalusia to get supplies
from neighbouring La Mancha in time of need, and coastal regions like Andalusia
or Valencia looked more to Sicily or North Africa. Even within the same region
the situation was little better. The magnificent records of the administration of
the royal third of the tithe (tercio diezmo) in Valencia show the bailiffs battling to
dispose of their stocks. With wheat quoted at 21 shillings per fanega in Alcoi in
1625 and 28 shillings in Valencia city about 100 kilometres to the north, the Treasury
thought that the transport to the capital would eat up the difference and authorised
sale locally. Still in the middle of the nineteenth century the famous political economist
Pascual Madoz commented that the poor state of the roads round Baena in the
province of Cordoba—mudbaths in winter, narrow mule-tracks in summer—‘explains
why prices are so low, particularly of wheat and olive oil, which have to be carried
abroad on mule-back at great expense’.36
For much of the early modern period there was a moral aversion anyway to
free trade in grain. Pedro de Valencia noted in 1605 that bread could not simply
be left to the free play of market forces: ‘We should consider only how many
working days ought in justice to be given for a measure of corn so that the
labourer may support himself.’37 So the government adopted the tasa, a maximum
price for grain, first in 1502 and then definitively from 1539. It exempted the
57
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
northern provinces to a depth of ten leagues (about 56 kilometres) inland from
the Cantabrian coast, because they were so short of wheat at the best of times.
Cold regions of millet and cider, commented Pedro de Medina in 1545, the
Basque Country and Asturias had to import whatever wheat and wine they
consumed from overseas. The tasa did not operate either in the Mediterranean
provinces of Catalonia and Valencia, partly because they were under a different
political jurisdiction and party because of their dependence on the grain markets
of Sicily and North Africa. The maximum price which was set for the grain of
the central tableland had to be adjusted periodically upwards during the sixteenth
century, from its original level of three Castilian reales per fanega in 1502 to
eighteen a century later in 1605. There was a battle raging for much of this
period between those who believed that a maximum price was essential for a
well-ordered commonwealth and those who feared the damage being done to
agriculture.
The debate reached a peak of intensity in the later sixteenth and early seventeenth
century. Only the peasant and the poor respect the tasa, claimed the deputy for
Cordoba in the Cortes of 1593, while his colleague from Murcia informed the
session of 1583–5 that priests in his town were advising parishioners that they
could sell licitly at whatever the market price was across the border in tasa-free
Valencia. Already in 1569 the great Dominican economist Tomás de Mercado
had urged priests to be more strict with those who came to them in confession
and said they could not respect the tasa—‘for if I keep the law and offer less, [the
other party] will find two thousand people who will give him even more; so I,
wishing to be good, find I cannot buy’.38 Meanwhile the Crown, revising the maximum
price in 1571, decreed that those who hoped to escape the pains of the law—strict
enough since offenders were to be banished from the kingdom for two years and
lose half their property at the third offence—might recall the ‘chief penalty’ which
was ‘the threat to their own consciences’.
In fact, under a barrage of criticism, the tasa had to be revoked in 1619. Reimposed
briefly in 1628, it was finally revised in 1632 to exempt the farmer from any maximum
for his own grain, while insisting that middlemen must not sell at above the old
ceiling of eighteen reales per fanega, Estimating the actual impact on agriculture of
these measures is not easy. As Fernández Navarrete observed in 1626, ‘a man who
sells his wheat in Seville at eighteen reales is giving it away for less than someone in
Tierra de Campos who sells for only twelve’. Tierra de Campos was the granary of
Old Castile, where wages and the cost of living were much lower than in Seville. One
was allowed to add transport costs on to the price at the point of sale, which eased
some of the bottleneck and no doubt made it difficult to enforce the maximum exactly.
Perhaps in the end the most damaging aspect of the tasa was that it brought law itself
into disrepute. The massive study of prices by Hamilton estimated that fewer than
half the grain transactions in New Castile and Andalusia were observing the maximum.39
Inevitably, though, it was left to the Enlightenment, as in the rest of Europe, to
begin the dismantling of controls on trade, with the spread of the opinion that the
58
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
prosperity of the society as a whole could be best assured by leaving producers
free to get the highest profit they could for their goods. The count of Campomanes
was the main force behind the government decision to abolish the tasa and remove
restrictions on the movement of grain in 1765. In spite of food riots in Madrid
and other towns in 1766 the government held firm. But the transition to a market
economy was not an easy one. Most of the provincial corregidores reported in
1769 that the peasantry were generally too poor to benefit, having to sell their
stock cheap, as always, just after the harvest to speculators who cornered the
market. The authorities had to intervene periodically to prevent dearth—as in
Granada in 1780, in time of drought, when they prudently set a ceiling of 64 reales
per fanega on the wheat which shortly before had been selling for 15.40 The old
moral commonwealth was clearly being disbanded, but perhaps not with such
self-assurance as in Hanoverian England.
One of the major symptoms of the disorder in rural society, lamented by
early modern observers—at once a feature of urbanisation and a handicap to
further progress in that direction—was peasant debt. The villages were short of
ready cash. The farmer needed two or three years’ credit, estimated the Castilian
Cortes of 1623, if he was to buy a yoke of mules for ploughing. In 1626 the
Valencian Cortes were deploring the haste with which the collectors of the Bull
of Crusade did their work. The Bull had been granted by the popes to the kings
of Spain to support the wars against the Moors, and amounted to a concession
to eat dairy products in Lent in return for contributions to the crusade. It was
one of the few taxes to be collected throughout Spain as a whole, and involved
the peasantry digging into their pockets for cash. Sold by the preachers who
came round just before Lent, in January and February, the Bull had then to be
paid for in August after the harvest; but the peasants had not always their money
ready in time. The great memorandum of 4 December 1593 to the Cortes of
Castile, denouncing the widespread problem of peasant debt, referred to some
of the causes: the traditional need to buy seed and cattle, but a new, more sinister
contact with the mores of the town and its luxuries. No one should lend money
to the peasants, ‘which is the ruin of such an innocent and useful body of people’,
nor sell them on credit ‘gold or silver or copper or sugar or spice, or any other
merchandise beyond those which they usually and customarily consume’. Some
years later Lope de Deza, in a general tirade against the invasion of the provinces
by luxury— ‘where once two tailors were enough, now they need twenty’ —signalled
the imitation of urban dress and the recourse to lawsuits by the peasantry as
particular problems.41
The author went on to point out one of the traps associated with the rural
market: peasants could never guarantee regular payments ‘because of the uncertainty
of the harvests and the illness or death of their livestock’. The envy traditional in
small-scale communities led to the increasing use of lawyers and courts to fight
vendettas. And, concluded Lope de Deza, ‘the moth and worm which are really
eating away at the villages and peasantry are the messengers of the courts and the
59
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
bailiffs and the investigating officers who day after day descend upon them and
out of small quarrels and debts make huge gains’.42 Concern about the growing
army of bailiffs and notaries who were battening upon the peasantry underlay
much of the legislation of the Valencian Cortes between 1533 and 1645. Those of
1547 wanted to stop the summoning of people from their own communities to
appear before the royal courts in Valencia city for debts in respect of ‘wheat,
livestock, and other merchandise [like] clothes and hoods’. Those of 1552 and
1563 directed their attention to the tithe-farmers, that new scourge created by the
speculation in grain, and tried to stop their recourse to the bishop’s court against
defaulting peasants. And there was a wave of petitions in the Cortes of 1645
against notaries and bailiffs sent out from the central courts in Valencia city to
distrain on local communities, and whose costs were alleged to be greater than
the sum of the original debt.
Following the major petition of the Castilian Cortes of 4 December 1593, the
peasant was exempted from the seizure of his person during the main harvest and
sowing period from July to December, except in respect of money owed to his
landlord, the king or the person who had lent money for the sowing in the first
place. Also, at no time could ploughs or draught animals be seized for debt. When
a law of 1623 extended the protection of the peasant’s person to the whole year—
following a recommendation of Lope de Deza—the deputy for Toledo warned that
this might actually harm agriculture, since fewer people would now risk lending
money to farmers. In the kingdom of Valencia there was a similar law but it only
applied to the underpopulated frontier of Orihuela (1604). When the Cortes of
1645 tried to extend its provisions to the whole kingdom the government turned
down the request on the grounds that money-lenders had already taken enough
of a beating themselves in recent years.
In general, the whole saga of rural debt seems to highlight the misery of a
peasantry which continued to hold on to its lands while carrying an increasing
burden of debt. There was no neat transfer of property from the peasant to the
capitalist entrepreneur. Many thousands of acres of very good land lie waste, complained
the Valencian Cortes of 1645, and no one will farm them ‘for fear of the quantity
of debts and mortgages that lie on them’. The estelionato—that is, the unregistered
or unknown mortgage which is suddenly presented to an unsuspecting purchaser—
‘only serves to enrich the notaries and solicitors’, thought Fernández Navarrete,
and he went on to deplore the investment of so much capital in private or public
loans, ‘to the neglect of ploughing and the rearing of livestock, which used to be
regarded as the only true wealth’.43 How much better it would be, affirmed Lope
de Deza shortly before, if those with capital would buy out the land instead of
saddling the peasant farmer with mortgages.
In fact, in the case of those transfers of property which did take place, one may
wonder what really changed in terms of peasant farming. The great bugbear of
the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries was the mohatra, the fraudulent sale. One
aspect of the practice was denounced by the Cortes of 1586–8—the alienation of a
60
THE LIMITS OF A PEASANT ECONOMY
field or an animal by a peasant at half the price it was worth on condition he
could continue to use it for a few more years. At this point the study of the economy
leads the historian into the domain of social structure—the pattern of landholding
and the feudal system itself—which we shall examine more fully below. But the
misery of the indebted villages cannot be fully understood without reference to
the context of the economy as a whole, and it is to this that we must now turn.
61
4
TREASURE AND THE COST
OF EMPIRE
The search for bread and clothes, thought Caxa de Leruela in 1631, was at the
origin of the civilising process, distinguishing men from brute beasts. Particularly
in order to keep himself clothed man discovered his need for cooperation with his
fellows, ‘and thus, divinely inspired, [natural reason] invented commerce and trade
between peoples’, and out of this had developed the commonwealth itself ‘with its
division of tasks and its hierarchy of ranks, wonderful to behold’.1
 As one follows
the early geographers and travellers round the peninsula one cannot but admire
the ingenuity which, before the age of machines, helped to create an urban civilisation.
Pedro de Medina lovingly describes the iron-working of the Basque Country, the
ore ‘smelted with a great quantity of charcoal’, then pounded with great hammers
driven by water-wheels. Three hundred small foundries, each producing ‘at least’
46 tons, worked to equip the ships of nearby Bilbao and the king’s army. His
contemporary, Viciana, found the 200 families of Calig, a hill town on the road
from Valencia to Catalonia, active in making ‘arquebuses and shotguns and all
kinds of sharp metal tools’ —of which not a trace remained two hundred years
later when Cavanilles visited the place. And the 1,100 households of Puertollano
in New Castile boasted to the king’s commissioners in 1575 about their excellent
woollens, which had provided Philip II himself with his swaddling clothes when
he was a baby.2
In a pre-industrial economy most industry consisted of the transformation of
the fruits of the earth into food for the table, of the building of houses, castles and
churches (the cathedral of Granada was a great work-site for 180 years between
its inception in 1523 and its completion in 1704), and of the clothing of people.
The great variety of regional dress, commented upon still by Ponz and Jovellanos
in the 1780s, reflected the dispersal of the clothing trades. In the little kingdom of
Valencia one could recognise the peasant of the lowlands by his canvas breeches,
whereas the men of the sierras generally dressed in wool. Some of these manufactures
achieved what might be called national importance. Segovia, close to the shearing
stations of the Mesta and therefore to the best merino wool, increased its production
dramatically over the sixteenth century from around 3,000 to as many as 16,000
cloths a year, each cloth measuring some 33.4 metres in length.3
 These woollens
62
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
were finely woven, packing 2,200 threads into the warp (as compared with 1,800
or less for common varieties), and won the praise even of Barthélemy Joly (1603–
4), who had not much else good to say about Spanish manufacture. At the same
time Cordoba was producing some 17,000–18,000 cloths, which would place her,
with Segovia and perhaps Cuenca among the great European centres of woollen
production in the sixteenth century.
Other cities—Toledo, Granada, Valencia—had developed a speciality in silk. So
great is the silk industry in Granada, wrote Pedro de Medina, that ‘almost all the
common people earn their living from it’. In later seventeenth-century Valencia, a
city of 50,000 people, some 4,000 were employed directly in the silk manufacture
and another 12,000—‘including many widows and poor girls’ —indirectly through
spinning at home, according to the calculations of the silk guild itself. The mulberry
leaf was normally picked about Saint Joseph’s Day (19 March), which is still a
red-letter day in the local calendar because of the celebrated festivity of the Fallas.
The grubs fed on the leaves between then and the first week in May when the
delicate business of unravelling the cocoons and giving a first twist to the thread
could begin. Much of this was done by peasant families, who had to fit it into
their own calendar; in particular, they aimed to finish and sell the thread by Saint
John’s Day (24 June) when they would need cash to pay their landlord.4
 The
whole process involved a considerable degree of care and skill. The lofts where
the grubs spun their cocoons had to be kept clean and at the right temperature. If
the silkworms were packed in too tightly, two or three cocoons might get enmeshed,
leading to damaged or poor-quality thread.
Pre-industrial manufacture was built up almost like a house of cards, and liable
to collapse if one of its constituent elements was removed. The early modern
period echoed to complaints about the decline of Spanish industry. The dire straits
of the great old woollen manufactures of Castile seem to be well documented.
From 600 looms at its peak around 1580 Segovia dropped to 300 by the middle of
the seventeenth century and half that figure by the beginning of the next. There
were similar complaints of decline in Cordoba around 1600, and in Cuenca as
early as the Cortes of 1577. Ponz found the woollen industry of Baeza just a memory
by the end of the old regime, the sleepy little town cluttered with the monuments
of past glory, while in Cordoba only common baize survived of the great woollen
and silk manufacture of the sixteenth century. In Segovia, once the heartland of
Castilian industry, only 5,000 pieces of cloth were still being turned out, barely a
third of the old total. ‘Perhaps half of Toledo is in ruins,’ observed Ponz of the
former capital of Castilian silk-weaving, ‘with just heaps of bricks and broken
tiles where once there were houses.’5
Not all was gloom. Valencia had recovered from her seventeenth-century woes
and was a major silk manufacturer again. But the industry was still beset by problems
of poor-quality thread, which made it uncompetitive with the fashionable silk goods
of Lyon. Significantly, almost all of the production was destined for the Spanish market;
only a tiny proportion—50,000 of 2,300,000 yards—could be exported, and that just
63
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
to the Spanish colonies. Something similar could be said of that other success story of
the eighteenth century, the development of a cotton manufacture in Catalonia, whose
expansion also depended on a protected market in Spain and America.
What seems to have happened over the early modern period was a significant
weakening of the front-line industries—those which had once a national and international
market—and a reversion instead to smaller centres. Ponz in the 1780s noted the
prosperity of the 1,000 families of Béjar, who exported their woollens throughout
Castile and even to the Indies. Shortly afterwards Cavanilles wrote of Alcoi: ‘Everywhere
you go you hear the continual clicking of the looms, and the streets and squares are
half-covered with wool which has just been dyed.’ These smaller towns may have
been growing in the eighteenth century because they had less rigid guild controls
on manufacture than the older centres. On the other hand, it is not clear that they
were really able to compensate for the decline of Toledo, Segovia, Cuenca and Granada.
Already in 1557 the Venetian ambassador Badoero commented that the Spaniards
were exporting too much of their fine wool abroad in a raw state, ‘and then come to
fetch from these countries [of Western Europe] cloth to wear and tapestries’. Laws
were passed to help the manufacturer, who was allowed in Castile from 1462 to buy
back at cost price any wool once sold, and in Valencia from 1571 to have first pick
of half the wool clipped anywhere in the kingdom. But it has been shown that the
wool-exporters were often the same people as those who invested in the manufacture
itself.6
 Castile always remained one of the great suppliers of fine raw wool to the
rest of Europe—3,000 tons a year in the later sixteenth century, with the fall in the
Flanders market being compensated by the growing demand of the Italians (reflected
in the expansion of the port of Alicante), then a decline to well under 3,000 tons as
the Italian industry itself went into recession, before the revival later in the seventeenth
century to cater to the broadcloth manufacture of England and Holland. By the
eighteenth century Castile was exporting more raw wool than ever before—some
5,000 tons a year, according to the admittedly approximate estimates.7
The silk industry had a somewhat similar profile. Here the raw material was
derived from the cocoons spun by grubs which fed on the leaf of the mulberry
tree. Mulberry had been planted extensively in south-eastern Spain from the later
Middle Ages. The Granadans were renowned for the black mulberry (moral) grown
in the hill country, while the Valencians and Murcians produced the faster-growing
white mulberry (morera), grown in the lowlands and irrigated, which gave a more
abundant but fragile thread. The Granadan industry was the jewel in the crown,
being almost as tightly regulated and taxed by the government as the wool of the
Mesta. It was doubly unfortunate, therefore, that it depended so heavily on Morisco
cultivators and spinners, expelled after the great rebellion of 1568, and that government
attempts to maintain quality and quantity of production among the new Christian
settlers only led to alienation and evasion. The rearing, unravelling and spinning
of cocoons was always a risky process anyway, and it was complicated in the case
of Granada by strict rules about planting only black mulberries, about allowing
tax inspectors into one’s house to check on every stage of production, and about
64
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
only selling the raw silk through special brokers in the great walled silk-market
(alcaicería) of the city of Granada.8
Even in the freer lands of Murcia and Valencia the supply of raw silk was not
easy. Bad harvests and the Morisco rebellion in Granada doubled its price in
Valencia between 1570 and 1600, leading to imports from the Indies—the Acapulco
route to Manila having just then been opened for the first time. Valencia was torn
between a desire to get raw silk for her weavers from whatever source, and the
aim of protecting her mulberry plantations. The city negotiated with Murcia an
interesting measure of protection, which is one of the earliest expressions of Spanish
economic unity, which came into force in 1617 excluding foreign silks, and especially
raw silk, from the tierra firme (mainland) of Spain. Protesting against this restriction
on supply of the raw material, the silk-weaving centre of Toledo reminded the
Cortes of 1620 that the kingdom of Valencia ‘has no greater right [sc. of privileged
access to the Castilian market] than the others we have been talking about, like
China, Naples, Sicily or Italy’.9
A decree of 1699 forbidding the export of Spanish raw silk took protectionism
a stage further, and was reissued several times in the eighteenth century. But it
had to be relaxed after 1760, in response to the concerns of mulberry-growers to
find a market for their crop. And after 1784 the old restriction on the import of
foreign raw silk was also lifted, no doubt in response to the abundant production
at home. For the curve of domestic supply seems to have followed a familiar pattern:
400,000 pounds of raw silk produced in Valencia round 1580, falling to 200,000
during the following century of recession (figures from 1721), but reviving to well
over 1,000,000 by 1769.10 As with raw wool, those who exported silk raw were
often those who supplied the capital, when the opportunity presented itself, to
have the material woven locally.
The growing reluctance to invest in domestic manufacture seems to have much
to do with its perceived uncompetitiveness. The level of skill in the Spanish clothing
trades called forth some critical comments from foreign observers. Townsend thought
that Segovian woollens had gone into decline because ‘the thread is not even…and
there is a lot of grease left on it when they give it to be dyed’, while Ponz made a
somewhat similar point, blaming the use of cheaper bits of the fleece, where the
wool was broken and too full of grease. Cavanilles criticised a certain lack of skill
in the way Valencians spun and dyed both wool and silk, and Townsend thought
that French silks won out because they had a superior thread and design.11 It is
not easy to be sure. The decline of Segovia was partly due to the shift from expensive
broadcloth—her staple industry—to the cheaper New Draperies—serges and worsteds—
which dominated early seventeenth-century Europe. A similar crisis perhaps overtook
Valencian velvet as the European fashion in the seventeenth century shifted towards
lighter taffetas and satin. Valencia recovered quite well, after a series of hiccoughs.
But there may have been, as Townsend thought, a certain timidity or backwardness
when it came to design. That great statesman of the Enlightenment, the count of
Campomanes, paid considerable attention to raising the educational level of the
65
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
Spanish artisan: ‘fine and delicate wares he cannot make…which is why all of
these, even furnishings and clothes, generally come from outside the kingdom’.12
The Venetian ambassadors often remarked that while Spain produced some excellent
items—the broadcloths of Segovia and the velvets of Valencia—these were exceptions
in a country which basically lacked an urban infrastructure.
A fundamental belief in early modern Europe generally was that the quality of
the product would ensure its sale. The government laid down the basic norms for
the weaving of woollen cloth in Castile in 1511, and deputies from Castile met
those of Valencia in 1684—in another early example of Hispanic economic cooperation—
in order to establish rules for the manufacture of silk.13 From the thirteenth century,
especially in the Mediterranean states of Valencia, Catalonia and Mallorca which
were more in touch with the towns of Europe, one can see the lineaments of
guilds beginning to take shape, from at least two directions. In the first place the
local authorities appointed, or asked groups of workers to elect, veedores who would
check the quality of manufactures coming on to the market. Secondly, from below,
charitable brotherhoods (cofradías) began to take root among urban workers—a
remedy for human weakness and sinfulness, as the Cortes of 1329 put it, legalising
those of Valencia.14 During the fifteenth century these brotherhoods were given
more responsibility for the regulation of work. From 1392, for example, no one
could become a silversmith in Valencia without belonging to the local guild. Examinations
began to be introduced for membership—for the shoemakers, for example, in 1458.
There followed piecemeal regulations for apprenticeship (often four years in Valencia,
but varying according to the trade and the age of the entrant), and for the passage
from apprentice to oficial or journeyman (who must be no younger than eighteen,
according to some guild regulations). In Castile, which was less urbanised, similar
developments were taking place from at least the fifteenth century. In towns like
Cuenca where there were important manufactures, the woollen masters elected
their own veedores from 1421; but in Cordoba and Malaga the town councils seem
to have kept greater control over the quality of the product, its price and even the
requirements of the master’s examination.15
‘If a shoemaker comes along with new tools,’ wrote the fourteenth-century
political philosopher Eiximenis, ‘and makes 70 shoes in a day where others make
20…that would be the ruin of 100 or 200 shoemakers’, and the interest of the
commonwealth, would require defence of the 200.16 In the pursuit of this moral
community the carpenters of Valencia ruled that the bigger saws of the wealthier
guildsmen must be available for use by the poorer brethren, and quotas of wood
were reserved for them. The tanners drew their hides from a guild warehouse,
and each was limited to a quota; while the mattress-makers forbade any of their
members to put more than three mattresses out for sale at any one time.17 There
were similar limitations in force elsewhere: no silk-spinner in Granada could keep
more than two machines with up to 200 spindles on each, and no weaver could
have more than four looms. Some guilds also restricted the number of apprentices
a master could have at any one time—generally not more than three.
66
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
This attempt to preserve a stable local community began to buckle under the
pressures of the market. In Segovia a sizeable number of weavers had to lease their
looms in the sixteenth century off merchants, and virtually all worked for a few big
men who supplied them with the raw wool and saw to the sale of the finished cloth.
Recalling the reception for Philip II’s bride in Segovia in 1570, the chronicler Colmenares
noted that the weavers turned out on foot but the ‘dealers in wool and manufacturers
of cloth’ on horseback, ‘men who run a kind of family, giving a livelihood to a large
number of people inside and outside their own houses, many of them having 200
or even 300 in their employment, working up a wide variety of very fine cloths’.18
The Relaciones of 1575 speak of the silk merchants of Toledo who sometimes sold
silk raw but at other times gave it out to be spun, dyed and woven by the local
craftsmen, ‘and this work is usually in the charge of a single merchant from start to
finish, but sometimes is shared between two, one taking care of the spinning and
another the dyeing and weaving’. In Cordoba the merchants controlled the supply
of raw silk since it had to be imported from some distance away; but the numerous
flocks of the sierra gave the villagers abundant wool to spin and weave, and the
merchants were content to buy the cloth off them, taking it to the city to be fulled
and dyed. But after 1580 merchants are found advancing money to the peasants,
who seem to be falling more into dependence upon them.19
In general this kind of mixed system of capital and the household economy
seems to have prevailed in the chief manufacturing areas, though there were sometimes
attempts, as in the rest of seventeenth-century Europe to bypass the guilds. In
Catalonia control of the woollen industry had largely passed into the hands of the
paraires, originally carders or dressers of raw wool, whose power seems to have
arisen from their being the first to buy up the fleeces. They would put out spinning
and weaving to the appropriate guilds on piece-rates. But a crisis arose towards
1600 when the weavers demanded higher rates, and the magistrates of Barcelona
intervened to allow weaving by non-guild labour, though refusing (1614) to let
rural labourers wash and comb the raw wool.20 The town councils, generally run
by patricians, were careful as in other parts of Europe not to upset the social
balance by allowing freedom of employment.
Even in the eighteenth century, when the guilds came to be perceived as a drag
on economic innovation, statesmen were careful to preserve a role for them. Campomanes
saw them as useful educators of the craftsman, and as a rudimentary police force,
in his great treatise of 1775. A decree of 1789 freed woollen weavers to adopt
whatever technique they chose, but required each to affix his name and town to
the piece of cloth, reserving the guild seal for those which conformed in weight
and number of threads to the official regulations. Still towards the end of the Old
Regime the economy was visualised in conservative terms, as part of the maintenance
of the worker’s family and of a well-ordered community.
The prevailing localism of the Spanish economy is aptly symbolised by the
diversity of weights and measures. The city of Toledo asked for their standardisation
in 1758 as the foundation ‘of a solid and stable national community’. Castile had
67
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
indeed started down this path as early as the thirteenth century, after the reconquest
of Andalusia, but it was left to Ferdinand and Isabella at the end of the fifteenth
century to consolidate the process.21 But the chief inspector could write in 1731:
‘Rare is the city, town or hamlet in which the weights or measures conform to the
standards of the kingdom.’ It proved to be a considerable technological challenge,
in fact, for small towns actually to fabricate accurate instruments for this purpose.
Vague units such as ‘loads’, ‘bags’ or ‘baskets’ continued to be employed in the
documents, to the frustration of statistically minded historians.
Local communities did come together through fairs—fixed times of the year at
which one could be sure of finding the difficult and delicate combination of goods
and money, supply and demand, together in one place. In 1693 the viceroy of
Valencia described that of the wool town of Ontinyent, ‘where they tell me that
more than 20,000 people will come together from inside and outside the kingdom,
often arriving in throngs from their villages and carrying arms in order to protect
the money they take with them’. Fairs were instituted by particular royal privileges,
and the government of Valencia seems to have been issuing more licences of this
kind than before in the later seventeenth century. In general, travellers would be
under safeguard against investigation for petty offences while attending; and they
would have some immunity from inspection of their baggage—no mean benefit in
an age of venal excise and customs officers, whose jurisdiction ran well inland
from the actual border crossings of Castile, Valencia, Portugal or elsewhere. Reduction
of the excise duty on sales often accompanied the great Castilian fairs; but the
Valencian town of Xixona was only allowed a fair in 1626 on condition that there
was no reduction of taxes to the Crown.
The greatest fair of them all was that of Medina del Campo. Recalling in 1606
its origins, the town referred to its strategic situation at the confluence of the
routes which led across the mountains from the Basque Country, Asturias and
Galicia towards the plateau of Castile (thence to link up with the old Roman road
running down the west side of the peninsula towards Seville). And it could guarantee
food for the itinerant merchant, and above all ‘a plentiful supply of wine from its
neighbourhood’.22 Here the dealers in wool for Flanders met with the importers
of goods from the Indies, and hospitals and convents from as far away as Toledo
had their agents to make purchases of cloth, groceries and medicine, in Medina
del Campo and the neighbouring fair towns of Medina de Ríoseco and Villalón.
Medina de Ríoseco now is a small market town, but it carries the marks of those
times of the year when it used to come alive with throngs of outsiders, whose
transactions provided the money to endow its three grandiose churches.
It was a feature of the successful fair that it gathered into itself many different
threads of communication. That of Tendilla, which lasted for a month from Saint
Mathias’s Day (24 February), served as a kind of equivalent to that of Medina del
Campo for the eastern Meseta. According to the Relaciones of 1575–8 it was the
natural meeting-place of the clothiers of Segovia, Cuenca and Soria who set out,
as the snows melted, with the fine woollens which they had woven over the previous
68
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
winter. A small town of under 3,000 inhabitants and now rather off the beaten
track, Tendilla must have benefited from the old Roman road which linked Mérida
and Zaragoza via Toledo, which the Visigoths had chosen as their capital. Goods
from the Indies—‘much spice, indigo, brasil wood and other novel and costly items’
—came up naturally along this route from Mérida and Seville, to meet one of
Spain’s chief imports from northern Europe, the fine linen of Flanders and France.23
Spain became one of the earliest economies to be exposed to the influx of
bullion on a scale which seemed to transform market relations. As the New World
began to yield up its enormous wealth of gold and especially silver, contemporary
observers became appalled at what they regarded as the destabilisation of fair
exchange. The clearest symptom of this was the rise in prices of commodities—
some fourfold over the sixteenth century. Inflation was associated with profiteering.
But in order to understand its impact, one had best start by exploring the role of
money in pre-industrial Spain.
In the first place there was no standard, universal currency in the modern
sense. As the Cortes of 1579–82 pointed out, copper coins circulated in the
countryside, especially in the poorer villages, which could not be exchanged
outside the locality except at a premium. And a few years later the papal envoy
Borghese noted how almost every village between Lleida and Barcelona had
its own fractional coinage, which made life difficult for the traveller. The good
coin of Spain was the silver real and the gold escudo. Minted separately in each
of the peninsular kingdoms, with different weights and fineness, they were
not easy to transfer. Frontier guards at each of the inland crossings checked—
or were supposed to check—the export of more coin than the traveller needed
for subsistence. Valencian reales were not acceptable in Castile anyway, but
their Castilian counterparts were highly valued everywhere else, except in Portugal,
an interesting symptom already of that country’s economic strength (derived
from its own empire), which would enable it to become politically independent
after 1640. In general silver and gold coins had some of the features of treasure,
and were liable to be hoarded or plundered.
American treasure created new opportunities and challenges, with enough silver
coming into Spain at the peak of the flow in the 1590s to pay for three weeks’
labour by every worker every year—undreamt of wealth for a pre-industrial society.24
But according to the Venetian ambassador Vendramin (1595) the Spaniards had a
saying about the silver from the Indies, ‘that it has just the effect on them that
rain does on the roof of a house’ —that it quickly runs off.25 In his classic treatise
on the new economy, the Dominican Tomás de Mercado wrote in 1569 that ‘in
Spain, the very source and fount of escudos and crowns, scarcely a handful can
be scraped together, whereas if you go to Genoa, Rome, Antwerp or Venice you
will see in the streets of the bankers and money-changers, without exaggeration,
as many piles of coins minted in Seville as there are piles of melons in San Salvador
or in the Arenal’. And the count of Gondomar, on his embassy to London at the
beginning of the seventeenth century, remarked that the only coins circulating in
69
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
that city were of silver whereas you would be hard-pressed to find any in Spain,
with incalculable damage to his country’s reputation.26
The moral theologians of the University of Salamanca began to analyse this
problem as part of their new interest in the corrosive effect of money on human
relationships. Some of them—Azpilcueta, Tomás de Mercado—were pioneers of
what would later be known as the quantity theory of money—that the more currency
there was in circulation, the less it was worth and the higher prices of other commodities
would be in relation to it. The traveller Barthélemy Joly put it succinctly in 1603:
‘Everything is dear in Spain except money’ —including wages, which attracted so
many of his French compatriots across the Pyrenees to make a living. In France,
noted Azpilcueta, ‘where money is scarcer than in Spain, bread, wine, cloth and
labour are worth much less’, and he decribed vividly the tendency of Spanish
coins to flow out to where they could purchase more, in return for manufactures
‘worth little there and here much’.
There were voices at the time telling the government to devalue in order to
make its currency less attractive to export. But as long as Spain remained an imperial
power it is difficult to see what the Crown could do other than maintain the full
value of silver coin, so essential to purchase services abroad. In order to remedy
the shortage of currency at home there was an increasing resort to vellón, an alloy
of silver and copper, or just copper alone. Initially its minting seemed a useful
way of catering to the increasing volume of domestic trade, and the Cortes of
1559 and 1583–5 approved. But then in 1586–8 one gets the first signals of alarm.
The Cortes now protested that there was too much vellón in circulation, the copper
and silver content of the coins worth only a quarter of their face value, which
meant that merchants were simply cutting off trade with communities which could
only settle their accounts with this debased currency. After the death of Philip II
an increasingly bankrupt monarchy resorted to the minting of pure copper, pouring
out great quantities of the stuff in the years 1599–1625. After 1625 the Crown
was too poor even to buy copper, and preferred to devalue the existing copper
currency. In 1636, for example, it called in coins for restamping upwards to three
times the original face value, pocketing the difference for the treasury.
It proved difficult enough to get people to surrender their coins for restamping,
especially since there were periodic reversals of policy in order to counter inflation
—the reduction of the face value of coins by 50 per cent in 1628, by 25 per cent in
1642. Vellón began to circulate by weight rather than by value, and was subject to
heavy discounts of around 50 per cent against its equivalent in silver. Not all of
Spain suffered by this disorganisation of the currency. Silver reals seem to have
circulated normally enough in Catalonia and Valencia, though they always carried
a premium of about 15 per cent if exchanged for the local vellón. As a result of the
treaties of 1648 and 1659 scaling down imperial commitments in northern Europe,
the Spanish government could afford to devalue slightly its magnificent silver
currency (1686). The passing of the imperial age is surely symbolised by the transition
from the peso—the ‘piece of eight’ (that is, eight reals, or ten after 1728) —to the
70
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
little peseta of two reals, a silver coin which could pay a labourer’s wages for half a
day.27 That is, silver no longer flowed abroad so much in payments to bankers
and soldiers but could be used at home; so vellón could be partly phased out, and
from 1680 its face value was reduced by three-quarters.
This stabilisation of the currency no doubt fostered the revival of the Spanish
economy in the eighteenth century, contributing to a spread of the internal market.
Silver coins themselves, of course, were notoriously vulnerable to hoarding and
theft, and the growth of the economy also depended on some extension of credit
facilities. Establishing the famous Taula or deposit bank of Valencia in 1408, King
Martin claimed that ‘people will relax and sleep who before, desirous of avoiding
the traps and tricks of thieves and robbers, would stay up and spend the night
wide awake’.28 The strongbox of the new bank was kept in the sacristy of the
cathedral, and when in 1628 the clergy protested against keeping it so close to the
relics of the saints it was shifted just a short distance away to a special chamber
upstairs. Neither it nor its equivalent of the same name in Barcelona were supposed
to do anything with the treasure other than keep it under lock and key, issuing
the depositor with an albarà—a certificate of his holding. In time the albarans began
to circulate as a kind of currency, transferring deposits from one citizen to another
to whom he owed money. But this nascent paper currency was largely aborted in
the seventeenth century, as the Taula began to spend more money than it had in
reserve. The successive bankruptcies of 1614, 1634 and 1649 in Valencia led to
the conversion of the promissory notes (the albarans) into non-redeemable bonds
on the muncipal treasury.
Castilian towns also had municipal deposits not unlike the Taulas. But the
chief instrument of credit in the peninsula was the letter of exchange (cambio),
which had arisen initially as a way of settling bills outside one’s place of residence
without the need to transport cash. One transferred a credit against a third party
in satisfaction of a debt. In 1594 the papal nuncio, Borghese, left a record of those
Spanish towns where one could cash in a letter of exchange before setting out on
the next stage of one’s journey. However, even at the end of the old regime Cabarrús,
founder of the state bank of San Carlos (1782), complained of the poor facilities
of exchange in the peninsula: ‘how many years would pass before you find one in
Cordoba for Zaragoza, or in León for Murcia?’29 The unfortunate traveller had
often no alternative but to carry his own box of coins around with him.
But in the sixteenth century there had been a marked quickening of the current
of credit at least along the chief routes of the New World economy. Gone were the
days when buyer and seller dealt with each other directly, wrote Tomás de Mercado
in 1571. Now men from Burgos handle their dealings with the Flemings through
agents in the American trades of Seville, and the threads of exchange criss-crossed
on a world scale, accounts having to be settled by the same man ‘in Cape Verde
for black slaves, in Flanders for linen goods, in Florence for woollens, in Toledo
and Segovia for textiles, in Lisbon for the produce of the East’. It was increasingly
hard, thought Mercado, to talk in terms of the fair price beloved of theologians,
71
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
for 93 ducats would purchase in Flanders what you would need 100 to buy in
Seville, or perhaps 130 to buy in Peru, the dearest place on earth because it was
so near the source of silver.30 The letter of exchange, therefore, might carry an
allowance for these differences. And through this chink a gradual breach was
made in the old law of usury which forbade a Christian to profit by the money he
advanced to another.
The early modern period witnessed in Spain as in the rest of Europe a new
attitude to the creation of wealth. The discovery of America provoked not only a
pioneering study of the rights of conquered peoples by theologians of the famous
university of Salamanca but also an exploration of the corrosive effects of silver
on human relationships in the middle years of the sixteenth century. The traditionalism
of many of these writers—Martín de Azpilcueta, Tomás de Mercado— should not
make us overlook the acuteness of their vision of the market economy and of the
powerful force of money. They were concerned fundamentally with the ethics of
human relationships. Their successors, the famous arbitristas of the early seventeenth
century—who also made a distinguished contribution to the nascent science of
economics—had other priorities, being called into existence by the crisis in public
finance at the time and the need to invent projects (arbitrios) which would stem the
apparent decline of taxable resources. Some of them were clergy, like Sancho de
Moncada, who explained in 1619 that poverty and idleness did ‘infinite harm’ to
the soul. But others—Ibáñez de Salt in Valencia (1638), Alvarez de Toledo in Castile
(1623) —were soldiers, and training in the logistics of warfare seems to have led to
a new respect for mathematics, statistics and the inventory of resources in Spain
and Europe generally in the seventeenth century. With their advent the art of
politics tended to become more secular in tone, and economic well-being rather
than morality the touchstone of a state’s success.
All of the Spanish economic writers could agree that the market economy was
a necessary and natural feature of civilisation. ‘If a man wants clothes, shoes,
food or drink, if he wants to study, work or relax’, wrote Tomás de Mercado, he
depends by the law of nature on cooperation and exchange with his fellows. But
there was concern that money might create imbalances in the commonwealth,
above all through the pursuit of ‘luxury’. Fernández Navarrete was concerned
about the contrast between the wealth of the court and the poverty of the vagabonds
on the streets of Madrid or of the peasantry. Population—following the classical
authors—was seen as the real wealth of a kingdom, and the fate of Rome at the
hands of the Barbarians seemed an awful warning to Spain.31
One way of tackling the imbalance was through legislation, limiting the amounts
people could spend on ‘luxuries’. The corregidores (regional officers of the Crown)
had reported in 1583 that there was too much money in circulation, ‘and people
now want delicacies at table and in their wardrobe, and spend far too much furnishing
their houses and carriages’.32 Sumptuary laws to restrict this unbridled consumption,
and to prevent the blurring of the hierarchy of birth by one of wealth, had been
advocated by the Cortes periodically since at least the 1570s. The government of
72
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
Philip IV made one last effort in 1623 to stay the rot, outlawing ruffs and the
embroidery of clothes, limiting the numbers of household servants and of grammar
schools (which led peasant sons into idleness as practitioners of the law), restricting
the size of dowries and closing down brothels. Simplicity of customs would hopefully
encourage the foundation of families, thereby promoting both population and the
productive activity which seemed to go with the artisan and peasant household.
The great enemy was always carestía —dearth—a tricky word which reflects the
preoccupation of the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries with rising prices. Inflation
was seen as corrosive, a symptom or a cause of the dissolution of communities
and of the hierarchy of ranks. It was an effect—as Mercado taught—of the new
abundance of bullion, but this, if not regulated, simply aggravated the old sins of
idleness, luxury and greed. Dearth might not only be tackled by an increase of
production but by a reform of manners.
An alternative view of the economy and its working began to surface in the
early seventeenth century. Gregorio López Madera, venerable elder statesman
and devout Catholic though he was, warned that ‘though frugality and temperance
are very good for an individual, they are not generally so for the commonwealth
itself. Luxury, after all, created employment. ‘What would be the use of growing
silk and working it up for sale if it were not to go towards beds, drapes and clothes?’
How would the ceremonial processions of the king or the church be celebrated ‘if
houses no longer had rich hangings’? Trade would fall off, as would the royal
excise duties, if there was too much puritanism.33 These ideas were taken up by
the economic writer and political agitator Francisco Martínez de Mata towards
the middle of the seventeenth century. But they really came into their own during
the secular age of the Enlightenment. The new school of political economy received
open support from the government, which in 1788 reprimanded the great popular
preacher, Fray Diego de Cádiz, for his ‘old-fashioned’ equation of economic individualism
with greed and selfishness.34
Nevertheless, statesmen continued to visualise the family household as the keystone
of a properly ordered economy. Echoing contemporary German cameralism, their
prime aim was to foster a healthy peasant and artisan population. Campomanes
warned that ancient Carthage had accumulated a specious prosperity through overseas
trade but failed to endure. By contrast contemporary Holland, England and Switzerland
seemed to demonstrate the virtues of a gradual increase of population and trade at
the grassroots through the founding of household enterprises by farmers and craftsmen.
Andalusia was poor, suggested Campomanes, in spite of its fertility, because it lacked
a network of medium family businesses in town and country; Galicia, more infertile,
abounded in population and was never in arrears with its taxes because the small
peasantry had at least each a cow and some cottage industry of linen.35
The Economic Societies of ‘Friends of their Country’, founded initially in the
Basque Country in 1765 and popularised in Campomanes’s treatise of 1774, were
to group members of the local elites who would foment good farming and handcrafts
in their districts by books and example. The market and its demands seem to
73
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
have been subordinated to that older ideal of establishing solid, moderate household
enterprises among the peasantry and artisans. Urging nobles and clergy to take a
lead here, Antonio Ponz suggested that economic initiatives were a form of patriotism:
‘It would be no small gain just to get rid of the multitude of beggars.’ Such men,
restoring the moral and physical well-being of their ‘patria’ were, as one of Ponz’s
correspondents put it, ‘just like the men who had first conquered it’ from the
Moor. Jovellanos, meanwhile, suggested that governments in the past had been
too concerned with the extension of overseas trade, involving their countries in
costly warfare, ‘that horrible scourge of humanity and particularly of agriculture’.36
But Jovellanos was aware of the importance of international trade too as fomenting
those luxury industries which would create full employment for a people. Pedro
de Medina had described his native country in 1548 as ‘the centrepiece of the
different areas of the globe’, set between Africa, Europe and the New World, whose
exploration by Iberian navigators was ‘such a marvellous event that since God
created the world there has been nothing to equal it’.37 The Venetian ambassadors
were also impressed. For Girolamo Soranzo in 1611 the lengthy coastline and the
strategic situation between the Mediterranean and the Atlantic meant that Spain
‘can call herself the emporium of the universe’. And Tomás de Mercado described
his native Seville as ‘the richest city without exaggeration in the entire globe’.38
With over 130,000 people at its peak in the early seventeenth century it was one
of the biggest urban conglomerations of its time.
Every year ships left there for South America in voyages which might take around
two months. They were organised increasingly in convoys as a security against
pirates, a system which acquired definitive form in 1564 under the supervision of
the Casa de Contratación (House of Trade), a government committee based in Seville.
The so-called Flota generally set out every April for Mexico and the great fair of
Vera Cruz, while the ‘Galleons’ left in August to pick up the treasure of Peru which
had been ferried up to the Isthmus of Panama. Both convoys would winter in the
Caribbean, heading home from their rendezvous at Havana the following spring.
Until the 1570s exports to the Indies were dominated by grain, oil and wine,
creating some prosperity in the countryside round Seville. But the quantities must
have been small: only 10 per cent of the Aljarafe, in the fertile Sevillian hinterland,
was olive plantation and another 10 per cent vineyard in the middle of the eighteenth
century.39 As the American colonies settled down and came to grow most of their
own food, they looked to Europe for manufactures. Valencian and Granadan silk
found an outlet, as did Catalan cotton in the eighteenth century. Indeed towards
the end of the eighteenth century Spain was able to supply just over half of the
value of exports to the Indies. But Spanish textiles always had a hard time competing
against French linen and silk or English and Dutch woollens. Return commodities
from the Indies included cochineal and hides, and, after the discovery of the route
from Acapulco to the Philippines in 1564, Chinese silks (until these were banned
from Spain in 1617). With the opening up of frontier areas of Latin America like
Colombia and Venezuela in the eighteenth century, cacao, tobacco and, of course,
74
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
sugar from the Caribbean islands began to join the list. But the chief export from
the Indies to Spain was bullion, particularly silver, which fell, though, from about
80 to about 56 per cent of the value of the cargoes over the eighteenth century.40
The mines of the Indies were private enterprises. The crown took a fifth of the
production for itself, and had a monopoly of the supply of mercury which the miners
needed in order to refine the silver ore. It also controlled, in part, the distribution
of labour. The Mexican miners made their own arrangements to hire Indians or
buy slaves, but the remote Peruvian workings of Potosí had to be supplied with
Indians conscripted under the mita, the old state labour of the Incas. The American
mines, in other words, were a complex mixture of commercial and non-commercial
principles. They required considerable capital and technology to exploit properly,
qualities which were perhaps not always forthcoming as the miners fell into debt
and subdivided their holdings among their children.41 After expanding greatly in
the sixteenth century to an average of 9,700,000 pesos per year in the 1590s, the
dispatch of treasure from America to Seville tended to fall slightly thereafter, before
dropping sharply after 1631–5. The nature and extent of the movement has been
the subject of considerable controversy. Whereas the House of Trade had been able
to keep conscientious records of imports for the first century or more of its existence,
the sheer pressure of imperial defence led to a fiscal levy on the convoys which
drove much of the trade with America into contraband. There seems to have been
a continuing high output from the American mines during much of the seventeenth
century. The government was having to spend more of its own share of the treasure
on administration and defence in the Indies, but private citizens seem to have been
exporting huge quantities back to Europe—only little of this was now entering the
record of the House of Trade based in Seville and (after 1717) Cadiz. But the best
estimates would suggest that treasure imports from the Indies to Europe had actually
risen from their old peak of the 1590s to 14,500,000 pesos a year in 1686–95 before
nearly doubling to 25,600,000 by 1786–95.42
Silver was merely—at least in the case of private silver—the purchase price for
commodities which were coming out to America from Europe. Though Spanish
goods had fallen as a percentage of this total during the seventeenth century,
Seville and then Cadiz managed to retain an important role as a staple for the
transatlantic commerce generally. There was some direct dealing between European
privateers and the Spanish Main, but less than one might think. Mostly French,
English and Dutch merchants preferred to trade peacefully through their middlemen
in the Andalusian ports. There was clearly a hiccough during the terrible years of
war of the early seventeenth century. But, after the government made peace on all
fronts by 1659 and abandoned its attempt to value cargoes for the escort duty
(avería), contenting itself from 1660 with selling pardons (indultos) to traders instead,
the actual navigation between Andalusia and the Indies seems to have become
buoyant once again. Overall tonnage of shipping stagnated in the later seventeenth
century, though it has been suggested that the value of the cargoes increased; but
between 1700 and 1778 the tonnage between Cadiz and the Indies tripled.43 The
75
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
latter expansion seems to have been helped by a liberalisation of the rules about
navigation. The old convoy system became less appropriate as Spain no longer
had to face buccaneers and privateers but increasingly the well-organised navy of
Great Britain. After 1740, with the outbreak of the War of Jenkins’ Ear, ships
from Cadiz had to be allowed singly to run the gauntlet of the English blockades.
The system worked well enough, perhaps, for it to be increasingly adopted in
peace-time as well, and after 1778 ships were allowed to set out individually from
all the major ports of Spain, and not just from Cadiz.
Luis Cabrera de Córdova, in his chronicle of 1599 to 1614, recorded faithfully
every autumn the arrival of the great fleets from the Indies. ‘Their coming has
caused great joy everywhere,’ he wrote in 1606, reflecting that their loss in a
storm the previous year had ‘impoverished many in Peru and Seville’; while in
1613 he noted that they had reached port ‘all safe, without damage from enemies
or the weather, thanks be to God’.44 His words remind us of the enormous effort
which Spain invested in the Indies trade, but prompt the question as to whether it
was all worth it. ‘In France, Italy and the Netherlands there are no mines of gold
or silver,’ wrote the arbitrista Fernández Navarrete in 1626, ‘but their numerous
populations drain all the treasure from Spain through their trade and crafts.’45
However, the conventional wisdom was that states must play an active role in
fostering the wealth of their citizenry through protectionism: prosperity and state
power marched hand in hand. ‘Warfare nowadays is no longer a matter of brute
force like a bull-fight or even a battle,’ wrote the count of Gondomar in 1619, but
rather of ‘seeing to the increase of our shipping and the weakening of the commerce
of our enemies.’ The English, he reported from his embassy at the court of James
I, boasted that, in the years since the peace treaty with Spain in 1604, ‘they had
transferred Seville, Lisbon and the Indies to London’.46
Spain adopted some laws protecting her native manufactures through the
exclusion of foreign textiles—notably in 1623. One of the problems about the
exclusion of foreign goods was that not all parts of the empire shared the same
interests. Toledo was angry about the exclusion of raw silk after 1617, which
aimed to protect Valencian and Murcian growers but which threatened to push
up prices for her own weavers: why should the kingdom of Valencia have greater
rights in the Castilian market, she wanted to know, than those of China or
Italy? And when Olivares tried to revive the trade of Catalonia and Valencia
with his proposed Levant Company of 1630, he was careful to specify that it
should not import pepper, clove or nutmeg ‘or other spices’ so as not to undermine
the trade of Portugal with the East round the Cape of Good Hope. There were
similar controversies across the Atlantic as the government tried to cut down
on the limited trade between Mexico and the Philippines, particularly trying
to stop Asian goods getting to Peru via Mexico (1631). Tariffs remained to cut
the empire into a multitude of self-contained regions. Attempts to remove the
(very recent) tariff barrier between Portugal and Castile after the union of the
two Crowns in 1580 came to grief by 1593, since the Crown was so desperately
76
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
in need of the customs revenue. In 1717 Philip V removed the customs barriers
between Castile and the Aragonese kingdoms after these had been defeated in
war; but it was not until 1778 that the almojarifazgo dividing Andalusia from
Castile was abolished, and not until 1840 that the Basque provinces were brought
within a national tariff.
The main concern of the Spanish governments was with interlopers in its protected
trade routes. It was hard in the so-called Age of Mercantilism to separate peace
from war, since states issued letters of marque to their merchants, authorising
reprisals against those of another country with which one was technically not at
war. Much of the activity of Drake and Hawkins in the Caribbean was carried on
in this twilight zone. Merchantmen had to go well armed and merged easily into
the privateer. From the later sixteenth century one can perceive a growing attempt
on the part of governments to grapple with this problem. Trade embargoes, tried
out in 1585 against the English and Dutch, and sharpened in 1603–4, seem to
have come into their own with the wars of Philip IV after 1621. In 1624 the
Admiralty of Seville was ordered to fit out ships to seize the carrying trade between
Spain and northern Europe from the Dutch. Between 1625 and 1628 this Almirantazgo
tribunal, now with its headquarters in Madrid, began to assert jurisdiction over
all parts of the peninsula, commissioning agents to investigate the export of bullion
and illicit trade with enemies of the Crown.
An old law of 1491 had required shippers arriving at the Basque ports to post
bail that they would export the equivalent within a year in Spanish products, in
order to avoid the drain of bullion abroad. This now became the justification for
the Almirantazgo commissioners exacting bail from foreigners in all Spanish ports
that they would export no coin and that they would not sail to countries with
which Spain was at war. Additionally, of course, all imports from the enemy were
banned. There were complaints that this degree of control was unworkable or
counterproductive. The Valencians complained that the declaration of war on
France in 1635 drove away Italians, English and Flemings at the same time ‘since
the dealings of merchants are so tied up each with the other’. Seville protested in
similar terms about the 200 or more small ships which came to Andalusia every
year looking for cargoes; these would not come any more if their captains were
asked to post bail. And anyway silver must be allowed out in payment of European
imports for the Indies, only half of whose value could possibly be met in equivalent
Spanish goods.47
The trade embargoes proved very difficult to enforce. The government itself
had to issue contraband licences from time to time, allowing in fine linen (of
which Spain was so short) from France, or authorising Dutch ships to visit the
precious Iberian salt-pans, since the Crown needed the tax revenue.48 Commissioners
in the ports seem occasionally to have turned a blind eye. When the agent in
Alicante, Marcos Antonio Bisse, began applying the letter of the law from November
1639 he was suspended after twelve months for acting ‘in such an excessive fashion
that no man can be found, native or foreigner, willing to do business in that port’.
77
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
Ultimately the restraining factor was the government’s fear of a collapse of its
revenues from import and export duties. Bartolomé Morquecho’s commission against
contraband in Seville in 1649 provoked revolt and was similarly brought to a
speedy end when the city offered the Crown 100,000 pesos to be rid of him.
Ultimately, as López Madera pointed out in 1621, it was very difficult for
Spain to enforce mercantilist laws because her trade and navigation were in foreign
hands. ‘Our harbours are full of English and Dutch ships,’ wrote Gondomar to
Philip III in 1619, ‘but in theirs there is not one Spaniard.’ There had been important
colonies of Spanish merchants in Bruges, Rouen and London in the early sixteenth
century, but these disappeared fast by the second half of that century for reasons
which merit further exploration. Commenting on this reversal of fortune, the city
of Toledo noted in 1620 that Spanish merchants were now too content ‘to buy off
the foreigner his wares on credit, selling these as middlemen, with Spain just a
kind of tavern where the foreigner conducts his business’.49
The Spanish coastline had generated an active seafaring tradition from early
times. The best natural havens were on the Atlantic side of the peninsula, and the
rías or fjords of Galicia provided the famed bases of the Spanish fleet in Vigo and
Corunna. But the Galician ports had a hinterland which, though rich in timber
for the dockyards, was too remote from the rest of Spain for any active trade to
develop. Urban Spain had developed naturally from the Mediterranean coastline
inland, and here, unfortunately, there were few outstanding harbours. Cartagena
was the best deep-water haven, and enjoyed a natural shelter from the wind, the
great scourge in those days of ships at anchor. But Cartagena was, like Galicia,
something of a finis terrae, with one of the most barren hinterlands in the peninsula.
Trade between Castile and Italy tended to use Alicante a little further north, once
an agreement of 1550 conceded a rebate of 50 per cent on the customs duty payable
at the Valencian border.
The biggest commercial centres along the Mediterranean coast—Barcelona, Valencia,
Malaga—could offer little protection to shipping. Boats rode at anchor in an open
bay, always on the alert for storms and Barbary corsairs, while their cargoes were
ferried to the beach in smaller skiffs. There were valiant attempts to build jetties.
Pedro de Medina admired the work underway in Malaga in 1548, ‘which when it
is finished will be one of the great monuments of the world’. Valencia had a wooden
jetty from the later fifteenth century, but it was rotting and unsafe. An effort to
build in stone, from 1685, swallowed great sums from the municipal budget and
involved Genoese as well as native engineers, but it had to be abandoned by 1698
in view of the persistent breaches made by the sea.50 Many of the Mediterranean
harbours suffered anyway from silting, which meant that stone quays would require
constant dredging in their vicinity if they were to be kept open. Bilbao, the staple
for the export of wool to Flanders, suffered greatly from a similar problem, and
silting eventually put Seville out of action as a port for the Indies, the big ships no
longer able to get up the Guadalquivir River and docking instead at Cadiz from
the middle of the seventeenth century.
78
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
In spite of all the handicaps imposed by nature, the coastal populations of
Iberia had used their native resources and talent to create a bustling maritime life,
though often on a small scale. Near Alicante there was the little port of Vilajoiosa,
which, as it told the Cortes of 1645, lives by ‘ploughing, fishing and transporting
goods’, its skippers touching in at harbours all along the coast as far north as
Tarragona, peddling fish, flour, brandy and garlic from one to the other. Nearby
Benidorm emerges from the pages of Cavanilles in 1795–7 with a rather similar
profile. Out of this grassroots activity had arisen the skill in seafaring which carried
Catalan, Mallorcan and Valencian sea-captains to Italy and the Levant in the course
of the thirteenth and fourteenth centuries, creating a trading empire which caused
their admiral Roger de Lauria to boast that no fish could cross the Mediterranean
unless its scales were marked with the four crimson bars of the House of Aragon.
On the Atlantic coast, meanwhile, the Cantabrian and Basque ships were fishing
for the whale from at least 1200, and carrying the wines of nearby Bordeaux to
northern Europe. The Admiralty of Castile was created about this time, and from
1300 the export of wool to Flanders found ready transport in the ships of Bilbao.
In the sixteenth century the Basques penetrated deep into the ocean, opening up
the cod fishing off Newfoundland.
To sustain this enterprise an important technology had to be mobilised. The
Barcelona and Valencia dockyards—the drassanes—are some of the finest surviving
examples of their kind from the fourteenth century. But all along the coast small
dockyards were active. Viciana described those of Vinaròs, whose population numbered
about 400 families, and which used 40 cartloads of pine and evergreen oak from
the hills behind the town every year for its boats. Though there was only an open
beach here, big ships could anchor safely near the shore, attracted by the abundant
supplies of local wine and a position from which they could take their bearings
for the onward journey up or down the Mediterranean coast. Shipbuilding seems
to have developed as part of a complex of activity in Vinaròs as elsewhere: access
to timber, a tradition of fishing, a geographical position which marked a place out
as a stage on the main sea-lanes. The best boats were, no doubt, built in the
Basque Country and Catalonia, both close to the rich timber of the Pyrenees and
to supplies of iron. The caravel, that sleek pioneer of oceanic discovery in the
sixteenth century, owed something to the blending of solid Basque hulls, capable
of withstanding Atlantic storms, and Catalan rigging—the lateen sail, designed to
maximise the uncertain power of the Mediterranean breezes.
The astrolabe, developed by the Arabs, and maritime or portolan charts, the
speciality of the Jews of Mallorca, were other ingredients of Spain’s waxing power
at sea. The House of Trade in Seville pioneered the mapping of the Atlantic in the
wake of the discovery of the New World through a systematic recording of the
reports of its pilots.51 All the more surprising, therefore, is the decline of Spanish
navigation. One symptom was the increasing resort to foreign vessels for the transport
between Seville and the Indies: these constituted a little over 5 per cent of the total
for much of the sixteenth century, but then in the wake of the disaster of the Armada
79
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
in 1588, for which so many merchantmen had been commandeered, they rose to
just over a fifth, and eventually, by the early seventeenth century, a third, before
attaining perhaps a proportion of just under one half by the end of that century.52
Nearly half of the remainder were being built by this time in America, especially in
Havana, the rendezvous for the fleets before their return to Seville. The decline of
shipbuilding in the Iberian peninsula seemed to be a symptom of a wider malaise:
the retreat of Spanish navigation as a whole. ‘The Basques have lost the whalefishing,’ lamented Gondomar in 1616, ‘and they, together with the Galicians and
Portuguese, are in the process of losing that of herring and cod as well.’53 The reliance
of a great city like Valencia on the cod and stockfish brought by Breton skippers is
a marked feature of the seventeenth century. What had gone wrong?
The question of shipbuilding itself has generated much debate. Costs in Spanish
dockyards may not have been markedly higher than in other parts of Europe,
according to the detailed research on one contract in Bilbao for six galleons in
1625–7.54 But Spain may have been short of some key resources as naval technology
developed. Long timbers for the masts had to be imported from the Baltic, and
rigging, above all, was noted as an enduring problem, by the Venetian ambassador
Donà in 1573 as regards the Barcelona dockyards and by the great marquis of
Ensenada, ‘father of the Spanish navy’, more generally in 1749. Boats of 200–300
tons could be turned out by the small yards of Vinaròs or Vilajoiosa; but these
seem to have been increasingly ill-adapted to the challenges of long-distance navigation.
‘Never since the creation of the world have men sailed as far as the Spaniards,’
wrote Tomás de Mercado, but the cost was high: ‘fearful losses and the shipwreck
of people and their fortune.’55 The rotting of the hulls in the tropics was another
problem, and few ships on the trans-Atlantic run seem to have made more than
four round trips before they were written off. It was bigger boats of 500–600 tons
or above which were favoured by the authorities for security, not least against
pirates, but these required more capital, skill and equipment, perhaps, than could
be provided by most Iberian dockyards—at least at the rate of replacement which
was necessary on the oceanic routes.
There was a wider problem, though. The Spanish coasts had fostered an active
maritime tradition, but they were only feebly attached to their hinterland, that
square, semi-continental landmass, incommunicable by river, on whose high tableland
lived a fundamentally peasant people. Spain was dangerously short of sailors compared
with England or Flanders, thought the Venetian ambassador Pietro Contarini in
1621. ‘What really drives me to distraction is the fewness of our sailors,’ wrote
Ensenada in 1749.56
These defects became more visible in proportion as Spain aspired to rise above
a certain level of seafaring and looked to command of the oceans. Taking a ship
to the Indies was of a qualitatively different order from the seamanship involved
in the old coasting trades. Pilots for the Indies were trained essentially on the job,
through a very long apprenticeship of 15–20 years at sea followed by a cursory
glance at cosmography for two months; then, if they could establish Christian
80
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
ancestry, they were licensed by the House of Trade. But the Council of the Indies
was complaining already in 1568 and 1578 that the pilots were not up to their job,
that they were slipshod about recording shallows, reefs and currents on their voyages.
And anyway there were so few of them that foreigners had to be commissioned.57
The College of San Telmo, founded in 1681 to train orphans in seamanship, and
the introduction around the same time of Mercator’s Projection for the use of
Spanish navigators, showed a continuing willingness to learn and adapt. But the
pace was now being set by the foreigner.
A critical problem for Spanish navigation, thought Ensenada, was the horrendous
pressure of piracy, which drove up costs and drove Spanish shipping out of business.
What was true in 1749 might appear to be even more so in the days of Drake, Hawkins
and the buccaneers on the Spanish Main. The need to have the Indies fleet go in
convoy from the middle of the sixteenth century was accompanied by a rise in the
duty levied to pay for the warships. This avería tax rose from 8 per cent of the value
of the cargoes to as much as a quarter after the capture of the treasure fleet by the
Dutch in 1628. The loss of Spanish control of the sea was a gradual process. By the
later seventeenth century the buccaneers were ensconcing themselves in the islands
of the Caribbean, though by this time the better organised navies of the French,
Dutch and English states were also containing their activities. For the first time there
was a clearer separation between years of peace and years of war. In the eighteenth
century the Spanish trade with America prospered in peace-time, though it was more
vulnerable now to total interruption in time of war by the powerful navy of England.
Writing in 1677 the chronicler Ortiz de Zúñiga traced the decline of his native
Seville to the wars which had begun in 1566 with the revolt of Flanders, ‘the sepulchre
of our armies, the devourer of our treasure’. In 1747–8, in his great memoranda for
the new king Ferdinand VI, Ensenada spoke of the need for a long period of peace
to cure ‘the wounds of such incessant and cruel wars, hardship and misfortunes as
this country has endured since the death of Ferdinand the Catholic’ —that is, since
1516.58 But, if men were coming to recognise that war had imposed terrible burdens
on imperial Spain, how can we explain the nature of the conflicts themselves? The
king and the President of the Council of Castile, in their requests to the Cortes for
new taxes, regularly pointed out—as did Philip II in 1586—that big armies were
needed not only for the defence of the Catholic Faith but for the safeguard of trade
with the Indies and Flanders. Even the inland towns, like Zamora in 1586 or Granada
in the year after the Armada, showed an awareness of the need to pursue the ‘Enterprise
of England’, ‘because this is so important for the honour of the Crown and that of
the Spanish nation, and the security of these realms and their inhabitants, and the
safeguarding of trade with the Indies’.59
But where, in reality, was the money going? The court had expanded considerably
as the head of a mighty empire during the early modern period. Expenditure here
had increased to 1,300,000 ducats a year by the early seventeenth century, and,
despite efforts to contain it in the war-torn reign of Philip IV and Olivares, was
still around or over this figure in the later seventeenth century. The Bourbons
81
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
spent lavishly on art and building in the eighteenth century at a time when there
was perhaps a little less pressure on the military budget. But it is hard to delimit
exactly the expenditure of the court. Under Philip III and Philip IV plans for
retrenchment concentrated above all on restricting the mercedes or favours paid to
individuals; but outgoings here were not always easy to separate from the general
costs of the army and the administration itself. The Venetian ambassador Mocenigo
(1626–31) calculated that 1,000,000 ducats a year were needed for the court and
another 2,000,000 for administration generally, together with just under 5,000,000
for war. But the crippling burden was really the snowball effect of anticipating
revenue year after year, leading to periodic bankruptcies and consolidations of
the government debt. These in turn generated inexorable increases in the amounts
needed to meet payment of interest. Between 1573 and 1602 interest on the government
bonds or juros doubled to 4,600,000 ducats a year, and rose to 9,147,341 by 1667.60
Comparatively little of this huge sum could be raised from the external trade
of Spain or from the treasure of the Indies (the latter contributing about a fifth of
the king’s revenue at its peak around 1600). The bulk had to come from the
excise duty (alcabala) on domestic trade, augmented after the disaster of the Armada
by the millones. The alcabala, nominally the king’s right to a tenth of the value of
goods changing hands within Castile, had been commuted from 1534 to a lump
sum— encabezamiento—guaranteed by the eighteen royal cities which met in the parliament
or Cortes. These cities then distributed quotas to the towns of their respective
districts, and each town would try further to divide the quota among its guilds
and satellite villages.61 The basis of the Castilian tax system, then, was this devolution
of responsibility on to the provinces and on to corporate groups within these,
each of which would generally try to raise its quota by some form of excise but
might have to resort, at least in part, to a per capita levy or other expedient.
After the government bankruptcy of 1575 the quotas were trebled, but, in the
face of protests, the sum was reduced a couple of years later to a figure which still
left it about double its previous size. Bitterly denounced by the Cortes as too high
and damaging to the economy, this tax increase was nevertheless accepted as less
harmful than if the king sent out his own collectors to exact the full legal rate of
10 per cent of all sales. In fact, the alcabala seems to have been kept down to about
5 per cent in many towns, with the deficit being made up by other expedients.
The clergy were exempt but the nobles were technically not—one reason, perhaps,
why the Cortes were keen to keep rates low and make up the deficit in other
ways.62 There were allegations that the royal towns saddled an unfair proportion
of the tax on their satellite villages. But the debates in the later sixteenth-century
Cortes would tend to suggest that the burden fell heaviest on centres of trade.
Most feudal lords had anyway been granted or usurped the right to collect the
levy for themselves on their own estates since the later Middle Ages, and they
seem to have kept the rates low in order to attract population.
By contrast the millones (‘millions of ducats’), voted by the Cortes of 1590 to
pursue the ‘Enterprise of England’ and kept going thereafter as part of general
82
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
military expenditure, fell on the purchase of basic foodstuffs (wine, vinegar, olive
oil and meat) and clearly hit the rural population more. Increased at various stages
in the early seventeenth century and brought more closely under the supervision
of the treasury in Madrid, they stand out as one of the first examples of a standard,
relatively centralised tax throughout Castile.
Both excise duties aroused criticism as opening the door to fraud on a massive
scale. In 1655 the king told the Cortes that, though nominally worth 10,000,000
ducats a year, they only yielded 3,500,000 to the treasury.63 Already from the
bankruptcy of 1575 a search had begun for some more streamlined system, which
would even out inequalities between town and country, and between one province
and another, and which would be simple to administer as well as alleviating the
burden on domestic trade. One of the options proposed, as early as the Cortes of
1579–82 and revived by Sancho de Moncada in his influential treatise of 1619,
was a single, standard duty on the milling of flour—something which everyone
consumed. Arguments that such a tax would hit the poor were taken seriously—
not least by Moncada, whose testament indicates a certain personal awareness of
the fate of paupers. But would the abolition of the excise not ultimately benefit
the poor too? —like a pond full of fish, urged the president of the Council of
Castile in 1579, where ‘if there is a lot of water, the big and the small both do very
well… whereas if you take away the water their fate is equally wretched’.64
In the end the sheer uncertainty of whether the average person bringing grain
to be milled would actually have cash to pay a tax of any sort told against this
proposal. It left that other medio universal, which was increasingly advocated, of a
levy on income or wealth. The president of the Council of Castile pointed out the
political advantages in terms of preventing rebellion by the poorer citizens (a dimension
of the proposal more fully explored in Chapter 7 below).65 What was now proposed
was that citizens earning over 1,000 ducats a year (roughly the salary of a professional
man at the time) should lend the government 200 ducats in each of the next five
years. It was not quite an income tax: rather individuals or households (it was not
entirely clear which) with above a certain amount of property were to be grouped
in cohorts worth 1,000 ducats a year, while those with double that revenue were
to pay double tax, as were all foreigners. What one notices here, and in the schemes
of Don Fernando Alvarez de Toledo at the same time, is an attempt at fiscal discrimination
rather than equality—a targeting of foreigners and courtiers (those who drew income
directly from the Crown) for special contributions. In any case the President emphasised
that the new levy was not a tax but a loan to the government. The amounts collected
would be administered by erarios—state treasuries or banks, which would pay the
contributor interest at 3 per cent while acquiring a monopoly of lending out money
(the rate here being as high as 7 per cent). Since the whole scheme was for the
good of the citizen, the investigation of wealth by panels of neighbours ‘would
give no grounds for vendettas, hatred, fear or favour’. But the whole ingenious
arrangement assumed a degree of patriotism and supervision which was way ahead
of anything that the fiscal system had yet achieved. Local oligarchies were too
83
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
used to managing their own finances to welcome this unprecedented uniformity.
There was a basic reluctance to trust the state with a large, guaranteed income for
which it would not be answerable to anyone, and the proposal had to be dropped.
It was left to the Bourbons to try to grasp the nettle again. The alcabalas and
millones have been a disaster for Castile, commented the marquis of Ensenada at
the outset of his great reforming ministry in 1747, ‘for the wealthy contribute
much less in proportion than the poor, who are reduced to the utmost wretchedness,
while our manufactures are ruined’.66 His name came to be associated with the
survey of population and property conducted throughout Castile between 1750
and 1754, one of the most impressive undertakings of its kind for any European
country in the pre-modern period. But his own fall from power in 1754 and the
eternal reluctance of most of his countrymen to move towards a more centralised
tax system meant that the great survey lay gathering dust in the archives, unused
except by later generations of social historians. The Bourbons had managed—just
as they abolished the customs barrier between the Crown of Aragon and Castile
in 1717—to introduce property taxes into these defeated Aragonese kingdoms. The
catastro in Catalonia and the equivalente in Valencia, introduced after the War of
the Spanish Succession, involved surveys of wealth, with income from land taxed
at 10 per cent and that from ‘industry’ (a composite term in that artisanal age,
referring indiscriminately to the wages for labour or the profits of a business) at 8
per cent. But in a manner typical of early modern Europe generally, such innovations
soon became routine—the cadastral surveys were not kept up to date, arbitrary
quotas were assigned to local communities, which were allowed to raise the money
by local excise or per capita levies.67
One of the reasons for the failure of a thoroughgoing fiscal reform under the
Bourbons was probably a certain easing of government finances. The old Habsburg
excise duties remained important, but had reached their ceiling by the middle of
the seventeenth century. Thereafter the government seems to have derived more
of its revenue from the American trades—the levies or indultos on shipping suspected
of carrying contraband, the monopoly of tobacco and chocolate (testimony by the
later seventeenth century to the spread of a consumer economy).68 The other side
of the balance-sheet was expenditure. Though Philip V (1700–46) engaged Spain
in dynastic wars to put his children on Italian thrones, the general trend of Spanish
policy from the later seventeenth century was to cut her commitments in Europe
and concentrate on the defence of the sea-lanes to America. This partial retreat
from empire may explain why it was possible to cut down so drastically on the
government debt. Already in 1649 Philip IV had begun withholding half the interest
on the juros, but in 1677 the capital value of these bonds was simply reduced by
half and by another three-quarters in 1685–7, while interest on the remainder was
lowered to 4 per cent or a little over half what it had been a century before.69
The success of these measures is not easy to explain, other than that the government
no longer needed to borrow so much for foreign wars. When it did resort again to
borrowing on a large scale, the domestic and American trades were healthy enough
84
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
to take up some of the strain. The war of 1779–83 against England had to be paid
for, in time-honoured fashion, by loans. But this time the Crown issued bonds—
vales—directly to its own citizens and did not have recourse, as the Habsburgs had
done, to foreign bankers. Instead the ‘Five Great Guilds’ of Madrid organised
much of the credit which the Bourbons needed. The absolute monarchy still had
to pay more for its loans, with interest at 4 per cent, than private citizens who
could borrow generally at 3 per cent; but the contrast with the earlier failure of
the erarios in 1623 is striking. In 1782 the government finally set up its state bank,
the Bank of San Carlos, in order to guarantee redemption of its bonds for cash if
holders so wished. In fact, it was not until the interruption of trade with the
Indies during the Revolutionary and Napoleonic Wars that investors lost confidence,
a run began on the exchequer and the vales were driven down to a discount of 50
per cent of their face value. This marked the collapse of the old fiscal regime, and
the need for the iron surgery of the liberal period.
‘Sire, finance is the backbone of the government of a monarchy,’ wrote Ensenada
to his royal master in 1748, ‘and because Spain forgot this principle, it has suffered
such a lamentable decline over the last two centuries.’70 Assessing the actual incidence
of taxation is a complex business. One has to bear in mind that much taxation in
Spain was indirect—the donatives offered, sometimes with grumbling, by feudal
lords and local communities. A draft memorial of 1611 for the Cortes noted that
towns were increasingly bankrupt through having to levy and billet troops and
pay for the plague of 1596–1602. They seem to have resorted increasingly to
loans in order to pay their tax quotas to the king, so that the actual disentangling
of royal and local fiscalism is not easy.71 This kind of pressure got worse in the
eighteenth century, with the monarchy expecting local communities to supplement
the deficits in the state budget. Thus the war of 1739–48 was paid for partly by
the royal seizure of half the revenues of the municipalities rather than by the
introduction of any new state taxes, and the ambitious road- and canal-building
programme of the later eighteenth century was planned from Madrid but financed
by local communities.
The nominally privileged Crown of Aragon was already carrying a great weight
of muncipal debt by the outset of the seventeenth century. Though Olivares
tried to involve it and the rest of the empire in a grandiose scheme known as
‘The Union of Arms’, by which provincial quotas of troops would be contributed
to a collective defence force of 140,000 men, it began to emerge that so much
tax was being paid to the local towns and autonomous regional administrations
that little was left for Madrid. When the Bourbons tried to take up the torch of
fiscal unification after their victory in the War of the Spanish Succession (1700–
14) they met similar problems. So heavy was the excise already in Valencia,
warned Melchor de Macanaz, their agent for reform in that kingdom, ‘that goods
for sale are as dear as in Castile, and foodstuffs cost a lot more’. Much of this
burden was what Macanaz called waste: fiestas, maladministration, corruption.
The little Valencian town of Beniganim told the Cortes of 1645 that it had spent
85
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
14,000 Valencian pounds on war in recent years—but 60,000 (it avowed ingenuously)
on building its new church.
The brave words of ministers about the need to protect imperial trade must
have rung hollow in the villages from where most of the taxes had to come. The
subsidy voted by the Valencian Cortes in 1626 involved a massive police operation
to check on fraud—the right to inspect cellars for the wine tax, the closure of all
ports except four and the stamping of all imports within twenty-four hours for
the new customs duty. One is torn between admiration for the superhuman specifications
of how and when the stamp was to be obtained (all customs houses must be open,
even on holy days, from sun-up to sundown) and scepticism that they could ever
have worked in the days before artificial lighting and the telephone. No wonder
that Vilajoiosa begged the king in the Cortes of 1604, 1626 and 1645 to remove
his customs post a few miles inland, since it only discouraged ships from taking
refuge there, even when pursued by Barbary corsairs. No wonder, either, that
Townsend approved of the consolidation of many of these old dues into the property
tax, the equivalente, under the Bourbons. Though quite high, it gave less opportunity
for corruption and harassment than its diverse predecessors: ‘To this consolidation
into a single duty may be attributed in part the general prosperity enjoyed throughout
the kingdom of Valencia.’72
The debate on fiscal reform in the Old Regime involved much broader questions
about the role of the state. Traditional political philosophy in Spain as in other
parts of Europe had visualised the ‘state’ somewhat in the nature of the patrimony
of the king—the bundle of rights and tribute which would enable him to carry on
his twin role as defender of the commonwealth against external agression and the
arbiter of its internal conflicts. But the commonwealth was separate from the king.
And one senses in the debates of the Cortes of the late sixteenth and early seventeenth
centuries a fundamental conflict between those who regarded the recent growth of
the state with distaste and those who thought it a positive thing in giving more
protection to trade. For the former the traditional rights of the king, including the
alcabalas originally conceded in 1341, were legitimate, but all the increases in taxation
and the government debt since 1575 were damaging. Hence the failure to grasp the
nettle of an income tax. Since all taxation was harmful, the main aim must be to
reduce the government’s commitments. So, a flour tax, though it would hit the
poor chiefly, could be justified if it were a stop-gap remedy. Taxation was not conceived
of as social engineering: it was dangerous to reduce the income of the nobility and
the church since they and not the state provided whatever welfare was available to
the ordinary citizen. At most, as in 1623, the Cortes would contemplate a punitive
levy on those who had benefited by the largesse of the state (and thereby increased
its commitments), taxing the fruits of office, pensions and (eventually) juros.
In the event the state was not rolled back. The standing army, developed for
the trench warfare in Flanders in the later sixteenth century, was kept going and
transferred to the peninsula itself by the Bourbons after the disbandment of the
European empire. But the administration of the army—and increasingly in the
86
TREASURE AND THE COST OF EMPIRE
eighteenth century of the navy—reposed on a shaky financial base. The Venetian
ambassador Contarini commented in 1621 on the sheer, frustrating inability of
the Spanish state to pay its way: ‘even for the payment of small items on the
ordinary account, you would not believe how long it takes’. Nevertheless, he noted,
the government limped along thanks to the sheer vastness of its potential resources,
able to count on the services of a considerable array of people since everyone
lived in hope of some titbit falling from the royal table. The problem, thought
Soranzo in 1602, was corruption: ‘Those who handle (the public purse) grow
immensely rich.’ And Fernández Navarrete drew a contrast in 1626 between the
ordinary taxpayer who was wretched and those who had latched on to the court
and the fiscal system, who were prospering.73
One of the features of the whole system was a kind of ‘bastard feudalism’ —the
devolution of power in the seventeenth century on to those bodies—regional assemblies
in the Crown of Aragon, town councils or feudal lords in Castile— which could
provide money and men for the war. The medieval Cortes had developed in all the
peninsular kingdoms as a way of allowing the commonwealth —particularly the
burgesses of the royal domain—to mobilise their wealth in order to buttress the
royal patrimony in time of need. What was now becoming apparent, with the anguished
debates in the Cortes on taxation after 1575 and the refusal of the Crown of Aragon
to join the Union of Arms in 1626, was that fiscal centralisation had reached its premodern limit. If the king needed more income, it would have to be through recourse
to the ‘benevolence’ of the subject— through informal donatives bargained for with
nobles and towns on an individual basis. All of this carried a social cost.
87
5
FEUDAL LORDS AND
VILLAGE POTENTATES
In his celebrated essay ‘Invertebrate Spain’ (1921), Ortega y Gasset lamented the
lack of a Spanish feudalism equivalent to that of medieval France or England. Instead
of a hierarchy of power and authority, stretching down from the throne to the people,
this frontier nation had developed as a cluster of autonomous corporations—military
brotherhoods, city states—with strong local roots. Admirably democratic in some
ways, this system had generated perpetual tensions between centre and periphery,
and left both the society and its culture very fragmented.
The pattern of resettlement in the wake of the Reconquista had been much as
Ortega suggested: the distribution of lands to cities and to the Military Orders founded
in the twelfth century—Santiago, Calatrava and Alcántara—whose members were coopted for their own lifetime by their fellows. Both were dedicated to the protection of
the frontier. The knights and foot-soldiers who comprised the bulk of the crusading
armies were rewarded with variable amounts of land, based on the ‘ox-gang’ (yugada),
which was the field that a pair of oxen could plough in a day and which ranged in size
from 3 to 22 hectares, according to the lie of the terrain and the depth of the soil.
Typically, the knight would get twice the portion of a foot-soldier, which seems to
have amounted in practice to nearly 80 hectares round thirteenth-century Seville and
up to 100 round Cordoba.1
 The organisation of the resettlements drew to some extent
on pre-existing Muslim practice, by which the peasantry and landowners had been
grouped under the jurisdiction of cities. Castile under the Christians continued to
have a basic framework of towns, from where control over the surrounding countryside
was exercised. Thus in the early seventeenth century the magistrates of Seville dispensed
justice in some 100 villages round about; and for 15 kilometres round Xàtiva, 62
villages had to refer to the urban magistrates any cases involving sentences of death
or the galleys, and had to levy the same taxes as in Xàtiva and contribute to the
upkeep of its walls.2
 Even in old-settled Spain north of the Duero River, towns and
villages were grouped in extensive federations—nominally more egalitarian, but perhaps
not too different from the colonised lands to the south.
In a mainly pastoral society, these regional federations had an important function
of policing a rather empty countryside. In the cadastral surveys of sixteenth-century
Granada and Valencia the land is often ill-mapped, the non-irrigated hill country
88
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
apparently being occupied by families on a shifting basis. Control over these baldíos
was becoming at this time a significant cause of conflict, as population increased
and the open range came under pressure. The great jurist, Castillo de Bobadilla,
in his treatise of 1597, urged that the royal district officer (corregidor) must inspect
the townlands of his jurisdiction at least once in his three-year term of office,
checking on boundaries and markers. Agreements with neighbouring justices were
vital on ‘irrigation, pasture, felling of timber, tolls on roads and bridges, fording
rivers and other matters’.3
Control over jurisdiction, thought Castillo de Bobadilla in 1597 and Caxa de
Leruela in 1631, was absolutely vital to the health of the local community. It was
a major feature of the whole colonisation of Spain that massive efforts were made
during this period to rearrange the pattern of such control. Once a community
prospered and grew in population, it would inevitably make a bid for the right to
administer its own resources. Speaking of the Xúquer district in the kingdom of
Valencia, the chronicler Escolano wrote in 1610: ‘It is truly an Indies that they
have there…The trade in silk is so great that small communities have increased
and turned themselves into populous towns.’ The latter term is, of course, relative:
Algemesí, with 480 families, separated itself from the old regional capital Alzira,
in 1574, while its neighbour Carcaixent (420 families), followed suit in 1576. In
both cases, the money acquired from silk enabled them to win these charters from
the Crown, though Algemesí had to wait until 1608 and pay another subsidy
before it achieved the coveted title of ‘royal town’ (villa), with a seat in the Cortes.
In the parliament of 1604 Alzira complained about the dismemberment of her
jurisdiction in this way, for as a result ‘she suffers a great lack of timber and
grassland’.4
 It was a similar story in Castile. By 1594 the Andalusian town of
Bujalance had become so wealthy through its woollen manufacture that it was
able to purchase its separation from the jurisdiction of Cordoba. It has been calculated
that whereas in 1500 only about 40 per cent of communities in New Castile were
autonomous ‘towns’, by 1700 this proportion had risen to three-quarters. Already
in 1565 Alcalá de Henares pleaded with the Crown not to grant autonomy to any
more of her satellite villages, for she was losing access to her traditional supplies
of food and timber thereby.5
Regulation of markets and pasture was one of the most prized aspects of the
right to hold a court in those days. Sometimes agreements were reached to maintain
common access to grasslands—as between Bujalance and Cordoba after 1594. But
such arrangements were subject to multiple tensions and litigation. The deputy
for Seville told the Cortes of 1615 that, whatever was said on paper, ‘those who
buy jurisdictional rights stop anyone else from coming in to pasture’. And Caxa
de Leruela a decade and a half later blamed the decline of the herds on this splitting
up of the open range. He went on to say that it was the wealthy minority in each
local community who sought autonomy in this way—‘in order to make what they
can out of the administration of justice, looking to the interests of their friends
and compadres, and putting the poor under the thumb of the rich’.6
 There was,
89
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
indeed, a tendency for this process to dovetail with the growth of feudal jurisdictions.
Spain had not had in the Middle Ages a fully fledged system of fiefs and serfs: the
militarisation of all free men and the movement of manpower to the frontier had,
with some exceptions, told against these west European developments. But one
of the aspects of the early modern period was precisely the rise of some of the
symptoms of rural subjugation. The big landowners tended to acquire the trappings
of power which had hitherto eluded them. Symptomatic was the failure of the
peasants of Tejeda in 1453 to stop their local landowner nominating the justice of
the peace, who was technically delegated by the city of Salamanca. The man’s
influence with the Salamanca councillors was too strong.7
 Such de facto control
could become institutionalised in due course through the acquisition of feudal
jurisdiction. In the kingdom of Valencia landowners had been allowed automatically
to appoint their own justices to regulate civil and petty criminal cases (not involving
corporal punishment) if they had three Moorish or fifteen Christian families settled
on their estates—the so-called Alfonsine jurisdiction, granted by Alfons II in 1327.
It was often the colonisation of land which led, as by a natural progression, to
the exercise of some sort of discipline over the settlers by the chief coloniser. In a
dry climate and poor soil such as characterised much of Spain, the ability of peasant
farmers to go it alone was problematical. Though land was established to free
colonists living around the city states like Cordoba or Seville in the wake of the
thirteenth-century reconquest, property drifted inevitably into the hands of those
with capital. The process of feudalisation was gradual. The townland of Benamejí
had been attracting settlers over the years since the threat of border raids from
the Moors of Granada ceased in 1492. By 1547 there were some nineteen families
tilling the soil and living in the shadow of the fortress which belonged to the
Military Order of Santiago. In 1547 Charles V decided, as Master of the Order,
to sell the jurisdiction to a private individual, Diego de Bernuy, a wealthy alderman
of Burgos. One of the aspects of the transfer which may have appealed to the
peasants was that their new lord had the wherewithal to promise to build a flour
mill and an oil press, as well as giving each family 2,000 tiles to roof their house
and enough tiles to replace the thatch on the village church. He also offered to
build a bridge to improve access to and from the settlement.8
The acquisition of private jurisdictions had been proceeding quite fast in medieval
Spain—from around 1000 in Catalonia, from about 1100 in Castile. But as a recognised
part of the structure of the state itself—as a helpmate of the Crown in defending
and governing its territories—it seems to have achieved a new importance under
the usurping Trastámara dynasty in Castile from the middle of the fourteenth
century onwards. Rewarding his supporter Men Rodríguez de Benavides, the new
king Henry II granted him in 1371 the fief of Santisteban del Puerto, near Jaén,
on the frontier with the Muslim kingdom of Granada, where Benavides was military
commander: ‘so that you and the men of your lineage may enjoy an increase of
fame and honour, and may have the wherewithal to serve us all the better’.9
 Such
fiefs carried no specific obligation to provide a fixed number of troops; but, in
90
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
alliance with other arrangements with leading families and prelates to come to
war when summoned with so many ‘lances’ (lanzas) in return for payment, their
creation was part of a general trend. This trend can be interpreted either as a
devolution of power on to great aristocrats or, more tellingly perhaps, as a primitive
coordination of military and administrative responsibility by kings who were moving
from charismatic war leaders to heads of a more permanent hierarchy of command.
Through Benavides, Henry II probably exercised more real, or at least more ongoing
authority on the Jaén frontier than did any of his predecessors. As the tasks of
government multiplied in the late medieval and early modern period, some kind
of ‘bastard feudalism’ may have seemed the only answer.
Certainly the Catholic Kings, Ferdinand and Isabel (1474–1516), appear to
have cooperated well with the nobility. Many fiefs were distributed in the conquered
kingdom of Granada after 1492 to the great families of Castile who had helped
them in the crusade. The burdens of empire led their Habsburg successors into a
modified continuation of this policy: large numbers of villages were separated
from the jurisdiction of their district capital and sold off to private individuals.
Thus Villafranca and Castro near Cordoba went to the marquises of Priego in
1549 and 1565 respectively for a sum which worked out at forty-three times their
annual rental; Carrión de los Ajos near Seville was transferred to Gonzalo de
Céspedes, who had made a fortune in the Indies trade, for over thirty-seven times
the rental value.10 The bulk of the purchasers seem to have been ‘new men’: in
the kingdom of Granada, for example, about two-thirds of them were aldermen
or regidores of the royal towns—often of the local royal town from which the new
fief was broken off. Whereas just under 20 per cent of the population of this
region lived under feudal lords on the eve of the sales in 1558, the proportion
was nearly 30 per cent two hundred years later.11
Granada, as a newly conquered territory, may have been somewhat late in
acquiring a feudal character. In other parts, the great lordships seem to have
arisen in the fourteenth and fifteenth centuries. In the kingdom of Valencia, for
example, the Borjas obtained their duchy of Gandia in 1485, the Cárdenas got
their marquisate of Elx in 1470, the Sandoval received Dénia in 1431, followed
by the house of Aragon in the duchy of Segorbe in 1435–8 and the Ruiz de
Corella in the county of Cocentaina in 1445. After 1490 the proportion of territory
and population held in fief hardly advanced much. In western Andalusia (Seville,
Cordoba), where the reconquest from the Moor took place in the thirteenth
century, the process of seigneurialisation was mainly a late medieval phenomenon,
covering 27 per cent of the territory in the generation after the conquest but 49
per cent by the time Isabel came to the throne in 1474. Finally, in the kingdom
of Murcia the families living under feudal lords actually fell from just under a
half of the population in 1530 to just over a third by 1787, as the royal towns
forged ahead since they had access to the best lands and markets. But by this
time perhaps half of the villages and half of the population of Castile overall
were parcelled out in fiefs.12
91
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
The process of feudalisation was, we have suggested, a way of bringing local
elites into closer cooperation with the Crown. But the monarchy was careful not
to surrender too much authority. John II had given the fine port of Cartagena to
the Fajardos in 1442, but his daughter Isabel took it back into royal hands in
1503, compensating the holder with the marquisate of Los Vélez on the frontier
with Granada. And she recovered that other great harbour, Cadiz, from the Ponce
de León in 1492, with the usual offer of compensation elsewhere. The county of
Ribagorza, strategically placed on the Pyrenean frontier with France, was eventually
prised from the grasp of the dukes of Villahermosa in 1590, after a bitter struggle.
Political disloyalty, of course, could bring worse retribution, and Sanlúcar de Barrameda,
at the mouth of the Guadalquivir, was confiscated in 1641 after the suspected
treason of its master, the duke of Medina Sidonia, while the duke of Medinaceli
lost Puerto de Santa María in 1729 for his conduct towards Philip V In general,
the Bourbons looked askance at any sacrifice of the royal domain. Though Philip
V did reward a few of his followers in the War of the Spanish Succession with
fiefs, that was the end of the story. Rather, during the eighteenth century a more
confident royal administration set its face against such petitions, and even looked
more kindly on demands of the peasant population for a return to the royal domain.
‘Lords of vassals are like the bones and sinew of the state,’ wrote the great
jurist Castillo de Bobadilla in 1597. Though, as a royal judge, he disliked feudal
jurisdictions, he acknowledged that without them the commonwealth would be
‘like a body composed of flesh and feathers, without bones or sinews, so that it
would only take a reverse in war or the defeat of an army or the death of a king to
bring about its collapse’. In fact, the creation of fiefs often provoked bitter conflicts
which brought the state itself to its knees. One of the ingredients in the great
revolt of the Comuneros (1520–1) was the resentment of the royal towns at the
amputation of their townlands in favour of the great nobility. Isabel had ceded
large tracts of the district of Segovia in 1480 to her supporter Andrés Cabrera; it
was not until 1592 that the ensuing litigation could be settled, by an agreement
whereby the Cabreras, counts of Chinchón, would pay the city of Segovia an
annuity of 2,000 ducats.13
‘The king’s vassals and subjects can have no greater sadness and resentment,’
wrote the Valencian chronicler Viciana in 1563, ‘than when the king separates
them from his patrimony and royal estate, almost as if they had been overrun by
enemies.’14 He went on to describe the conflict between the town of Onda and
Ferdinand the Catholic in 1512, over the latter’s desire to transfer it to his nephew,
Don Alonso de Aragón. The men of Onda locked the gates against their new
master, and pursued Ferdinand with their clamour for ‘justicia! justicia!’, until the
king lost his temper and his secretary warned them not to press too hard for fear
of the consequences. On the other hand, there were certain advantages in being
placed under a feudal lord. The people of Segorbe— ‘the greater and sounder
part’ of them, as the careful legal phrase of those pre-democratic days put it—
assembled in their town hall on 2 June 1619 and agreed to drop their lawsuit
92
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
against the duke, their master. Since 1575 and the death of the last male descendant
of the family in the direct line, they had been litigating for a return to the royal
domain. Now, aware that the lawsuit was costing ‘many thousands of ducats’ and
that the duke, a major figure at the court of both Philip III and Philip IV, ‘by his
greatness is likely to favour and protect this city, and his children and progeny are
likely to do the same, as true lords and fathers of this community’, they decided
to accept him as their master.15 In fact, in the very same year as the Cortes of
1626 ratified the agreement, the town of Segorbe began to change its mind and to
allege that the deal of 1619 had been struck by a corrupt minority of the inhabitants.
In any case, the substantial inducements on offer from the duke—a reduction of
rents, helping with paying off the lawyers’ bills, a promise to come and live in
Segorbe, creating jobs and opportunities for the local people—all reflect more general
pressures which can be detected in the spread of feudal jurisdictions in Castile.
The town of Uceda, separated from the diocese of Toledo in 1582, failed to meet
the price required by the Crown and within a few years had to sell itself back into
subjection, this time to the son of the future duke of Lerma, favourite of Philip
III.16 When one remembers that another royal favourite, Olivares, was one of the
most active purchasers of fiefs in the 1620s, one may feel both that his vassals
benefited and that the Crown’s authority suffered little real loss. But what was
actually transferred by these sales, and did the peasants gain or lose?
The great jurist Castillo de Bobadilla suggested in 1597 that, though many
lords claimed the empty lands (baldíos) lying within their fiefs, yet there needed to
be an express grant of these by the Crown for that to take effect. And certainly
they could not enclose pasture or woods, but must leave them for common use—
unless they themselves were the original owners and colonisers of the area. Hunting,
equally, must remain open for the local peasantry—‘unless some privilege, contract,
custom or consent of the village awarded it to the lord’. However, he acknowledged
that in practice ‘some seigneurs usurp this right, because they have the power,
and molest their vassals, punishing them with heavy fines’.17
The original grant of Oropesa to the Alvarez de Toledo family in 1369 included
a typically sweeping reference to ‘lands, fisheries and pasture’; yet the seventh
count of Oropesa found it prudent in 1636 to pay the Crown 60,000 ducats for
authorisation to fence off a quarter of the common lands as private pasture. The
sheer uncertainty of title to property in an empty landscape has to be borne in
mind throughout. In La Calahorra the Muslims had only title to the irrigated
fields down to 1570; the secano was ‘empty land (baldío), and anyone who wished
could sow it’, sometimes handing parcels of it on to their children, ‘but no one
saw or heard of anyone selling it’.18 But as part of the joint process of frontier
settlement and seigneurialisation in the early modern period, the feudal lords
began to enforce control of the open range more strictly. After the duke of Arcos
acquired the county of Arcos in 1491, he began levying dues on the peasants of
nearby Marbella who tried to exercise their old rights of pasturing their herds in
the area. The royal high court intervened in 1516 and 1567 to stop the duke, but
93
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
he continued to treat the common land of Arcos as his own domain, parcelling
out bits of it from time to time to his vassals for ploughing.19 Other lords, as in
the case of Oropesa, reached agreements with the Crown for cash, allowing them
exclusive rights to at least part of the commons within their fiefs. The village of
Grazalema protested in 1814 that its lord, the duke of Arcos, had bought from the
Crown land which allegedly was not surveyed but which really belonged to the
community: ‘In times preceding the present age it was not easy to win any victory
against grandees and powerful men, for their influence might cause lawsuits to
drag on over whole centuries, with the verdict leaving matters open.’20
Property censuses were one way by which a feudal lord could determine rights
of landownership. In Oliva in 1663 the peasants were interrogated by their master,
the duke of Gandia, regarding the fields they cultivated. Some had lost their title
deeds, but were allowed to continue farming, on payment of quit-rents to the
duke. At the next survey in 1744, the seigneurial agent warned of the danger of
land drifting out of the feudal domain through neglect. More likely, it was the
other way round—the lord of the fief gradually establishing his right to more and
more of the land. Thus, in Andalusia the marquises of Priego built up an impressive
estate over the early modern period, first establishing their control of the commons
(though contested by the peasants), then buying up or annexing peasant farms
themselves. By 1752 they were owners of about a fifth of the surface area in six of
the eleven townships comprising the marquisate.21
What did the seigneurs do with the land thus acquired? Some of it could be
used to expand ranching, as in Tudor England. In 1629 Don Sebastián Suárez
bought the fief of Lozoya near Segovia, and went on to appropriate the commons
for his herds of sheep. To the protest of the villagers, he is alleged to have retorted:
‘that there were four roads out of the village, and they could take the one they
liked best…’. Though the high court intervened in 1637 to order Don Sebastián
out of the village for two years, the peasants eventually took matters into their
own hands and killed him in 1646.22 Round Salamanca the frontier wars with the
Portuguese in 1640–68 and 1702–13 led to the abandonment of villages on a
considerable scale, and the build-up of the famous ranches for fighting-bulls which
characterise the region today.
But the general trend was away from herding towards arable farming in early
modern Spain. Not many of the feudal lords participated actively in this process.
The sugar plantations in Valencia, which involved perhaps the greatest concentrations
of serf labour in sixteenth-century Spain, were exceptional and doomed— doomed
because serfdom had never really established itself and costs were too high. There
had been attempts in the Middle Ages to restrict the mobility of the rural populations,
in order to stop them running off to the frontier. Thus in fourteenth and fifteenthcentury Catalonia one finds agreements whereby peasants pledge themselves not
to leave the estate in return for the seigneur’s guarantee that they can pass the
farms on to their own heirs. By 1400 these remensa households constituted about a
quarter of the Catalan population, and as much as three-quarters of the peasantry
94
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
in the old-established lands of Girona.23 But the great rebellion of the remensas,
coinciding with the civil war of 1462–72, resulted in the charter of liberty—the
Sentència de Guadalupe—issued by Ferdinand the Catholic in 1486, freeing the ‘peasantry
of Catalonia. Meanwhile, similar trends in Castile towards arresting the free flow
of population to the frontier were interrupted by Sancho IV’s decree of 1285,
reaffirmed in 1480, that the peasant could leave his master when he chose.
The sugar mills of Valencia were run for a handful of feudal lords by their
Morisco vassals. In principle, the Moors were free men like the Christians. The
feudal lords were keen, on the one hand, to attract more of them on to their
estates, but, on the other, worried that they might become too free. Thus, after
their conversion to Christianity, they were required by the Cortes of 1528 not
to leave the villages ‘without having first settled their accounts and paid what
they owe to the senyor’. But the Crown’s reply to this petition makes it clear that
it was more interested in stopping all movement of Moriscos to the coast, where
they presented a security risk, and by 1559 a system of passports was introduced
for this people, requiring them to show just cause why they were out of their
villages.
Though this tying down facilitated seigneurial control, there were difficulties
in exploiting Morisco labour. The duke of Gandia looked back nostalgically to a
mythical golden age before the expulsion of the Moriscos in 1609, when this people
had been there ‘to plough the duke’s fields and work on his castles, houses and
other buildings, and come with their mules and pack-animals when his luggage
had to be carried from place to place, while the women were busy spinning and
weaving for the ducal household’. In reality, the Gandia accounts for the late
sixteenth century suggest a more limited use of Morisco labour. The duke would
recruit specialists on the open market for the pruning of his vines in February, at
sixty Valencian pennies a day, while Morisco labour gangs were rounded up to
assist the pruners at eight pennies per man. Work on the duke’s country house in
1585 involved hiring ‘Master Peter and his son’ for skilled bricklaying, and unskilled
serf labour for hauling limestone and water to the site. Some Morisco names tend
to recur, suggesting a kind of proletariat in the villages, chosen by the elders to fill
the labour quotas.
No doubt the Morisco labour gangs were most significant in the unpleasant
work of the sugar mills. But this industry was always somewhat marginal, especially
with the exploitation of new lands in the Tropics. Gandia’s neighbour, the Cistercian
monastery of Valldigna, has preserved a series of accounts from the 1580s which
remind us that Morisco labour in the mills had to be paid and could eat into
profits. The monastery was having to revise its labour demands on its Morisco
peasants constantly over the fifteenth and sixteenth centuries by a series of concordias
or agreements. That of 1557 provided, among other things, that the peasants were
to be called upon to clean the monastery only on feast-days, and that if the monks
needed mattresses stitched they were to pay the Morisco women seven pennies
each a day.24 This world came to an end with the expulsion of the Moriscos in
95
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
1609. As in America, the Crown defined labour services as unsuitable for free
men, and instructed the feudal lords to commute them for other payments in the
resettlements.
The Moriscos were not the only ones owing these. The peasants of Villafranca
near Cordoba had to turn in four days’ work per year on the marquis of Priego’s
farms, while those of San Pedro de Cardena near Burgos worked for two days a
year on the estate of their master in the sixteenth century. Specific tasks of this
kind were, however, marginal to the rural economy, as the feudal lords preferred
to lease out their demesne rather than cultivate it directly. The greater burden of
service was of a more general kind—the hospitality (sometimes called cena or supper)
which the vassals must provide when their master visited them, the repair of his
castle, the gift of a beast at the marriage of their daughters, and the other customs
mentioned in the great survey (Relaciones) of New Castile in 1575. The town of
Lerma in Old Castile protested in 1502 against having to supply the whole seigneurial
household with carts, wood, straw, salt and lodging when it came to visit, and the
royal court ruled in 1548 that the visit must not exceed twelve days a year in
these conditions.25
‘This burden of lodging and clothing and suchlike which a seigneur lays on his
vassals,’ wrote Castillo de Bobadilla in 1597, ‘asking them for gifts when they or
their children marry or at Christmas, and that they bake their bread in his ovens or
grind their flour in his mills, that they plough his fields and give him carts to carry
wood and building materials or to move house…all these are odious burdens and
must be cut back.’ As a royal judge, he gave his opinion that the courts would
favour peasant demands for their abolition, unless the seigneur could prove that
they had been introduced in return for some boon conferred on the village by his
ancestors. And he advised nobles to ‘put their hand on their heart’ and ask themselves
whether they were really entitled to these things. Shortly before, the Franciscan
moralist Juan de Pineda had addressed a similar message to them: ‘In this matter of
forcing people to make their flour in your mills, there is an impression at the outset
of great tyranny and oppression of free men.’ The royal courts, he noted, would
assume, without proof to the contrary, that ‘such abuses were slipped in by tyrannical
lords when the kingdom was disturbed by civil strife and the kings had little power’.26
In Benamejí it was the seigneur who built the mill and oven for the peasants of
this relatively new settlement in 1549, and who claimed in the foundation charter
a monopoly of use. But nearby the village of Aguilar took the marquis of Priego
to court in 1582 for trying to enforce similar monopolies—usually known as regalías,
or ‘rights of dominion’ —in a community which was already functioning before it
was alienated from the royal domain. In 1624 the chancery court finally got round
to giving its decision: that the marquis could have the only public flour mill in
town, but that the peasants could bake bread freely at home, that the marquis
would have the butcher’s shop but the peasants could run their own general store
and tavern…But then in 1630, in return for a huge subsidy of 60,000 ducats, the
Crown allowed the marquis to control the sale of wine and olive oil in his fief.27
96
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
One way round the law was to claim that the seigneur was not providing enough
facilities for baking or milling. Thus the Moriscos of Muro obtained the right in
1599 to use other than the two flour mills and one oven which their master, the
count of Cocentaina, was prepared to build. Less successfully, they sued the count
for breach of the laws of Valencia which allowed its people to press their olives
where they chose.28 The expansion of olive cultivation in the eighteenth century
undermined the regalías of the marquis of Priego, as he found that his presses in
Montilla could no longer keep pace with mounting demand. The development of
the market economy, indeed, seems to have spelled the end of these rights some
time before they were eventually abolished in the nineteenth century. After successive
protests by its peasants, the monastery of Valldigna found it useful to concede in
1700 that farmers with crops to sell could do so outside the seigneurial store,
whose prices anyway were to be fixed henceforth by the peasant magistrates and
not by the monks. And in 1781 it agreed that the villagers could import freely
whatever wine they needed, without passing through the seigneurial tavern.29
The nineteenth-century transition, whereby feudal lords became essentially
landlords, was well under way in the early modern period. We have already noted
the process by which fief-holders used their influence to round out control of the
commons and even some of the peasant land on their estates. Large-scale farming
by the seigneurs themselves was not practicable, given the lack of a serf labourforce and the underdevelopment of the market economy itself. There are some
examples to the contrary, like the duke of Cardona round Cordoba in the middle
of the seventeenth century. But Castillo de Bobadilla had given fair warning that,
while seigneurs could sell the harvests from their own farms, the royal judges
would take a dim view of ‘business dealings and buying and selling fleeces, olive
oil and that kind of thing’, because of the ‘intimidation, oppression, violence,
cornering of the market and harm done to the peasants living on their estates’.30
They must remember the original purpose of the fief: a delegation of jurisdiction
from the Crown, which must not be abused for profit.
Instead, the pattern was that the feudal lords would lease out their lands to
others. The duke of Arcos tended to lease his in the marquisate of Comares, whose
jurisdiction had come to him in 1490, for nine years at a time; and the marquis of
Priego similarly leased his extensive holdings for between three and six years. There
was a tendency for such leases to become nearly hereditary. ‘Any landlord who
threw a tenant out of the home of his ancestors without an extremely good reason,’
wrote Jovellanos of his native Asturias in 1782, ‘would be looked upon as a tyrant.’
Though one would have to distinguish these small peasants of Asturias or Valencia
from the bigger capitalist leaseholders of New Castile or Andalusia, even these tended
to be brought within a patron-client system. In 1785 Don Francisco Xavier Pallares,
farmer of two big cortijos belonging to the count of Villa Amena on the frontier of
Murcia and Granada, wrote to his master explaining that, with the bad harvest and
the sickness of his wife and daughter, he would not be able to pay his rent. ‘I would
appeal to Your Lordship’s compassion, in my great need and with utmost humility,
97
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
that…you would not drive me to the wall in my broken state of health…I am confident
that Your Lordship’s pious heart will see its way to granting my request.’ An extension
of time to pay off the arrears was granted, and in 1787, when Pallares had got back
on his feet, his lease was renewed.31
More generally, the land in Spain was cleared and occupied by small peasant
farmers, who might then have to reach some sort of accommodation with the
feudal lord. In Valdepusa (Toledo), the seigneur originally established 700 fanegas
of land to settlers in 1457; by 1526 these had taken in, without authorisation,
another 800 from the waste, and their master ratified the ‘usurpation’ that year.
In Valldigna there was a serious conflict between the peasantry and the abbey in
1593 over the status of some recently cleared land in Masalalí: was it peasant
land, as the Moriscos claimed, which they could hand on to their children and
barter away, or leasehold?32 This uncertainty surfaced in the eighteenth century
in Galicia and Asturias, as some landlords sought to profit by the expansion of
the economy, taking back from their tenants the fields established for three lives
(foros). After intervening to protect sitting tenants in 1759–63, the Crown decreed
in 1785 that leaseholders could only be evicted on condition that the owner wanted
to farm his property himself.
Though we still know too little about how these laws were actually applied,
they seem to be in the spirit of the long process of colonisation of this frontier
land since the Middle Ages. In Andalusia the dukes of Arcos created their new
settlement of Paradas (1460) out of the townland of Marchena, offering rent exemptions
for fifteen years and guarantees of fixed rents thereafter to the settlers. Meanwhile,
seigneurs further north had to try to stem the tide of emigration to the frontier by
offering equally generous terms: hereditary tenures, and rents equivalent to a
tenth of the harvest at most, though often much less.33 Shortage of manpower in
the wake of the Black Death in the fourteenth century seems to have consolidated
this movement towards a lowering of feudal rents, and sometimes their commutation
for fixed sums in cash. In Castile the rents from land, whether leasehold or quitrents
from hereditary peasant farmers, seem to have constituted only a relatively minor
proportion of the income of feudal seigneurs—just under 14 per cent in the case of
the count of Benavente, for example. The bulk of their revenue came from the
sales tax (alcabala), which they had been given or usurped from the Crown, and
from the ‘third of the tithe’ (tercias), granted to the kings of this crusading nation
by the church and often appropriated by the seigneurs.
Where the seigneurs did depend fundamentally on quit-rents—as in the Crown
of Aragon—their situation in the sixteenth century, as the market economy developed
and price inflation undermined the value of sums paid in cash, placed considerable
strains on their relations with their peasants. In 1457 the abbey of Valldigna agreed
to accept a fixed sum, the magram, in commutation of shares of the wheat harvest
formerly paid by the Moriscos. But faced with the erosion of its income in the
sixteenth century, it began to demand a share of the new crops being grown by
the wealthier tenants—mulberry leaf to feed the silkworms, carob as fodder for
98
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
mules, even baskets of grapes. In reply to peasant protest that it had vineyards
enough of its own, the abbey retorted that it was driven to such measures because
the magram was now too low. Archbishop Ribera warned his preachers on the
mission of 1599 to the Moriscos not to get involved in disputes about rents, telling
their audience ‘that they should go before the ministers whom His Majesty appoints
to administer justice to Old and New Christian alike’.34
The records of litigation in the royal courts about rents are, indeed, an
impressive testimony to the stresses of the time. Essentially, the Crown kept a
fairly vigilant eye on attempts to rescind old charters. When the Moriscos
were expelled from Granada in 1570 and from Valencia in 1609 new opportunities
seemed to present themselves. But in Granada the Crown issued instructions
‘that the settlers are not to be saddled with terms such as that they set aside
more land for the seigneur, nor with new burdens more than the Moriscos
were subject to’; and the resettlement, indeed, was kept strictly in royal hands.
In Valencia the repopulation after 1609 has generated enormous controversy
and a growing literature, exploring the complexities of the quadrille danced
by the Crown, the seigneurs, the latters’ creditors, and, finally, the new settlers
themselves. Here one may say that, whatever the objective conditions of the
resettlement (and they were often draconian at the outset, then reduced as the
seigneurs found they could not attract sufficient immigrants), the peasant lore
guarded a memory of royal intervention and of a basic feeling that, whatever
they owed the feudal lords, the old Morisco lands were theirs. This was to
figure prominently in the great peasant rebellion of 1693, which we shall examine
below.35 A clear statement of the Crown’s position came in its great charter of
1614, the Asiento General or ‘General Settlement’ of the kingdom of Valencia,
in which Philip III forbade the feudal lords to saddle the new colonists with
the debts of the Moriscos, ‘given our obligation to see to the maintenance and
increase of the population of the realm, which is so important to the service of
God and of our self’. A nation of peasant smallholders was the ideal pursued
by statesmen in Spain right down to the end of the Old Regime.
The charters of individual communities often specified that the peasant must
not alienate his holding to any powerful man, like a noble or a cleric, who could
claim exemption from the manorial court. In the same spirit, those inheriting
land in Benamejí were obliged to take up residence in the village within two years
or forfeit the inheritance (1549). In the Crown of Aragon the peasant was supposed
to seek permission from his lord before alienating any part of his holding and pay
around 10 per cent of the price as a fee. The remensas in fifteenth-century Catalonia
lost four-fifths of their farm to the seigneur if they left no child to succeed, and
one-third if they failed to specify which of several children should assume headship
of the household. Though these restrictions were abolished in 1486, the idea of
the land as a pillar of a stable community rather than as an easily transferable
economic asset remained. In Valencia the duke of Infantado would scrutinise the
accounts of those tenants in arrears with their rent to decide whether they should
99
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
be transferred to another holding if their family was too small or too big, or they
were good or bad workers.36
In practice, these controls seem not to have worked very well in early modern
Spain, unlike the situation, for example, in seventeenth-century eastern Europe.
Already in 1595 the Crown was having to issue decrees amending its earlier
rulings on the suertes—‘lots’ or portions—distributed to the Christian colonists of
Granada after 1570. Each had been designed for the upkeep of one household,
but now they were being transferred to non-residents, bartered and sold. So the
commissioners agreed that a settler could have more than one suerte, if acquired
by marriage or inheritance, though trying to insist, still, that any outside the
village where he had his main residence should be reassigned to a child or kinsman.
In fact, during the seventeenth century control was lost, as the lots were divided
up, alienated and bartered. The governor of Llombai (Valencia) admitted that it
was difficult to supervise these transfers adequately (1756). The record of the
sales tax (lluisme) in the seigneurial accounts of Valldigna would indicate a very
high turnover of peasant land in the seventeenth century, as fields were reassigned,
bartered and sold in order to sort out inheritance arrangements (for in most
parts of Spain, except for Catalonia, the custom was subdivision of the farm
anyway among male and female offspring). In fifteenth-century Sueca around a
half of the fields registered in the cadastral survey of 1453 had changed hands
by 1465, and another half between 1494 and 1509.37 About a half of the families
disappeared from the lists altogether over this half century, due either to loss of
their holding or to emigration.
In New Castile the possession of a yoke of oxen seems to have been the threshold
separating the prosperous peasant farmer (labrador) from the rest. In Puebla Nueva
(Toledo), according to the Relaciones of 1575, there were 350 families, ‘and of these
about 70 are peasants and the rest are day-labourers and artisans…and three or
four peasants say they are gentlemen (hidalgos), because they have a patent of
nobility’.38 By the eighteenth century many peasant communities were, in fact,
exceedingly diverse in social composition—perhaps more diverse than they would
ever be again, given the need to provide most services for themselves. Thus Llombai
in 1756, with only 209 families, could boast ‘three notaries…a doctor of medicine,
two surgeons…a veterinary surgeon, a pharmacist…a schoolmaster…a constable
and town-crier’, as well as an impressive range of artisans—bricklayer, carpenter,
blacksmith, tailor, cobbler and the like. Despite the original egalitarianism of the
resettlements, there was a clear drift over the seventeenth century towards social
and economic polarisation. Thus in Muro, a resettlement of 382 households, belonging
to the count of Cocentaina, three members of the Alonso lineage, all boasting the
status of ‘don’, accounted for about a twelfth of the quit-rents saddled on property
in the village (1759). In Gandia in 1752 some 8 per cent of the landowners, who
held over 100 fanegas (perhaps eight to ten hectares) each, were in possession of
nearly half the surface area registered in the cadastre of 1752—a percentage close
to that recorded in 1768 in the nearby royal town of Alzira.39
100
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
Who were these rich men? The peasants of Valldigna alleged in 1803: ‘Those
who are called rich or better off among us are very few, and have to devote themselves
to farming their own land…They can sink into poverty and even to the level of
wage-labourers in a very short space of time.’40 But in New Castile and western
Andalusia the market for grain was creating some very impressive rural entrepreneurs.
Don Gonzalo Muñoz (1609–70) of Ciudad Real acquired some 500 hectares of
land by the time of his death, part of which he placed under entail for his descendants.
The most valuable items in his inventory were his flocks of sheep and the 160
oxen which drew his ploughs. Much of his farming was done on fields not his
own, but leased from the nobility, and his herds depended on access to common
pasture. Made a knight of Alcántara in 1635, he kept a fine house and a number
of slaves; but he hardly ever went to court, busying himself instead with farming
for markets in Seville and elsewhere.41
Such entrepreneurs were clearly not capable of breaking the mould of the Spanish
rural economy, which remained rather self-sufficient and geared fundamentally
to the exploitation of the elaborate structure of feudal, ecclesiastical and royal
extraction of revenue. Thus the Alonsos of Muro were active in the 1690s as
tithe-farmers in their area—that is to say, paying a lump sum to the bishop and
chapter of Valencia for the right to collect the tenth of the peasant harvests, which
they would then transport to market. The Almunias rose during the seventeenth
century as money-lenders and tax-farmers for the duke of Gandia. The Valencian
jurist Tomás Cerdán de Tallada denounced in 1604 what he took to be a scandalous
commercialisation of the whole feudal regime: the exploitation for profit of the
tithe, the coming of middlemen between the seigneur and his vassals, whom he
was obliged to succour and protect. ‘For, in truth, with the money which they
receive in a lump sum from the tax-farmers, [the feudal lords] give themselves
over to gambling and other vices…and waste their estate, so that they no longer
live in their villages.’42
Francisco Benlloch pointed out in his treatise on feudal government of 1756
that revenue farmers from outside the village were generally resented as ‘tumours’,
which drained the substance of the community. Acknowledging that a great lord,
like his master, the duke of Gandia, could not personally administer local rents,
he suggested that these could be handed over to the community itself in return
for a fixed sum in cash. And, indeed, there seems often to have been a movement
in this direction over the early modern period in Castile.43 The process was, no
doubt, uneven, depending a lot on the ability of a rich knot of local inhabitants to
guarantee, come what may in the way of bad harvests, a regular money payment
in a cash-poor society. It may have assumed more informal aspects of patronage,
in keeping with the character of the age. Thus in 1699 the duke of Gandia was
writing from court to his steward that he would need to borrow against the latter’s
name and would allow him to recoup himself out of the following year’s revenue.
The whole correspondence reveals a network of gifts and loans between the duke
and leading personalities in Gandia, which modified the simple relationship of
101
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
tenant and feudal lord. It was, ultimately, through control of the levers of power
and jurisdiction that rural fortunes were amassed in this period, and not just on
feudal estates. The Cortes of 1576–8 complained that ‘the wealthiest inhabitants
of the villages and towns (pueblos), who have lawsuits with the local council and
owe it money’, were buying up municipal office in order to escape tax assessments
and to grab a bigger share of the common lands. ‘It could be truly and perhaps
better said of them that they purchase a kind of lordship over their neighbours.’44
But what were the structures of command in these peasant communities?
Throughout Spain there was a long tradition of peasant self-government. Benlloch
described in 1756 the town hall of Llombai (209 families), with its ground floor a
storehouse for the grain needed for sowing or alms to the poor, its upstairs a
council chamber where the records were carefully locked away in two cupboards.
Though Benlloch, as the governor appointed by the duke of Gandia, presided
over meetings, he had no key to the archive, had to fight to get the duke’s coat of
arms erected over the front door, and was always ill at ease sitting around a table
with rustics who ‘even keep their caps on…and turn up in their underclothes
(paños menores)’.
45 The most important of these peasant officers was the justicia, or
the alcalde, as he was more commonly known in Castile. These were selected in a
variety of ways by the community, with a list of three names generally being
drawn up from which the feudal lord would select one. ‘You cannot be aware, Sir,
what a rural alcalde is in his own village,’ the peasant hero Pedro Crespo tells the
army commander in Calderón’s great drama The Mayor of Zalamea (around 1640),
as he has one of his officers executed for rape.
These justices were supposed to act in consultation with trained lawyers, usually
the local notary. More delicate was their relationship with the feudal lord’s own
judge, the alcalde mayor. Castillo de Bobadilla tended to stress the limitation of the
latter’s power. Disputes over pasture or over crimes committed in the open countryside
would normally anyway come before the special tribunals of the Mesta and the
Hermandad (which we shall examine below in Chapter 8). Otherwise, the peasant
alcaldes had equal jurisdiction with their superiors when it came to trying civil or
criminal cases. If they heard the case first, then an appeal would lie either to the
alcalde mayor or to the royal court, despite the attempt of seigneurs to reserve
appeals to their own judges. Practice varied a good deal from this norm. In the
Crown of Aragon it was probably always more difficult than in Castile to appeal
outside the seigneurial estate. In Valldigna, the justice was often simply one of
the monks who held dominion there, and he regulated the multiple petty conflicts
of rural life, over trespass and debts and vagrancy. His register is a series of short
entries, recording the complaint and the statement of witnesses and the decision.
The atmosphere conjured up is that of the peasant court, the ‘Tribunal of the
Waters’, which still meets outside the cathedral of Valencia on a Thursday morning,
and from which appeals are unthinkable. Certainly it was one of the aims of local
communities to have their own elected justices decide matters in first instance.
Still in 1756 the governor of Llombai noted how imprecise were the frontiers
102
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
between his own court—supposedly in charge of all serious crimes and civil cases
on appeal—and that of the peasant magistrates. Let the governor beware ‘of falling
out with the village administration, but keep on good terms, even if it means
nearly letting them do what they like’.46
The administration of justice was only one part of a wider organisation of
community life. The 300 families of Montiel in New Castile had in 1575, in addition
to their two justices, six aldermen (regidores), a market inspector, two constables
and a clerk of the council. Elsewhere in these Relaciones, we meet references to
attorneys, militia captains, treasurers or tax collectors. Since these offices were
often annually elected, they involved quite a heavy burden at times on small communities.
The backbone of the community was the regidores, who were chosen much like the
justices. In Medina de Ríoseco it was the outgoing aldermen who drew up a list of
names, from which the feudal lord, the Admiral of Castile, selected half as their
successors for the year ahead. When the Admiral protested in 1538 that it was the
same group of forty names which were being rotated and tried to insert his own
nominees, a popular outcry forced him to back down.47 Sale of office by the Crown
shortly afterwards began to reinforce this local oligarchy. In the kingdom of Granada
during the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries a knot of families tended to dominate
the posts of village regidor, often going on to get one of their kinsmen, educated in
law, appointed alcalde mayor through their influence with the seigneur, to whom
they rendered services as tax farmers and the like. Thus the Parada and Guzmán
clans, whose members were rich farmers and petty gentlemen (hidalgos), controlled
the village of Gabia la Grande in the later eighteenth century through a decree
giving half the posts to the few hidalgo families in town, as well as by slipping in
their own protégés to other positions. To complete their domination of the area,
one of their number was appointed as alcalde mayor of the neighbouring village of
Alhendín by its feudal lord.48
In earlier times there had been ‘open assemblies’ of the inhabitants which could
have acted as a check on this process. They seem to have been most active in the
Crown of Aragon, where the heads of households would be called together once
or twice a year, often in the town square, to approve any important business. The
Moriscos of Valldigna held two sessions in 1607–8, summoning a notary to keep
a record of the proceedings. The seigneurs were sometimes nervous of such large
gatherings, since it was these which would decide whether to appoint attorneys to
carry some complaint before the king’s court. The count of Cocentaina began to
insist in the later sixteenth century that the Moriscos of his village of Muro seek
his prior authorisation before assembling and have some member of the count’s
household present who could understand Arabic.49 After the expulsion of the Moriscos,
he further required of the new settlers that they submit to him in advance a list of
the topics they wanted to discuss and vote on them by an open show of hands.
The dukes of Lerma graciously agreed that their vassals of Dénia could discuss
complaints against the seigneur without the governor being present, who would
in any case leave before votes were taken (1563).
103
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
That we know as much as we do about life in these communities is due to the
records kept by the local councils. The account books of the Morisco councillors
of Valldigna in 1607–8 show the immense task of raising money to satisfy the
Crown as well as the seigneur—the payments of the cloth and salt taxes, the ‘benevolence’
exacted that year by Philip III, the wages of the coastal militia, the gifts or bribes
to soldiers in transit ‘so that they would not stop in the village’, all of this absorbed
most disposable funds. But these village magistrates also found money to hire a
horse for a woman to visit her husband gaoled by the Inquisition in Valencia, for
payments to the midwife, for repairs to the well and even to the council chamber…In
Christian communities, of course, more was spent on the church. With just under
200 households, the count of Real’s village of Catarroja seems to have lived out
its own life in the seventeenth century under the guidance of its elected councillors.
The council had a budget of about 1,000 Valencian pounds a year, which it spent
on a schoolteacher, blacksmith and doctor, on the upkeep of the drainage canals
in this marshy area and the decoration of the church, on gifts of mutton to the
poor at Christmas and Easter and on the burial of paupers…Taxation also, as in
Valldigna, ate heavily into income.50
One of the features of the early modern period seems to be, in fact, the slippage
of responsibility for raising taxes and troops from the feudal lords to the peasant
communities themselves. In 1636 the assembly of Muro met in the village church,
shortly after its mistress, the countess of Cocentaina, had pleaded poverty and
inability to raise any troops for the Crown. Now the peasants themselves set down
solemnly in writing their own economic hardship, while offering Philip IV whatever
other communities throughout the kingdom of Valencia were prepared to give. In
the Andalusian village of Luque the order came from the Crown in 1659 to find
13 soldiers or pay a commutation of 50 ducats per man. The town council decided
to raise the levy, seizing ‘the persons who are least necessary to this town’ in their
homes in a series of dawn raids. Again in 1695 the council was faced with an
order from Madrid to send 16 soldiers to the front—one for every 100 families.
No volunteers were forthcoming, whereupon the magistrates resolved to designate
sixteen of the ‘less useful’, while recognising that ‘all the citizens are people who
attend to their work and obligations, and there is no vagrant, or scandalous or
seditious person among them’. The unfortunate sixteen were rounded up and
locked into the butcher’s shop as the strongest place in town, since the gaol was
in ruins.51 What is surprising about all this is the direct dealing between the rural
magistrates and the Crown, while the feudal lord, the count of Luque, only intervenes
peripherally—as in 1683 when he invoked an old privilege which said that while
he was in residence, no troops could be quartered in town. With the reform of the
tax system in the Crown of Aragon under the Bourbons, the nobles became liable
to assessments. In 1736 the count of Carlet objected to the town of Carlet assessing
his quota, ‘for he would become their vassal rather than their lord’.52
The feudal ideal was one of paternalism. A lord was not there just to collect
rents from tenants, commented the duke of Sessa in 1620, as he asked the famous
104
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
Jesuit philosopher Mariana for advice on how to run his estates. Rent collectors
were all that was required ‘in the land between Algiers and Constantinople, but
the laws of a Christian lord aim to win greater respect among his vassals’.53 The
duke of Gandia’s instructions for the newly appointed bailiff of Albalat (1594)
bade him write to the duke in person about any vassal who was ‘living with a
concubine’, or about any other ‘sin’ which came to his notice. Such close control
was becoming less easy as seigneurs began to live away from their villages, in
the district capital or at court. The leading Valencian jurist Tomás Cerdán de
Tallada complained in 1604 of a cooling of relations between lord and vassal as
tax-farmers came between them: ‘the peasants, seeing the absence of their master,
lose respect for his ministers, and get up to all kinds of impudence and nonsense,
with a falling away from good customs’. His Castilian contemporary, Castillo de
Bobadilla, wrote in 1597 of the change coming over rural society. In the old
days seigneurs had been more respected: ‘there were not so many of them as
nowadays, when you meet them at every turn, merchants and others, who lack
the qualities of a proper lord, who can command the respect of his vassals’. Too
many were absentees, leaving administration to some servant, who is out to
feather his own nest and accepts bribes. But he praised the count of Oropesa,
who did live on his estates, and kept a committee of theologians and lawyers
before whom the peasants could plead damages inflicted by the hunt or by the
activities of the count’s officials.54
It became part of the conventional wisdom in political circles at this time that
a revival of the feudal system would be a good thing, in order to stem the depopulation
of the Spanish countryside. The movement coincided with the selling off of many
fiefs by a bankrupt monarchy, but the ideology was based on quite other considerations.
As the Cortes of 1615 put it: ‘With the absence of their lords, vassals lose gifts of
alms, subsidies and help in time of need, and have to put up with a thousand and
one grievances from the alcalde mayor, since their master is not there to defend and
restore them.’55 It is around this time, in fact, that we get the great idealisation of
the rural world in various cultural manifestations. Lope de Vega places on the
Madrid stage the figure of the heroic peasant standing up for his rights against a
tyrannous lord. Since Lope was the protégé of the duke of Sessa and was writing
for an urban and courtly audience, we cannot expect his plays simply to justify
rural insurrection, as they seem to do. Rather, they seem to develop out of a long
period of gestation during the previous century, in which men of letters had cultivated
the serenity and sincerity of rural life as contrasted with the bustle and artificiality
of the city, and had begun to collect already popular sayings and the simple peasant
songs—villancicos—which began to be sung at Christmas especially. Though the
older tradition of the peasant as a figure of fun survived—and rivals the bucolic
idyll in Cervantes’s Don Quixote (1605–14), for example—nevertheless, the economic
decline of Spain at this time gave new urgency to the task of restoring the dignity
of the labrador, the substantial peasant farmer.56 An idealised feudal system, of
patronage and justice, was one part of the dream of statesmen; but did it work?
105
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
There was disquiet in the Cortes that seigneurs often reduced the alcabalas on
their estates in order to attract trade, and the great fairs of Tendilla might serve as
an example of this. The duke of Lerma, as favourite of Philip III, acquired the
right to collect the customs duties in his seaport of Dénia. By 1643, thanks to the
‘ample courtesy’ which the dukes extended to merchants, Dénia was attracting
about an eighth of the value of cargoes entering the kingdom of Valencia. Six
years later, in response to complaints from the farmers of the royal customs duty,
the Crown closed this loophole by taking back the alienated revenues. The people
of Dénia benefited in other ways, though, from the largesse of their masters: the
poor received gifts of money at Christmas and cheap grain in time of need, and
the middle classes could profit by the six bursaries endowed by the great duke of
Lerma for girls to enter his new Augustinian convent. Lerma’s successor as royal
favourite, Olivares, displayed in his will a greater concern for his own vassals
than for the people of Spain. His grandfather had already set up an endowment to
provide bread for the poor, furnish a dowry for the daughters of his poorer vassals,
and help the latter with the payment of their taxes to the king. Now in 1642 the
count-duke devoted the immense sum of 50,000 ducats ‘to public causes and the
increase of my vassals in the first place, and then to that of the other vassals of the
king, our lord’.57
On the other hand, the difficult economic circumstances of the late sixteenth
and seventeenth centuries led many seigneurs to grab money where they could.
The general assembly of the village of Muro, meeting in the parish church in
1657, complained, in the measured tones so typical of the bureaucratised world of
the Spanish peasantry, that their rents were unpayable and arrears were building
up, and the inhabitants ‘had barely enough to eat and were in a desperate plight,
lacking strength to work’. Their absentee master, the count of Cocentaina, had
promised reduction of rents but had done nothing about it.58 Though many of the
seigneurs in Old Castile seem to have commuted the alcabalas for a lump sum, as
on the royal domain, leaving it up to their vassals to raise the money in their own
way, the chronicler Cabrera de Córdova condemned the new lords who were purchasing
these revenues off the Crown: ‘they were not happy with the old commutation
agreed with the treasury, but would increase it by a third or a half, or would
revert to collecting it directly themselves at the full rate of ten per cent’.59
Castillo de Bobadilla gave his opinion in 1597 that those living on seigneurial
estates ultimately lost out. Peasants on the royal domain ‘are better protected
from warfare, less vexed, and enjoy greater peace and justice’. His views perhaps
reflect an older world of private armies and robber barons. But the seventeenth
century was to show that the main burden on the citizen would come from the
state, against which seigneurial jurisdictions might provide some protection. At
least this was the opinion of the deputy of Salamanca to the Cortes of 1625, who
pointed out that feudal lords got the tax quotas reduced for their peasants, and
shifted the burden of billeting on to the royal towns. And in 1640, in the kingdom
of Valencia, the royal town of Callosa was complaining that her inhabitants were
106
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
leaving for the shelter of the neighbouring seigneurial estates, which were better
protected against levies of troops and taxes.60 The sheer problem of royal fiscalism
in its various guises is suggested by the history of peasant revolts in seventeenthcentury Catalonia. The revolution of 1640 began as a protest against billeting
and threatened to spread into an attack on the nobility, until they managed to
divert popular anger against the court. The insurrection of the Barretines in 1688
was initially a peasant protest against the burden of troop billets in a period of
agricultural hardship, but developed into a challenge to the right of the seigneurs
to collect the ecclesiastical tithe for themselves, and to control the baking of bread
and the supply of meat.61
Studies of the widespread revolts in the French countryside in the seventeenth
century have raised the question of how far the feudal lords were indeed able to
or disposed to shield their vassals against royal tax demands, since they themselves
were often the beneficiaries of the monarchical system. The duke of Gandia, who
had received generous treatment from the Crown in the matter of his debts, remarked
in 1636 that, though he was too poor to raise troops himself, he had facilitated
the activity of recruiting officers on his estates, ‘for they could not have raised a
man, had I not lent my authority’. And in Castile around the same time, the duke
of Béjar, while interceding with the Crown on behalf of his vassals in the matter
of tax demands, levies and billets, was forced to admit that it was dangerous to
resist too much.62 We shall explore this topic later in relation to the aristocracy
(see below, Chapter 7). Here one may simply note that, given that the Crown was
now dealing directly with the peasant communities themselves, through their elected
magistrates rather than through the feudal lords, the exemption from state fiscalism
looked increasingly problematic. The great peasant revolt of 1693 in Valencia,
the Second Germanía, revealed one dangerous implication of this process: that the
rural communities and the Crown might reach an agreement to provide more
taxes, at the expense of the seigneurs. The rebel leader, Francesc Garcia, was
alleged to have offered the king, through two Franciscan intermediaries at court,
a regiment of volunteers, ‘fitted out and paid’, for the war then raging against
Louis XIV on the Pyrenean frontier.63
The question of resistance to the seigneurs was bound up with the whole attitude
of the monarchy and its ministers to the feudal hierarchy. For a royal judge like
Castillo de Bobadilla disorder in the countryside was of immediate concern to the
government, which would intervene to adjudicate disputes. ‘Thus I have advised
some lords on occasion that, regarding acts of insolence or offences committed
against them by their vassals…they might draw up heads of indictment and even
gaol…those at fault, but for redress they should have recourse to the king.’ And a
few years later Venetian ambassador Soranzo commented that even the grandees
commanded little respect from their vassals, ‘for they can be summoned to court
by any one of these who feels himself aggrieved, and they are obliged to obey the
law like the meanest commoner’.64 No doubt the reality was more complex than
the theory, especially in the more remote parts of Spain, which were hard to police.
107
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
The community of Ariza in Aragon had long been clamouring for its restoration
to the royal domain, before matters came to a head in 1556 with the introduction
of a new impost by its seigneur, Don Juan de Palafox. Faced with the refusal of
the peasants to pay, Palafox brought in a gang of men armed with arquebuses and
crossbows, who were quartered on the population and seized the crops. Recourse
to the courts got nowhere, and the assassination of Palafox by his vassals in 1561
only entailed further retribution by his enraged kinsmen. Eventually at the Cortes
of 1585 Philip II gave way to the noble call for a full acknowledgement of seigneurial
authority in Ariza.65
The fairly frequent disturbances in the Aragonese—and Valencian—fiefs at this
time bring to light several general points. In the first place, there needed to be
some perceived sense of injustice—often the setting aside of old charters, or the
introduction of new levies—for the peasants to act. Outside encouragement seems
to explain one of the most serious revolts: that of Ribagorza against the dukes of
Villahermosa between 1578 and 1589. The Crown had been interested in recovering
this fief, strategically sited in the high Pyrenees along the border with France, as
early as 1554. In 1578 the deputies who assembled every January in Benabarre
from the various villages on the estate to discuss matters of general concern, withdrew
their allegiance to the duke. Their leader, Juan de Ager, claimed to be acting in
the king’s name, as he ‘seized and killed those whom he judged deserving of
death’, and he would not respect the warrant of either the courts in Zaragoza or of
the king himself, apparently on the pretext familiar to rural insurgents that he
knew the royal will better than did the authorities. Meanwhile, in the highest part
of this mountain territory, the town of Benasque decided to oppose Ager. ‘As far
as I can tell,’ the chronicler Argensola tells us, they did so ‘not because they loved
the duke, though they did not hate him either, but for their own advantage, since
they thought that they could have their own way better under the duke than
under the king.’ The leaders of Benasque were the Bardaxí, a gentry family which
had small lordships of their own in the area and kept bandit gangs in their pay,
‘men who turn their hand to whatever is asked of them, without thinking of the
danger to their own life or conscience’.66 Unwisely, the duke of Villahermosa now
used these bandits to storm Benabarre, kill Ager and reimpose his authority (1587),
whereupon the other side gathered its own outlaws, and an authentic civil war
began to rage in and around the disputed county of Ribagorza. The events merged
with the general resistance of the Aragonese nobility to Philip II over their laws
and privileges in 1590, and was settled when the king’s army invaded Aragon the
following year and arrested Villahermosa (on rather flimsy grounds), reincorporating
Ribagorza into the royal domain.
The Aragonese troubles suggest the influence of factions within the rural community,
and the link between these and the outside world, in the development of relationships
of confrontation between vassals and seigneur. The question of social divisions
may also have to be taken into account. Resolving in 1645 to reopen its lawsuit
for restoration to the royal domain, the town of Segorbe accused its duke of having
108
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
obtained the agreement of 1619 to drop litigation (above, p. 92) by fraud. He had
overawed the assembly of inhabitants, ‘who are common folk, by gifts, promises,
blandishments and threats’. Just what was at stake in any of these encounters has
to be the object of specialised research. A difference would have to be drawn
between a wealthy, middle-class town like Segorbe and a hill village like Muro,
though both were involved in protests against their seigneurs. The economic circumstances
of the seventeenth century no doubt led to a general resentment of excessive rents.
Franciscan friars and many of the parish priests were to be found in Valencia
preaching that these were too high, especially when added to the king’s increasing
demands for taxes and soldiers. One report spoke of their being motivated by
‘compassion’, but went on to attack their ‘lack of understanding, and a proper
religious outlook’.67 The priests were undoubtedly a force behind the peasant uprising
of 1693, though they did not furnish the leaders. If the rebels unfurled banners of
Our Lady and Saint Vincent Ferrer, they also brandished their charters. The actual
fighting was done by poorer peasants, but behind them one can detect the shadowy
figures of the village ‘magnates’, as the duke of Gandia was to call them—men like
the Alonso family of Muro, whom we have met before, who were active in mediating
between the insurgents and the Crown. The actual uprising of July 1693 was
sparked off by the arrest of four rent-strikers by the duke of Gandia. It was a
spontaneous movement of popular anger in the hot harvest months, when rents
fell due, and it rather quickly evaporated in the face of the royal militia. But it can
only be understood as part of a wider negotiation under way on the estates of the
duke of Gandia and others for the commutation of feudal rents by a fixed sum—a
sum which would be guaranteed by the wealthier members of the community.68
The debate remained to envenom relations on the Gandia estates during the
eighteenth century. Though the seigneurs were often now absentees, it is important
not to overestimate the relay of power to an elite of peasant farmers. The count of
Aranda retired to his fief of Epila near Zaragoza to live out the last three years of
his life (1795–8), after a busy career in government. There, in the Aragonese countryside,
he took up the reins of local administration again as the undisputed master. Shortly
before, Jovellanos had observed that the gentry of Asturias ‘live for the most part
on their lands and deal at all hours of the day with their peasants’. On New Year’s
Day they came with their gifts of chickens and fruit to the big house, where a big
meal awaited them, presided over by the master and his wife.69 Antonio Ponz
found lots of improving landlords as he travelled round Spain in the 1780s—the
marquis of Santa Cruz and his woollen factory in La Mancha, the count of Sástago
with his irrigation canals and olive plantations in Aragon. Clearly, some of the
feudal lords were beginning to envisage a new role for themselves at this time as
Amigos del País—‘Friends of their Country’, to quote the title of the local improvement
clubs of which many were members.
But it is also true that a long tradition of peasant self-government and the
growth of a rural middle class continued to pose a challenge to their authority in
certain circumstances. The duke of Infantado was warned by his steward in 1796
109
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
to keep a particularly vigilant eye on the hacendados, the wealthy vassals, ‘given
the enormous influence they have in the running of the villages, since they are
usually the leaders when it comes to resisting the payment of dues to Your Excellency,
to which end they stir up unjust lawsuits’. On the other hand, the villages of the
duke of Arcos were complaining in 1814 that their wealthier inhabitants were
often on the side of the seigneur, ‘the only way they can have of turning themselves
into señores and despots, though on a smaller scale’.70
When one looks at the record of usurpation of common land and the farming
out of seigneurial mills and the like, one can see their point. As population increased
in the eighteenth century, a certain land hunger began to sour relations within the
rural communities. The flashpoint was often the common lands, which the Crown
ordered in 1766 to be subdivided into small plots and leased cheaply, preferably
to labourers and poorer peasants. When it reversed this policy in 1770 and decided
that substantial farmers with plough-teams would make a better job of cultivation,
it aroused much controversy. It had already, folllowing bread riots of 1766, decreed
that the poorer members of a community were to be represented in its government
by the election of diputados and personeros del común. In the Andalusian agro-town of
Osuna, the elections were usually conducted on a very low turn-out of 5 per cent
or less. The wage-labourers took their case for access to common land through
other channels—through a religious confraternity and through a self-taught leader
from their own ranks, Antonio Calderón. In a confused struggle, the duke of
Osuna seemed to back Calderón against the local oligarchy in 1767–8.71
The attitude of small-town elites towards their feudal lord depended on a variety
of factors. In many cases they benefited from alliance with him, through control
of rents, mills and offices. But there always existed the risk of conflict over where
ultimate authority lay. Don Mateo Cebrián, member of the gentry of Gandia and
dean of the collegiate church of that town, clashed with the duchess of Gandia
over her intervention in the former Jesuit college. This quarrel led to the dismissal
of Mateo’s cousin, Francisco, from his post of ducal attorney, entrusted with defending
the seigneur’s privileges (1786). It turned out to be a bad move on the duchess’s
part, since, within a few years, the Cebrián clan turned from gamekeepers to
poachers and threw their great influence behind a popular movement to have the
town reincorporated in the royal domain.72 On another part of the Gandia estates,
meanwhile, the village of Catadau was litigating for its restoration to the Crown’s
jurisdiction. The protagonists seem again to be some of the wealthier members of
the community. Their success, though, depended on leading a wider popular movement.
Since Catadau had been riven by social divisions increasingly over the later eighteenth
century, as population expanded and the wealthier farmers and traders got the
poor into their debt, the question has been asked as to how the unity of the village
was maintained during the costly lawsuit against the dukes of Gandia.73
No doubt, the pattern of resistance to the seigneurs, or cooperation with them,
requires a detailed investigation of the social and economic structure of the individual
communities. One can, however, draw a few general conclusions. In principle,
110
FEUDAL LORDS AND VILLAGE POTENTATES
despite the occasional collaboration between the wealthier local families and the
feudal lord, the feudal system was often deeply unpopular with those who had a
claim to status in their own right and who could remember a time—usually before
the great alienations of the fifteenth century—when their town had belonged to
the Crown. In the eighteenth century the changes which were beginning to affect
the economy as a whole—growth of population and trade, breakdown of the old
autarky of the countryside—exposed some of the contradictions of the seigneurie.
Its justification, as set out by Castillo de Bobadilla in 1597, was as an arm of
government, a delegation of responsibility for good order on to a family of honour.
Towards the end of the Old Regime it was apparent that this ideal was very far
from the practice. In Elx, in the kingdom of Valencia, the marquises were increasingly
involved in marketing crops and keeping stricter accounts of their revenues, rather
abandoning the old ideal of protection of their vassals—though the police power
of their court still served them well when it came to collecting rents. The betteroff families of Elx shared the new commitment to production for the market,
indulging especially in the sale of olive oil and sodawort (in which the area was
rich), and in speculation with grain. Old controls typical of the Christian commonwealth
were now seen as an impediment to economic growth and prosperity. Thus, in
1765 the government proclaimed the end of restrictions on the grain trade. The
upheaval which followed in Elx in the spring of 1766 was compounded of many
factors: resentment by the poor at the abandonment of the ‘moral economy’ which
took their need for bread as its highest priority, resentment by some of the lower
middle classes at the continuing monopolisation of mills, ovens and shops by either
the seigneur or a handful of privileged families, and, finally, a resurfacing of the
old demand of the better-off that their town should be returned to the royal domain
(from which it had been alienated in 1470).74
The revolts of 1766, here and elsewhere in Spain, resolved very little. They
exposed, rather, some of the fundamental dilemmas in the transition from a feudal
to a capitalistic economy if that transition did not include some formal recognition
of the new political weight exercised by big farmers at the expense of feudal lords.
Indeed, it was probably becoming apparent that the crisis of social relations between
rulers and ruled could not be resolved without a major refashioning of the structures
of power in the nation as a whole.
111
6
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
 The urban commonwealth
The early modern city had an identity which its successors lacked. Marked out by walls
and privileges, by charters of liberty and separate citizenship rights, it stood as a bastion
of freedom in a still feudal countryside. It may be difficult to draw too clear a contrast of
this kind in the case of Spain. In the first place, the criterion of size—that a city should
have 10,000 or more inhabitants—may not capture the reality of a land of agro-towns.
Equally, many small places maintained traditions of political hegemony. Burgos, though
it had fallen from about 13,000 to about 3,500 people between 1592 and 1669, still
claimed its ancient headship of Castile, contesting the right of Toledo (also on its way to
becoming a musuem town) to take precedence in the Cortes or parliament.1
About one in ten Spaniards lived in towns which, at one time or another between
1500 and 1800, reached the 10,000 mark.2
 This was slightly higher than the European
average. There were two giants: the political capital, Madrid, which reached its
maximum of about 150,000 in the middle of the seventeenth century, and the
gateway to the New World, Seville, which also had 150,000 people before the
plague of 1649 and the fading of its economic hegemony. Then came a scattering
of provincial capitals—Granada, Valencia, Barcelona—with around 40,000–50,000
inhabitants each, before one reached the average city, with its bishop and royal
judge (corregidor), of 10,000–20,000 people. The city was in part a market, but it
provided a wider range of services than that. Liñán Verdugo’s guide-book to seventeenthcentury Madrid depicts the countryman coming to town with his satchels of legal
documents slung across his shoulder, and Lope de Vega’s eponymous hero, Peribáñez,
came up to Toledo to have his community’s statue of Saint Roque repainted.
The political role of the urban commune has been emphasised by historians of
medieval Europe. The acquisition of charters of self-government in Spain might
sometimes be accompanied by violence, as in Santiago de Compostela in 1116–
17, when the merchants rose up against their bishop. But more usually the Spanish
towns, as heirs to a long Roman and Arabic tradition, were regarded by rulers as
integral parts of the hierarchy of power, and received their charters in the twelfth
and thirteenth centuries in order to attract settlers and provide a nucleus of regional
government.3
 The Catholic Kings, granting self-government to Granada in 1500,
112
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
spoke of their desire to ‘ennoble the said city…and that the nobles and gentlemen
who come to settle and live there may have offices and dignities…and that all the
citizens and inhabitants…may have franchises and liberties, so that the said city
may come to be populous and renowned’.4
 It was not only as allies of the Crown
in the task of government that the cities had a crucial role to play, but as exemplars
of virtue for their own citizens. It was this aspect of things which the Granadan
chronicler Bermúdez de Pedraza stressed in 1608: ‘in great and populous cities…there
are many convents of holy friars and nuns, and virtuous clerics and laymen of
godly life, for whose sake God forgives the sins of the rest’. And Escolano shortly
afterwards wrote of his native Valencia that she had not only access to a wide
range of commodities by sea, but ‘her citizens, living near the sea, have a sharpness
of wit from the diversity of nations with which they deal every day and the knowledge
of a variety of things drawn from them’.5
 On the other hand, there were already
voices warning against the artificiality and pressure of urban life. The great Renaissance
humanist, Fray Antonio de Guevara, penned an eloquent praise of rural existence
in 1539: ‘in the village there are no windows overlooking your house, there are
no people jostling you, there are no horses running you down…’. And the figure
of the city swindler which he evoked was to be taken up and developed by seventeenthcentury writers. The government itself, as part of its measures for arresting the
decline of Spain, tried to halt immigration to the really big cities—Madrid, Seville,
Granada—employing the language of surgery about the accumulation of ‘evil humours’
and the need for a ‘copious blood-letting’.6
But this early concern with economic realities—unemployment, pauperism, disease—
could not mask the older pride in the city as a manifestation of virtue. The Spanish
cities were sacred spaces, with their great cathedrals and convents, and their protecting
shrines. Madrid had her three patrons: Our Lady of Almudena (an image found
at the reconquest of the city from the Moor), Our Lady of Atocha (an image
carved by Saint Luke, hidden as the Saracens overwhelmed Madrid, then miraculously
rediscovered at the Reconquest), and Saint Isidore, a virtuous peasant whose spirit
appeared to the king at the decisive battle of Las Navas de Tolosa (1212) which
opened the way to the reconquest of Andalusia. Isidore was canonised in 1622 as
part of the government campaign to restore the dignity of agriculture, while Our
Lady of Atocha was endowed with a sumptuous shrine by Philip II in 1588, being
paraded through the streets of Madrid in time of plague or war. The crusading
memory seems to have played a decisive role in the sense of identity of many
Spanish towns. Thus, Valencia celebrated its birthday every year on 9 October,
the day, not on which the city had actually been retaken from the Moors, but on
which the mosques had been reconsecrated for Christian worship, and the religious
imagery was paramount in the fiestas mounted by the city fathers. No civic guard
in the style of Rembrandt graces the town halls of Spain. The one great civic
monument in old Granada was the column erected by the aldermen in 1628 to
honour the Immaculate Conception, on which were displayed the arms of the
city, watched over by Saint Cecil (the town patron), Saint James (‘hammer of the
113
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
Moors’) and the Virgin herself. The finest embodiment in art of the great trading
city of Seville is perhaps the canvas commissioned in 1615 by the king, commemorating
the great procession of men and boys that year in honour of the Immaculate Conception,
protector of the urban commonwealth.
Max Weber’s suggestion that the urban commune transformed relations between
people, cutting across older ties of kinship or feudal dependence, may not be
applied wholesale to Spain. Belonging to a town by birth or by formal inscription
in a register of citizens certainly conferred privileges—as the aldermen of Valencia
(jurats) pointed out in 1626, when they tried to stop the king collecting tolls from
those who had settled within the walls and opened a shop. Only those born in
Valencia were supposed to enjoy such exemptions; but since the 1590s the jurats
had been neglecting to keep registers of concessions of citizenship, and by 1635,
when war broke out with France, the monarchy took control of the issue of residence
permits to French nationals. After this, it was either the state or the guilds which
determined one’s right to work locally.
The walls of a town stood as a material symbol of its identity. At the humilladeros
—the crosses which marked its frontier—the wary traveller would dismount, kneel
and pray before setting off into a still dangerous countryside. Since the great wars
of the fourteenth century, when Barcelona and Valencia built the magnificent fortifications
which survived down to the nineteenth century, the walls of Spanish towns had
generally been allowed to fall into decline. Travellers from the war-torn Europe
of the 1500s and 1600s were surprised at how Spain managed to get along with
medieval ramparts, and how little was spent on the bastions and counter-scarps
of contemporary defence. But the walls were still used as a control on movement
in and out, and particularly for the collection of the sisas or excise tax, which was
the basis of municipal budgets. Faced with bankruptcy in 1647, Valencia put forward
proposals to limit the entry of carts to just four main gates, to have all carts and
coaches thoroughly inspected, and have men on horseback dismount for examination.
Within the walls a labyrinth of twisted streets greeted the traveller. The narrow,
badly paved streets of Seville, commented Antonio Ponz in the 1780s, ‘kept the
mean, confused character imprinted on them by the boorishness or superstition
of the Moors’; while the winding alleys and cul-de-sacs of Toledo reflected ‘the
fierceness and suspicious temperament’ of that people.7
 From the fifteenth century,
in Spain as in other parts of Europe, the city became a stage on which was played
out the ritual of power needed by Renaissance rulers. Harmony, uniformity, grandeur,
these were the messages which urban architecture was meant to convey, while at
the same time providing space for great processions and tournaments. In 1502
Toledo sought to lay out a fine square in front of the alcázar or royal fortress,
whose surrounding buildings should all be of the same height, while Granada in
1513 laid out its ‘Field of the Prince’ (Campo del Príncipe) ‘for fiestas of jousting and
bull-fighting’.8
 These efforts were usually only successful, however, where either
there was much vacant space (as in Granada), or where fire destroyed buildings
(Valladolid in 1561, Toledo in 1585), and, above all, where the monarchy itself
114
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
got involved in fomenting the buying up and tearing down of houses. The outstanding
examples of the central plaza as a theatre of display—Madrid 1618, Cordoba in
the 1680s, Salamanca slightly later—reflect the activity of royal ministers or their
delegates, and correspond to the triumph of absolute monarchy in seventeenthcentury Spain. The Bourbons took this legacy further, but modifying it according
to the dictates of patriotism, dear to the Enlightenment. Ponz urged that the wellordered city should have ‘a competent number of statues and a wealth of inscriptions
set up in different places, which should set out how the city was founded, some of
its local laws, the glory of its sovereigns and of its more illustrious sons… [as] an
open book from which all could learn’.9
By this time, civil society was also claiming its rights. Many Spanish cities had
their alamedas, walks lined with poplars or other trees. The famous Paseo del Prado
in Madrid was laid out by Charles III (1760–88), landscaping a walk which had
been enjoyed by the local citizenry for centuries. It was again in the eighteenth
century that Granada laid out its paseo towards the River Genil, though there had
been a cross there for a long time before, which attracted pilgrims and strollers on
Saint Sebastian’s Day (20 January). In the seventeenth century it was more likely
that Granadans would take their promenade along the banks of the other river, the
Darro, below the walls of the Alhambra palace, or head out on a summer’s evening
‘to take the fresh air and say a prayer’ at the monument to the Immaculate Conception,
which we mentioned earlier.10 The secularisation of leisure only began to alter the
familiar landmarks of the Spanish city from the eighteenth century onwards.
What gave order to Granada, thought its chronicler Bermúdez de Pedraza (1638),
was ultimately the network of markets—the plazas or squares, ‘the stomach of this
commonwealth, from which food is distributed throughout its members’. It was
an important task of the corregidor, affirmed Castillo de Bobadilla, to regulate these
activities—to separate out ‘the things which give off an evil odour, from which the
air usually grows foul and plague ensues’. So, butchers’ shops, tanneries, oil presses,
ponds for retting flax, stables, ‘even ovens for baking bricks’, must all be kept to
the edge of town. Even respectable trades, like tailors, shoemakers and blacksmiths,
‘who as well as cluttering up the street, foul it with their rags and waste’, should
not be allowed to set up their stalls at street corners.11 The petitions of the Cortes
of Valencia give a vivid picture of streets encumbered with work benches and
awnings (1604), of crowded squares where horses, hauling in carts loaded with
grain, could too easily trample on the unwary pedestrian (1585), of carpenters
filling the little market-place in front of the convent of Our Lady of Ransom with
their planks, forcing the vegetable stalls too close to the entrance to the chapel
(1547 and 1604). The meeting of peasant and artisan gave the towns of this period
their special character.
Though there was a certain distribution of trades by neighbourhood, the topography
of the city was surely marked out first by religious buildings. Antonio Ponz, commenting
on the great number of little parish churches, gave his opinion that ‘in those turbulent
times of conquest and civil strife, each kinship group would found a parish of its
115
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
own’. Though he gave no evidence for his hypothesis, the 21 parish churches of
Toledo, for a population of 11,254 families (1561), were uneven in size and endowment,
and seem to respond to social rather than pastoral needs. Adding in convents, it
has been calculated that a sixth of the area within the walls of Valencia must have
been covered by ecclesiastical buildings.12 Many of these had ties with particular
trades through the chapels where the guilds held their reunions. In Granada guilds
and neighbourhoods marked out their space, as the manuscript chronicle (1588–
1646) of Henríquez de Jorquera tells us, with images and crosses of alabaster or
wood, where groups would gather on a Saturday for prayer. As well as churches,
the palaces of the nobility gave a structure to the urban landscape, forming so
many nuclei around which clustered the homes of their dependants. Mesonero
Romanos described the south-western quarters of Madrid, between the streets of
Segovia, Toledo and Atocha, where the dukes of Infantado owned many of the
buildings, where their kinsmen occupied different palaces, alongside the offices
where the peasants came to pay their rents, the homes of employees and the hospital
‘for servants of the estate’. In the disturbances of 1520 in Seville, the parish of
San Miguel erected barricades on behalf of the duke of Medina Sidonia, while
that of San Marcos did the same for his great rival, the duke of Arcos.13
Though older treatises—like that of Fray Luis de León in 1583—might still
look askance at the urban world as less godly than that of the farmer, the trend
over the early modern period was to try to fit the craftsman into the divine
scheme of things. Work was part of God’s plan for the redemption of man,
affirmed the jurist Gutiérrez de los Ríos in his important treatise of 1600 (dedicated
to, of all people, the indolent duke of Lerma). Though agriculture ‘makes the
mind good, simple and devout’, even trade could be considered as developing
the soul, so long as it was conducted ‘with moderate gain’. Work sharpened the
wits and differentiated men from animals, but above all it uprooted the deadly
sin of ‘idleness’ (ociosidad). So, another jurist, López Bravo, believed that ‘it does
not matter that there is nothing noble in workshops and that the man who is
immersed in petty, base affairs has rarely the capacity for lofty and generous
thoughts’, the artisan should be admitted to honour and even local office (so
long as he gave up his business for the time being). ‘I believe,’ he went on, ‘that
praise should be given to someone who, from a humble origin, raises himself up
by the ladder of thrift to wealth and comfort by means of his honest toil.’14 It
took some time for these ideas to be embodied in law. In 1682 the Crown decreed
that those who owned a woollen manufacture, so long as they did not work in it
in person, were eligible for nobility; and finally in 1783 it adopted López Bravo’s
recommendation that artisans were all ‘honest and honourable’ men and entitled
to be elected to municipal office.
This, of course, highlighted two fundamental problems: that honour and social
status in old Spain had come from one’s position in the local community, and that
the community was geared to a higher function than the mere making of money.
The great economic historian Carande, in the title of a famous essay, called Seville
116
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
‘a fortress and a market’, and it is a useful reminder of the twin functions of the
Spanish town. Talking of the Andalusian towns of the fifteenth century, the chronicler
Argote de Molina noted in 1588 that in them resided ‘all the armed might’ along
the Granadan frontier; and two centuries later the political theorist Madramany
compared those of the Crown of Aragon after the Reconquest to ‘little republics,
responsible for civil and military administration’, and their aldermen ‘in a sense
like those invested with military fiefs’.15 According to the parish priest and historian
of Chelva in 1681, though the king was the supreme governor of the realm of
Valencia—‘father, tutor and protector of his subjects’ —nevertheless, he had delegated
most ordinary authority on to the aldermen (jurats) of the city of Valencia, among
whose onerous responsibilities were those of keeping the population fed. The roll
of cloth which the jurats wore on their shoulders, topping off their splendid crimson
robes, were a reminder, thought Escolano in 1610, of the loaves of bread which it
was their sacred function to provide for their charges. Consuls, ‘like those of
ancient Rome’, Escolano called them; and it was the Roman image which Castillo
de Bobadilla had in mind when he depicted the responsibilities of Castilian aldermen.
Though the ‘Roman people’ had transferred to the Emperor lawmaking and judicial
power, ‘nonetheless it kept for itself the administration of many things’; and if,
for a royal corregidor like Castillo de Bobadilla, the aldermen (regidores) were only
advisers, yet those of the eighteen cities represented in the Cortes or parliament
held the dignity of grandees.16 When the chief magistrates of the city of Valencia
set out for court in October 1598 to convey their condolences to the new king on
the death of his father, Philip II, all the knights escorted the procession to the
gates, while on their arrival ‘all Madrid turned out to see the entry’, while all the
nobles who had fiefs in Valencia and were then at court came to accompany the
aldermen from their lodgings to the palace.
The aldermen were entrusted with a wide variety of responsibilities: the supply
of bread, ordinary civil and criminal jurisdiction, the regulation of work and trade,
the patronage of education and—through the fiesta—of religion as well. Assisting
them was a wide variety of officials—judges, market inspectors, constables, taxcollectors, fiesta commissioners—who were sometimes annually renewable, thus
involving many citizens in the government of their local community. The towns
of Castile seem to have divided themselves from an early date into so-called ‘lineages’
or factions—twelve in Soria, seven in Medina del Campo, two in Segovia, three in
Trujillo, two in Avila, eight (finally reducing to two) in Salamanca. These lineages
were in the nature of political clubs, which may originally have followed some
pattern of kinship or neighbourhood. But in 1601–2 those of Soria agreed that a
man might claim entry to his wife’s group if he had none of his own; and by 1577
a third faction—the ‘neutrals’ —had formed in Jerez to dispute office with the two
old-established ones of the Villavicencio and Dávila. Still, the pride in belonging
to these clubs was very tenacious, and down to the end of the Old Regime those
of Salamanca sat on separate benches at meetings of the town council.17 For it was
as electors to municipal office that these groupings acquired their significance.
117
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
An important development took place in the middle of the fourteenth century,
with the rise of the regidores, an inner council of aldermen. In 1345 Alfonso XI
nominated sixteen such individuals in Burgos, from among the citizens who served
as horse-soldiers, ‘for in meetings many individuals turn up who only sow discord
and raise obstacles in matters which are of interest to and requisite for our royal
service and for the common good of this city and of its vassals’.18 Thereafter the
lineages were often involved, especially in Old Castile, in electing this inner council.
In Segovia, for example, the two lineages elected ten regidores, with another five
being deputies of the ordinary tax-payers and of the peasantry of the district. But
there was increasing concern that all such elections pandered to the worst instincts
of the citizen and impeded that good government which Renaissance thinkers
desired. ‘Often in the elections…the inhabitants engage in great rivalry and argument,
and kill one another,’ ran one account of Medina del Campo. In 1621 the corregidor
of Soria complained to the king about the way in which deputies to the Cortes
were chosen by the old lineages, ‘for among these is a great number of poor people,
of very little intelligence, knowing little beyond work in the fields…and selling
their votes has become a kind of heirloom for them’.19
The civil war of 1474–9 over the succession of Queen Isabel the Catholic led
to that monarch’s intervention in the municipal government of various towns.
Thus, in Cáceres from 1477 the queen ordered that the twelve regidores were henceforth
to be appointed by the Crown for life, at the same time as she demolished the
towers from which the urban lineages had fought their feuds.20 In the late-conquered
territories of Andalusia, it would seem, royal control was established earlier, and
the lineages played relatively little part. Thus in Seville from 1351 it was the
outgoing magistrates who nominated individuals to the post of regidor for life,
sending up the names to the king for confirmation. Here the division was not by
lineage, rather half the nominees had to be of noble birth.
In the Crown of Aragon municipal government was somewhat differently
organised, but one can recognise similar trends towards oligarchy and royal
control. In Valencia from the middle of the fourteenth century the king began
to nominate his own list of twelve knights and twelve commoners, from which
were drawn every year by lot the six jurats or aldermen. This system seems to
have taken definitive shape during the reign of Alfonso the Magnanimous (1416–
58). More generally in these Mediterranean kingdoms at this time fixed lists of
citizens were drawn up—usually co-opted by their peers, though the king had
variable rights of nominating candidates—from among whom the magistrates
for the year ahead were drawn by lot.21 These so-called insaculats—that is, ‘those
whose names had been placed in a bag’ for life—constituted an oligarchy of respectable
citizens (rather like the regidores of Castilian towns) on whom the Crown could
more confidently devolve responsibility for local affairs. The regidores themselves
were developing into a hereditary elite from the fifteenth century onwards. In
Seville and in Jerez from around 1400 various of their number began to petition
the Crown for permission to hand the office on to their children. More surprisingly,
118
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
the same trend is visible in the lineage-based towns of Old Castile, where the
factions were persuaded to agree to individuals, with royal permission, passing
on the post of town councillor to their descendants.22
Consolidating this process was the sale of these posts by an increasingly bankrupt
monarchy from 1543 onwards. The sales were not limited to existing offices;
rather, new ones were created. In Valladolid the number of regidores doubled to
forty-one by the early seventeenth century, in Madrid to thirty-seven over the
same period, and in Seville to fifty-two. By 1600 a further concession was granted
to individuals in return for cash: that their heirs could succeed automatically to
the office without having to renegotiate the privilege with the Crown. These
posts began to change hands for enormous sums, generally reaching a peak of
around 4,000 ducats by the early seventeenth century (as in the case of Valladolid),
though as much as 8,500 ducats—a year’s income for one of the lower titled
nobility—in the metropolis of Seville.23 This new life-tenured elite was envisaged
as a partner for the monarchy in the maintenance of a hierarchical, ordered
society. In Valencia the Crown sold off its rights of selecting the candidates for
the annual lottery for positions of jurat, by establishing a fixed list of sixty citizens
appointed for life, who would share the sweets of power. There was a big debate
over the wisdom of this move in 1633. The viceroy protested that it would weaken
his authority and increase the irresponsibility of the ruling families, but the
Council of Aragon seems to have felt that the king’s business could be more
satisfactorily conducted through dealing with an oligarchy which owed its very
existence to royal favour.24
The issue had surfaced shortly before in another Valencian town, Castelló
de la Plana, where in 1626 the guilds demanded the right to participate in the
annual lottery for aldermen. Despite some support, the majority of the Council
of Aragon opposed the petition: ‘the towns which placed most difficulty in the
way of Your Majesty’s service have been those where the ordinary people have
a role in government, because, having less experience and talent in public affairs,
they do not look to the general good but only to getting out of the obligation of
paying taxes’.25 Castillo de Bobadilla, meanwhile, had assigned only a limited
role to the popular voice in Castilian towns. It was true that the ‘general will
and authority’ lay with the population as a whole, but it had effectively delegated
responsibility on to the aldermen. On the other hand, it was sensible to consult
‘persons of zeal, reflection and experience’ in matters of importance, ‘for the
common people take great satisfaction in seeing that a proper effort is being
made to reach a satisfactory decision’.26
There was, in fact, quite a lively tradition of popular representation in the
Crown of Aragon, in harmony with their stronger guild structures. In Barcelona,
for example, the Council of One Hundred included 48 patricians, 32 merchants
and 64 artisans. Its counterpart in Valencia, the General Council, was a large
body of over 140 individuals, with representatives from the parishes (designated
by the aldermen) and from the guilds (elected jointly by the aldermen and a committee
119
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
of guildsmen). In practice, artisans dominated the body, some of them being clearly
men of influence who were returned one year for a guild, another for a parish,
and so on. It is perhaps misleading to label such individuals as ‘representatives of
the people’; many of them must have been like the great city politician of Philip
IV’s reign, Joan Lluch Ivars, described as a ‘silk weaver’ at the baptism of his first
son in 1599, then as a merchant in 1602, then as a ‘citizen’ in 1604. This cornering
of popular office by powerful men took place in Castile even more blatantly. There
was no popular assembly as such in Castilian cities, but the parishes were allowed
to elect jurados, who would assist the aldermen with their ‘voice’ or opinion, and in
a few places with their vote as well. At the election of 1558 in the parish of San
Juan in Murcia, four candidates presented themselves. Ginés Juan Jiménez emphasised
first his Old Christian ancestry, then his long residence in the parish, his wealth
and his maintenance of a horse: ‘I am an honourable person, a good Christian, a
man of conscience…’27 But the election of 1558 was the first for some time, provoked
by the death of the incumbent. As in all small-scale societies, it would have been
regarded as something of an affront to challenge an existing office-holder, and
jurados were not only allowed to continue until their death but increasingly, with
royal permission, to designate their successors. The inevitable outcome was that
the office came to be bought and sold, fetching 2,500 ducats in Seville, for example,
by the early seventeenth century.
The increasing concern of the early modern period was with creating a stable
social hierarchy, which meant that government must be reserved to men of good
family. The great fear was that sales of office would open the door to ‘new men’.
The Council of Finance warned in 1600 of the danger of former merchants rising
in this way, ‘seeking to increase their business and wealth with the power they get
from office, to the harm of the poor’. And Castillo de Bobadilla shortly before
asked why men spent so much money on acquiring a post of regidor: ‘It is easy to
find the answer that they do so in order to…keep the municipal suppliers as their
little Indians…to usurp the common lands and the public granary…and to get the
first seats at public functions.’28 How wise of the city of Valencia, thought Escolano
in 1610, to keep merchants and artisans out of magisterial office for this reason.
Reconquest Valencia had, in fact, allowed such men to be appointed, but by
the sixteenth century they were required to abandon their business first and become
ciutadans, that is ‘honoured citizens’, able to live off their rents. Laws of 1605,
1624 and 1626 barred from municipal office those who had ever worked with
their hands and the children of such. In Barcelona, though merchants and artisans
were allowed to contribute one alderman (conseller) each, the remaining three were
chosen from knights and honoured citizens. This group was partly co-opted by
existing members, partly designated by the king and open to university graduates
in law and medicine.29
There was no exact equivalent to the honoured citizens in the towns of Castile,
but ‘good families’ there certainly were. The chronicler of Seville, Ortiz de Zúñiga,
referred in 1677 to that class of people below the nobility, ‘half way between it
120
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
and the plebeians’. These ciudadanos—guild masters, merchants and ‘those who
live off their rents in a modest way’ —were the backbone of the commonwealth
through their property and their interest in political stability.30 We are not too far
here from the great woollen masters of Segovia, praised by its chronicler, Colmenares,
in 1637 as ‘real fathers of families’ to the numerous, turbulent weavers in their
employment. Nevertheless, Segovia was to introduce a law in 1648 ‘that no woollen
manufacturer, merchant or trader, notary or attorney, nor the children of such’
could become a regidor.
31 Madrid required that its aldermen be of noble ancestry
by a law of 1603, and similar requirements were introduced in other cities—Cordoba,
for example, in 1568, or in Granada in 1739. The royal privilege for Granada
spoke of the ‘great satisfaction’ felt by towns governed by nobles, who were above
the petty self-interest of trade, ‘to which has to be added that noble regidores are
always anxious to serve and to attend to the royal business’.
These laws did not stop social mobility; rather they imposed an aristocratic
culture on towns, to which the upwardly mobile had to adapt. The theologian
and economist, Tomás de Mercado, noted in 1571 how the merchants of Seville
had acquired wealth and honour with the great expansion of commerce. The
nobles of Seville ‘have stooped…to marry into trade, and the merchants, with
an appetite for nobility, have striven to rise up, founding substantial entailed
estates’. By the later seventeenth century a substantial number of the aldermen
of Seville had risen to become titled nobles, with fiefs which they had purchased
in the previous generation covering the surrounding countryside.32 The movement
of the nobility from the countryside to residence in the cities during the early
modern period has been well documented for the Crown of Aragon. By 1639,
for example, a quarter of the Catalan aristocracy was living in Barcelona, and
in 1621 the upper nobility —those entitled to use the title don before their
names—were admitted to municipal office alongside the knights. The same concession
was made to their brethren in Valencia in 1652. Since these dons were often
feudal lords and occasionally counts or marquises, there was some debate about
whether their interests were compatible with those of a city state. ‘Since it is a
particular mark of distinction for cities to have titled and powerful families
who have citizenship there,’ commented Ortiz de Zúñiga in his chronicle of
1677, he set down those who had cast their mantle over his native Seville. The
huge palace of the duke of Medina Sidonia, stretching across the two parishes
of San Vicente and San Miguel, ‘caused the lord king Philip II to remark when
he saw it that it looked like the home of the local feudal lord’. And he recalled
the benevolence of the family of the future dukes of Alcalá to the city in the
hunger year of 1506: nearly two centuries later ‘the memory lives on in a
plaque which public gratitude erected in the public granary’.33 Undoubtedly
there was a certain ambiguity in the relationship with such powerful citizens.
The city of Valencia wrote congratulating the duke of Gandia in October 1624
on the beatification of his great-grandfather, Francis Borgia; but in February
1624 they had been writing to the king complaining of the damage done to
121
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
trade by the failure of the local feudal lords to pay their debts after the expulsion
of the Moriscos. This, of course, was the problem: that the hegemony of the
patricians could only be assured if the interests of the common people were
also taken into account.
In his great novel Arroz y Tartana Blasco Ibáñez portrayed the hill peasants of
nineteenth-century Aragon, huddled round their fires on a winter night and dreaming
of the fortunes to be made at the foot of the mountains, in the great city of Valencia,
where freshly minted coins ‘rolled along the streets’. The late sixteenth-century
chronicler Morgado compared the restless ebb and flow of migration through his
native Seville to the waves of the sea. Writing of the outburst of popular violence
in 1520 in his native Segovia, Colmenares called the perpetrators ‘rootless and
restless men, drawn in by the ease of finding work in the manufacture of wool’.
Studies of the parish registers of Spanish towns are making us aware of how important
this mobility was, with up to a half of those marrying in some cases having been
born elsewhere.
‘When the farmers of nearby villages and even those farther away can no longer
live honourably among their neighbours because of poverty, they come to Toledo,
to one of these small cellars [sotanillos] and live in secret want’: so ran the report
for the government in 1575–80, when perhaps 1,240 out of a population of 11,000
households were living in this kind of way.34 Some 2,454 new houses were built in
Seville between 1561 and 1588, an addition of about a fifth to the existing stock,
to cater to the influx of immigrants into this expanding port. Whole blocks were
run up by speculators, like Martin López de Aguilar, leading to complaints by the
deputies to the Cortes of 1594 about the poor quality of the building.35 Seville
was seen, along with Madrid and Granada (where the chancery court for southern
Spain held its sessions), as presenting particular problems with regard to accommodation
because of the sheer size of the transient population. But the comment of one
deputy to the Cortes of 1623 that, outside these three cities, most people owned
rather than rented their houses, seems optimistic. Studies of Santiago de Compostela
(1588) and of Barcelona (1716) give figures of a fifth and a third of the inhabitants
respectively owning their own dwellings. In Santiago house rents rose sixfold over
the sixteenth century, outstripping the general index of prices and suggesting the
growing misery of some.36 Protesting at the impossibility of monitoring the numbers
of the poor, the authorities of a much-shrunken Seville commented in 1766 that
they rented rooms by the month from a casero, a principal tenant of a building, but
then ‘very quickly the need to find a livelihood elsewhere or their inability to pay
for the room, forces them to leave it’. Up to three-quarters of the inhabitants of
the poorer parishes might move out in this way, ‘with their few bits of furniture’,
between one Easter communion and the next, ‘sometimes not letting on where
they are going’, so that the priests had no idea of their subsequent whereabouts.37
Towns in Spain at this time are perhaps better seen as refuges for the poor, driven
out of their own lands, than as sources of employment. The great authority on the
poor, Cristóbal Pérez de Herrera, echoed in 1598 earlier statements in the Cortes
122
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
when he referred to the particular problems of northern Spain: ‘men from the Mountains
(of Santander), from Asturias, Galicia, Navarre and other infertile regions…are more
poverty-stricken than people down here (i.e., south of the Guadarrama mountains)’.38
The great pilgrimage sites of this old-settled Christian part of Spain acted as a magnet
for vagrants: 8,000–10,000 French and other foreigners came through Burgos every
year on their way to the shrine of Santiago de Compostela, ‘but no one knows by
what route they leave, nor indeed what they have come for or whether they go on
the pilgrimage at all’. These immigrants gave many Spanish cities of the period a
cosmopolitan if unstable character. The economic writer Martínez de Mata denounced
them in the 1650s, when Spain was at war with France. Despite the hostilities, they
were still coming in, taking over the lowly trades of market porters, water carriers,
sellers of wine…‘They will sweep your house and doorway, clean the sewers, cart
off the rubbish and run errands for you.’39 Labour shortages were palliated by the
use of slaves as well. There were 6,327 slaves listed in Seville in 1565, in a population
of 109,015 people. But Seville was somewhat exceptional in this respect, because of
its great importance in and access to the Atlantic trades. More usually the labour
demands of a pre-industrial economy were met by short-range migration—of the
kind which would bring down to Barcelona every June men from the mountains of
Catalonia to hire themselves out for reaping. ‘Dissolute, bold men, most of them,’
commented the historian of the disturbances of June 1640 in Barcelona, ‘who most
of the year live in a disorderly fashion, without a home of their own, a trade or any
fixed dwelling.’ And in the tense atmosphere of 1652 in Cordoba, efforts were made
to disarm the 4,000 or so reapers expected at Saint John’s Day (24 June) to spend
their wages in the city, as they did every year.40
It was characteristic of the pre-industrial world that labour was required in
abundance at certain times of the year—for example, harvest—but otherwise left
idle. High mortality also tore families apart and exposed the vulnerable. The
mother of the eponymous hero of Lazarillo de Tormes (1554) had to leave her village
for the nearby town of Salamanca after her husband died, in order to find work as
a cook and laundress. Nearly a fifth of the households in Castilian cities at this
time might be in the care of widows. Their offspring, like the young Lazarillo,
were driven to live off their wits from an early age. Nearly two in five of the
population (36 per cent) were under sixteen years of age, according to the census
of 1787, while by contrast only 14.5 per cent lived beyond their fiftieth birthday.
One begins to understand, in the light of these figures, the heroic work of the
charitable brotherhood of the Refugio in seventeenth-century Madrid: in a city of
at most 150,000 people, its patrols would take in 300–400 children wandering the
streets every year.41 Some of these youngsters may never have had a home in the
first place: some 12–15 per cent of infants baptised in Madrid and Valladolid, for
example, were foundlings, abandoned at birth to public charity.
Though there were fewer elderly people then than now, nevertheless the problem
of the prematurely aged was a significant one. Pérez de Herrera, in his great treatise
on the poor of 1598, noted the havoc which disease could wreak: servants coming
123
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
out of hospital, ‘not quite back on their feet yet…sell their clothes in order to
make ends meet and end up as beggars’. The point was made again a few years
later by the social reformer López Bravo: lacking a roof over their heads, the
poor, once discharged from hospital, ‘find it hard to shake off their malady completely,
and very soon they are in the grip of recurring or aggravated fevers’. Finally, the
Dominican friar and writer on the plague, Gavaldá, warned of the fate of young
women who survived the Valencian epidemic of 1647. With their parents and
former employers often dead, they had little alternative but to take to the streets.42
Finding work was, indeed, perceived to be a critical remedy for the swelling
underworld of early modern towns. From 1439 Valencia had a magistrate who
would go the cathedral square every morning, where the unemployed tended to
congregate, and see if he could find them something to do. Local innkeepers were
forbidden to give a room for more than one night to anyone who lacked employment,
unless they were reapers coming in for the harvest. Meanwhile, Granada ordered
her innkeepers in 1552 to provide the magistrates every week with a list of their
guests and ‘the reason for their being in town’.43 There were too many persons
standing around idle in the market squares, thought Pérez de Herrera. When the
constables asked them what they were up to, they would say they were porters,
waiting for a job. Some regulation must be introduced, he decided, to make such
people take whatever jobs were on offer. But the Cortes of 1579–82 had failed to
get adopted a petition that every large town in Castile should set up a special
officer—a padre de mozos (‘father of the young’) to do just this (and what the Valencians
had been doing since 1439).44
The problem, of course, was there was not enough work at most times to go
round. The guilds had strict regulations about access to their own trades. Technical
skill was one thing, but social acceptability was just as important. Some Valencian
guilds demanded high fees of outsiders. Thus the shoemakers in 1618 charged
new masters 50 shillings if they were the sons of guildsmen, 200 if they were not
but born within the city, 300 if they had come in from other parts of Valencia,
and as much as 400 if they were from the rest of Spain. The carpenters in 1466
wanted their masters to be married men or, at least, have a house of their own.
Though the statesmen of the Enlightenment reduced restrictive practices where
they seemed to get in the way of improvements to the manufacturing process,
they were keen to retain the social functions of the guilds. Thus, Campomanes
argued, in his famous treatise of 1775, that, as well as apprentices and journeymen
being under the tight control of the master, the latter should only qualify as such
once he had the means to establish a household of his own.45
The guild system, of course, had the prime responsibility of rescuing its members
from misfortune. Many of them helped fellow craftsmen over periods of sickness,
and a few, like the boatmen of Barcelona, even provided a form of old-age pension.
It was especially in respect of the funeral of a colleague that the charitable activity
of these corporations became most evident. Widows were sometimes helped
with cash, or allowed to continue running their late husband’s shop for a period,
124
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
on condition that they employed a qualified journeyman. Journeymen, indeed,
seem to be as much part of the system of welfare—though they were excluded
from decision-making—as their master; both had to pay subscriptions.46 Despite
the apparent benefits of all this in terms of social stability, Campomanes was
very critical of the diversion of guild funds towards wasteful indulgence. The
cult of the saintly patron of the trade and other fiestas throughout the year were
a ruinous expense: ‘household heads neglect their workshops during the year
when they hold office in the confraternity…and get used to doing no work’.
Instead, guild funds should be used for practical charity, such as the support of
the old, the sick and orphans.47
Inevitably this precarious state of the urban masses posed great challenges to
those who enjoyed wealth and power. It had long been accepted, of course, that
the poor were a part of the Christian community and, indeed, a powerful incentive
to the exercise of virtue through charity. In Valencia each parish had its two ‘fathers
of the poor’, elected each year. In that of San Martín, it was a merchant and an
innkeeper in 1616, and a distinguished citizen and a merchant in 1626. Their task
was to collect second-hand clothing, which was then displayed in the parish church
at the onset of winter (1 November), before being distributed among the poor.
And the noble Catalá de Valeriola recalled in his diary how in the hunger year of
1592 he and the churchwardens of San Lorenzo ‘decided to make the rounds of
the parish so that householders would promise to give so much every week until
the harvest, and I was charged with distributing the alms during the first week’ —
quite a responsibility for a young man of twenty-three.48 This personal involvement
in poor relief remained a characteristic feature of the activities of urban elites
down to the end of the Old Regime. Luis de la Palma described how his father, a
merchant of Toledo, went every day to visit the incurably sick in hospital: ‘he
would help to make their beds and to get them undressed, holding a candle while
their hair was cut, slicing up their food for them and feeding them with his own
hand’. This description of 1595 is very like that which the noted essayist Blanco
White penned of his own father, a merchant of Seville, in the closing decades of
the eighteenth century: ‘he would allow himself no other distraction, after a tiring
day at his desk, than a visit to the hospital…where 400 or 500 beggars lay dying
of hunger and sickness’.49
Though these exercises might be good for the soul, more questions were
being asked, as in the rest of early modern Europe at this time, about the effectiveness
of spontaneous acts of compassion. Religion forbids us to ask whether a man
who asks for our help really deserves it, noted Pérez de Herrera; but the magistrate
has a wider responsibility for the proper functioning of society. His interest in
the problem came, he tells us, from his work as physician on the royal galleys.
From talking to the condemned men at the oars, he became aware that ‘there
are in this kingdom more people than you can imagine who…live like pagans…most
of them with unmarried partners…sleeping in doorways and barns’, and ready
to fall into crime. A year before (1597), the jurist Castillo de Bobadilla had
125
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
written his great treatise on the tasks of the corregidor, which included helping
the poor, but also taking firm measures against vagrants. ‘The idler who is healthy
and begs from door to door is really a thief of the bread of the poor’, he thundered,
and must be rounded up by the constables from ‘hospitals, taverns, inns, the
public thoroughfares and elsewhere’.50 Already in 1393 the city of Valencia had
forbidden anyone to beg without a written licence from the magistrates, carried
in a ball of lead or wax hanging from the neck and issued only after a report
from the parish priest. The chronicler Escolano, himself a parish priest, defended
the restrictions, ‘since the filth of the wandering, vagrant poor is a breeding
ground for filthy habits’.51
One of the early concerns was with the fate of youngsters. Homes of ‘Christian
Doctrine’ were set up from the later Middle Ages and seem to have acquired a
considerable extension in the sixteenth century under the inspiration of the saintly
Juan de Avila. The Escolapians, founded in 1617 by the Catalan Saint José de
Calasanz, brought primary schooling to the poor, but only attained real significance
in Spain in the eighteenth century, when Goya was one of their pupils. The Doctrinas
were, by contrast, a mixture of school and orphanage. That of Granada had endowments
from various sources, including wheat from the Royal Hospital and alms from
funerals, which the orphans were increasingly invited to attend. Out of these somewhat
irregular funds, about 50 children—but more usually half that number in the seventeenth
century—were supposed to be taught to read and write and apprenticed to a trade.
Pérez de Herrera was pessimistic about the state of these institutions: they generally
failed to teach orphans a trade, but rather accustomed their inmates to mendicancy
(for example, by ceremonial attendance at funerals).52
This led to the problem of adult vagrants. Early measures were taken as in the
rest of western Europe in the wake of the Black Death to ensure that people were
conscripted for work. But it was really in the early sixteenth century that a set of
laws was introduced, which appear to reflect a perceived growth of towns and
new Renaissance ideas of good order. The Poor Laws of 1523–58 sum up a century
and more of tentative efforts and laid down the basic guidelines for dealing with
the poor until the collapse of the Old Regime. To beg, paupers would henceforth
require a report from their parish priest and a licence from the justices. They
would normally only be allowed to beg in their own locality, and must surrender
any children over five years of age for apprenticeship to a trade. A decree of 1565
clarified the point that licences to beg would only be issued for old age or infirmity.
Anyway, ‘since if it were possible to feed the poor without having them wandering
through the streets begging, this would be greatly to the service of God’, the justices
and prelates were to examine all ways of raising funds to provide ‘alternative’
relief. Efforts to enforce these provisions were inevitably haphazard, given that
the initiative depended on the local authorities. The chronicler Ariño described
the rounding-up of the beggars of Seville on 29 April 1597:2,000 men and an
unspecified number of women were examined by doctors over the next three or
four days, with licences issued to ‘the lame, the one-armed, the palsied and the
126
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
aged’ to continue begging, while the rest were ordered to find a job within three
days, on pain of a hundred lashes.53
Pérez de Herrera was sure that there were enough jobs to go around. But clearly
this analysis took little account of the persistent problem of underemployment
and the periodic crises which punctuated a pre-industrial economy. Censuses of
the sixteenth century would suggest that around 8 per cent of urban households
were exempted from tax because they were too poor to pay. In a manufacturing
town like Segovia, dependent on immigrant labour, the proportion could rise to
15 per cent. But then in a famine year like 1558 the proportion of paupers would
shoot up: nearly one in five people were classified that year in Toledo (population
56,270) as being in need of relief.54 There was a further problem about the hordes
of starving peasants who would descend on a town in time of hunger. Protesting
against special relief for Toledo in the famine of 1585, when thousands of poor
from La Mancha were alleged to be converging on the city, León invoked ‘the
many paupers from Oviedo and Asturias, Galicia and the Mountains of Santander
who regularly descend on this city…and those of Zamora and Toro’.55 As other
commentators pointed out, the laws requiring vagrants to return home made little
sense, since the current of emigration was naturally from the poorer hill country
of the north where there were few resources to the more prosperous cities of the
south. In 1546 Toledo put the homeless poor, who could not be succoured through
the usual system of parish relief, either into the hospital or into the homes of
wealthier citizens, while the crisis lasted.56
The laws invited local authorities to find some way of channelling relief to
such homeless people through institutions. The medieval hospitals had been refuges
open to pilgrims, the aged, the insane, cripples, as well as the sick. Spain had a
network of such institutions, often small and generally run by a charitable confraternity,
which often saw its principal task as that of keeping alive the memory of its founders
through masses for their souls. Following the stimulus given by the Council of
Trent for a more effective use of charitable endowments, the government initiated
a major enquiry into the state of affairs in Spain. Under its pressure, some rationalisation
was achieved. Thus in Medina del Campo the sixty confraternities were amalgamated
into six by 1587, with funds being released for a new general hospital, which
would cater to orphans and pilgrims as well as the sick. But other towns, like
Zamora or Toledo, seem to have been much less successful in this effort at consolidation
of endowments.57 The question remained anyway as to whether the placing of the
poor in institutions was the right way to tackle the problem of poverty. The problem
surfaced acutely in the eighteenth century when a more secular-minded government
tried to set up hospicios or workhouses for the internment of the able-bodied poor.
As the city of Seville pointed out in 1766, casual begging was an inevitable part of
the livelihood of the labourer: anyone earning under four reales a day, such as
bricklayers, might well need ‘their wives and children to beg for alms’, while even
the more prosperous silk workers—at least, the journeymen—could be reduced to
temporary mendicancy by a slump.58
127
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
The most sensitive approach to the problem of institutional poor relief was
that of Canon Giginta (1579) and the physician Pérez de Herrera (1598). Essentially
they campaigned for a pauper hospice—an albergue—to be set up in each large town.
Here the crippled, the orphan, the temporarily unemployed could be gathered.
Entrance would be voluntary: it ‘would not resemble a school or anything like a
prison, but rather an orderly home of good Christian handicraft workers’, according
to Giginta. There those genuinely in need of help would be given a bed, a fire,
religious instruction and the chance of apprenticeship to a trade. Some of the
inmates would be allowed out during the day to beg for alms, ‘because humans
need diversion and recreation, especially those who are accustomed to leading a
life of complete liberty’. With the assurance that such people were under proper
supervision, thought Pérez de Herrera, ‘any honourable, Christian citizen will be
happy to take some of these genuine indigents back to his house for a meal’.59
These beggar hospitals, despite much enthusiasm in the Cortes, proved in the
end difficult to maintain. That of Toledo was inaugurated in 1581, with Giginta
triumphantly proclaiming that of the thousand beggars in town most had chosen
to leave, others had found work, and ‘those who are confined do not amount to
more than 330’. But by the end of the decade the hospital was in severe financial
difficulty. More realistically perhaps, Zamora declared flatly in 1597 that ‘if we
had an almshouse here, such a large quantity of paupers would gather that we
would never be able to suuport them’.60 Instead the city preferred the traditional
remedies of driving immigrants out, if the situation became dire, and subsidising
the local poor through parish relief.
Only where a confraternity was specially dedicated to the building and maintenance
of a refuge for the homeless does it seem to have worked. The Brotherhood of the
Holy Charity had been founded in Seville in 1565 in order to give a Christian
burial to the ‘forsaken’ (largely vagrants and criminals) and to carry those lying
in the street to hospital. In 1662 Don Miguel Mañara, of an ennobled merchant
family, transformed the confraternity by getting it to devote its funds to running
a night shelter, which would give the homeless a bowl of soup, a warm fire and a
bed. After all, he argued, most of those buried by the Brothers ‘die of no other
disease than their wretchedness and lack of warmth’. Though the great hospital
of the Holy Charity, with its canvases by Murillo, became an important institution
in late seventeenth-century Seville, much of its money actually went in providing
outdoor relief to householders and in ferrying the sick to other hospitals.61
The background to all this was the sheer threat of harvest failure and consequent
food scarcities. An unskilled labourer in Andalusia might expect to earn, when in
work, four reales a day in the early seventeenth century; a three-pound loaf, the
basis of the daily diet of his family, might be around one real, but could rise to
four or even six in bad years, as in Seville in 1652. ‘Fear of hunger has always
kept princes awake at night,’ noted Caxa de Leruela in 1631; bread and bullfights
were the way to keep subjects tranquil, as in ancient Rome.62 The jurats of Valencia
reported to the Crown in 1610 that they advanced 90,000 pounds every year to
128
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
those who would guarantee to supply the city with meat, 40,000 to suppliers of
firewood and and another 40,000 for olive oil. Castillo de Bobadilla noted shortly
before the importance of these ‘privileged’ contractors’ (obligados) for the provisioning
of Castilian towns with meat, fish and oil, and, though deploring monopolies in
general, thought that these essential supplies constituted an exception—that the
contracts should, indeed, be extended to cover wine and bread. The system was
subject to considerable fraud, though. The large households of aristocrats and
prelates were sometimes allowed to slaughter their own cattle, for example, though
not to put the excess on sale.
Bread was, of course, the major focus of concern. Cities had privileged areas
of purchase, usually lying within their jurisdictions. Thus villages within about a
100-kilometre radius of Madrid were required to supply quotas of grain—though
the system seems to have functioned, if at all, only within about half that distance,
until it was abolished in 1758.63 Seville protested to the Crown in 1652 about
proposals to sell off its village of Alcalá de Guadaira, where most of the mills
grinding flour for the city lay. These expensive pieces of equipment—mills and
ovens—were as highly prized as the walls which guarded the town. Viciana described
lovingly the forty-three flour mills and twenty bakeries which kept Xàtiva (1,750
families) fed, the ten mills lining the river and the twenty ovens needed by the
equally numerous population of Orihuela. Sometimes individual villages specialised
in this kind of activity: Alfacar’s ready supply of water kept its flour mills turning
‘day and night’, to supply the ovens from which ‘more than 100 batches of bread’
were carried into Granada every morning.64
It was a prime responsibility of the magistrates to police the markets so that food
or merchandise reached the customer directly and did not fall into the hands of
speculators. There were laws in medieval Seville excluding dealers from the marketplace until after mid-day, and forbidding the resale of food or building materials
within the city limits. The authorities in Madrid ruled that no family could buy
more than twelve loaves (perhaps equivalent to 24 pounds) of bread a day, reckoned
enough to feed the largest household. The Cortes of 1523 and 1528 lamented that
speculation in grain had become a profession, pushing up prices, and they ruled
that henceforth anyone purchasing grain must either intend to sell it outside the
city limits or bake it into bread for local consumption. As their successors in the
parliament of 1576–8 commented, the law proved to be counterproductive, driving
grain off the market in time of demand. Shortly afterwards, Castillo de Bobadilla
noted that years of dearth were becoming more frequent, either ‘for our sins, or
because of the growth of population’. It was dreadful, he thought, to see the uproar
of women, children and the old ‘crowding with shouts round the house of the corregidor,
or going out on the highways and into the villages nearby for bread’.65
‘Many times I had excess wheat removed from the houses not only of lay people
but even of canons and wealthy clergy,’ Castillo de Bobadilla tells us, to prevent
hoarding and dearth. The crown should support corregidores in this task a little
more effectively, he argued; he himself had been excommunicated for such actions
129
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
once for eighty days, before Madrid intervened to get the prelate to lift the sentence.
There was, of course, the tasa, the fixed price for grain, introduced in 1503 as the
problem of dearth became increasingly apparent in Castile. But the devout Antonio
de Tapia, bishop of Cordoba, wrote to the government in 1652 that the poor
themselves would lose out if he sold off the tithes of his diocese at the official
price. In the first place, the revenue of the bishopric would fall, diminishing the
funds available for charity, and secondly the wheat would simply find its way
into the hands of hoarders and speculators. ‘The causes, Sire, of the dearth of
wheat in this region are the maladministration and greed of the powerful, who
hoard it…and with this commerce found their entailed estates.’66 Anyway, as the
corregidor of Murcia reported in 1576, money was so scarce that many people might
not be able to afford grain when it came on the market at reasonable prices.
Generally households seem to have done little baking on their own. Convents
may have baked their own bread, but even the nobility seem to have used public
ovens. Bakers were a crucial element in the whole network of supply. We still
know too little about how they operated, whether they worked up their own flour
or that provided by customers, how many bakeries were owned by the church and
the aristocracy (the existence of slaves in some Valencian establishments would
suggest fairly large-scale enterprises). The size and price of the loaf were fixed
often by the magistrates. Even when the government removed controls on wheat
prices in 1765, it still set upper limits for bread—much to the despair of the bakers
in Madrid, who claimed that they could not cover their costs.67 In Valencia from
1630 and down to the early eighteenth century the city council was allowed by
the Crown to appoint all the bakers.
But ultimately the critical factor was the supply of grain to the city. It was accepted
that the coastal regions, other than the fertile valley of the Guadalquivir, needed to
import from abroad. Towards the end of the fifteenth century Valencia appointed a
representative to negotiate wheat purchases on its behalf in Sicily. Seville set up a
public granary in 1476 and offered a bounty for imports, but does not seem to have
intervened directly in purchases.68 During the sixteenth century these municipal
granaries (pósitos) began to spread throughout Castile and Valencia. Viciana praised
that of Villarreal as a pioneering effort in 1564, for example, and Castillo de Bobadilla
in 1597 was urging Castilian towns to adopt them: ‘although in these kingdoms
they have only been used for a few years past, they are very ancient throughout the
world’. By stocking grain in time of plenty, the magistrate could avoid confrontation
with the tithe-farmers and hoarders in time of scarcity, he thought. Describing apparently
his own experiences, he noted how the parish priests would be asked for lists of
needy households, with the number of loaves they might consume; then a regidor
would be appointed for one week in turn, outside whose house the poor would
congregate to get their daily ration. Also ‘bakers are to be nominated who will
bring to the market-place for sale or to the grilles [sc. from where paupers’ loaves
were handed out], a certain quantity of bread for travellers and outsiders and poor
peasants from the region’, who should not simply be expelled from town in hunger
130
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
years.69 The provisioning of a great city was a major test of government—a recurrent
financial and political challenge for the ruling elites. The local chronicler describes
the sheer joy in Granada in April 1636 when the mule trains entered the city carrying
enough grain to keep the population fed for the next two months, until the harvest.
The purchase had been arranged by the city council, and was proudly paraded
along the main street and in front of the royal lawcourts, to the blast of trumpets.
But the cost of this municipal welfare—subsidised bread prices and even free distribution
of bread in crises—was high. The agricultural writer Lope de Deza noted that the
pósitos tended, if anything, to push up prices by competing for grain, that their reserves
might often not be needed for years, going bad meanwhile, and that the purchasing
led to corrupt deals between aldermen and merchants. The great Valencian politician
Francisco March had received 88,589 Valencian pounds from the city in 1610–11
to buy wheat, of which he only disbursed 83,402. His heir only managed to pay
back the difference to the treasury by 1634, after a hard struggle to sell the wheat
itself. The statesmen of the Enlightenment, as part of their drive to liberalise trade,
insisted that the municipal granaries must sell at market prices and not subsidise
bread; but they found the institution useful enough as an agent of supply to allow it
to continue alongside private contractors, down to the middle of the nineteenth
century.
Initially towns catered to their obligations by drawing on their propios—common
lands, mills, houses—which brought in a rental every year. But from the later Middle
Ages they were having to introduce permanent excise duties on commodities being
traded in the local market. The first such taxes in Valencia, the chronicler Escolano
recalled, came in 1334, and they had to be increased thereafter as the monarchy
turned to the city for help with its wars. But what really began to cripple Valencia
during the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries was the administration of the food
supply. Bonds were issued, eventually eating up 147,000 of the 200,000 pounds
municipal revenue in interest payments by 1649. This situation provoked a series
of political crises, as the magistrates sought to increase taxes—quadrupling the
excise on some basic foodstuffs in 1634, for example, and doubling that on textiles
in 1649 (when the duty on bread, wine and meat had already reached a ceiling of
33 per cent of value).
Castilian cities were facing similar problems. A turning-point in Seville was the
introduction in 1515 of the small impost of two maravedís on a pound of meat, from
which nobles and clergy were theoretically exempt. Thereafter, mainly thanks to impressive
gifts to the monarchy, the city fell heavily into debt, declaring itself officially bankrupt
in 1601.70 Given that the cities generally administered the royal taxes, the alcabalas,
themselves, it is hard to know what percentage of the excise was eaten up by national
compared with local needs. After the Bourbon suppression of the liberties of the
Crown of Aragon (1707–16), a consolidated tax was introduced there, of which towns
like Barcelona and Valencia could claim a certain percentage for their municipal budgets.
In Castile, meanwhile, the Bourbons depended very heavily on the old municipal
excises, seizing about half these, for example, to pay for the war of 1739–48.
131
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
What was tending to happen over the early modern period as a whole was a loss
of financial autonomy by the town councils as the monarchy sought to keep a closer
watch on the budget. Castillo de Bobadilla urged the corregidor to supervise the use
made by the aldermen of funds from municipal lands; some, he suggested, were
interested in feathering their own nests. Town councillors are like judicial minors,
he affirmed, and require a tutor: the king and the king’s representative. Above all,
taxation was a royal prerogative. In non-urgent cases towns must get the consent of
the Crown for new impositions (not least because of the complexity of deciding
whether nobles and non-resident property-holders could be compelled to pay).71
Financial considerations had drawn the Spanish city into an expanding political
role from the later Middle Ages, through its representatives in the parliament or
Cortes. After the incorporation of Granada, there were eighteen Castilian cities
represented, to which the Habsburgs resorted increasingly in their attempt to shift
the collection of the royal excise (alcabalas) into quotas (encabezamientos), apportioned
to each of them through parliament. Traditionally the cities had been partners of
the monarchy—the nucleus of the resettlement of the Moorish frontier and, in the
civil wars of the fifteenth century, a bulwark against a plundering baronage through
their armed ‘brotherhoods’ (hermandades).
But the restoration of government under Ferdinand and Isabella initiated an
uneasy sense that power and influence were passing from the local communities to
the court, where aristocratic voices were more likely to find a hearing. The feudal
lords began to exempt, often with royal permission, their villages from the jurisdiction
of the cities and to reduce the alcabalas there, diverting trade from the urban market.
There was increasing disenchantment with the corregidor, the representative of the
Crown in each city, who, far from protecting it against such usurpations, seemed to
be part of the problem: that growing network of mafia influence spreading from the
court to locally powerful individuals, who were feathering their own nests.
Gathering stormclouds finally broke in 1520, when Charles V, unpopular anyway
because of his Flemish favourites, extorted a large subsidy from the Cortes which
was to be spent abroad. After the king’s departure for Germany, representatives of
some of the cities, meeting first in Avila in August and then moving their headquarters
shortly afterwards to Tordesillas, hammered out a programme of reform. Basically
this required the Cortes to meet henceforward every two or three years, whether
summoned by the king or not, in order to discuss the grievances of the people. The
latter were to be represented by one of their own number, specially elected in each
town, to accompany the existing parliamentary representatives, designated by the
aldermen. For the rest, though the king would continue to govern, his officials—and,
in particular, the corregidor—must be subject to regular investigation of their conduct.72
The demands have been seen as a last, brave attempt at giving the towns a
voice in the running of the country, and their protagonists—the Comuneros—served
as an inspiration to nineteenth-century liberals. At its height, in the autumn of
1520, fourteen of the eighteen cities represented in the Cortes had sent representatives
to the ‘Holy Junta’ in Tordesillas, which was trying to coordinate the rebellion.
132
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
But the movement soon manifested divisions of interest which would spell its
undoing. In the first place, the chief town of all, Burgos, anxious about its wool
trade to Flanders—found it useful to make its peace with Charles V. The Andalusian
cities did not join at all. In Seville, the younger brother of the duke of Arcos
stormed the royal alcázar on 16 September 1520 at the head of a crowd of 700,
demanding better justice and lower taxes; but the rival house of Medina Sidonia—
in the persons of the wife and the mother of the ailing duke—gathered their own
clients to recover the fortress, of which they were hereditary wardens. In a tense
situation, where ideologies were hopelessly confused with the politics of power,
the bishop managed to arrange an uneasy truce. Though the great nobles had
their own grievances against Charles V and his Flemish court, they were increasingly
nervous at the attempt of some cities to reassert jurisdiction over fiefs recently
acquired from the Crown, and at the uprising of peasants on their own estates.
Towards the end of 1520 the Comuneros rejected the mediation of the grandees,
‘because it is likely that they will look to their own interests and try to aggrandise
their houses, to the great damage and hurt of the towns and communities, as they
and their ancestors have done all along’.73 Their further demands that the nobility
contribute equally in taxation completed the rift.
The ‘juntas’ which formed in each city between May and July 1520 were composed
of a minority of activists: some regidores, including nobles like Juan de Padilla, the
leader in Toledo, and clergy, but perhaps above all a ‘middle class’ of merchants
and artisans, who now found themselves leading the debates for the first time, in
the crowded churches where these illegal, self-constituted bodies tended to meet.
The aldermen in the council chambers bided their time. An eye-witness, the humanist
writer Fray Antonio de Guevara, conveys vividly the confusion and fear during the
summer of 1520: the murder by the mob of the deputy from Segovia who had
voted the taxes for Charles V, the proclamation of the Comunidad in the great financial
capital, Medina del Campo, ‘when the wool shearer Bobadilla rose up with others
like himself, and threw the regidor Nieto out of the windows of the council chamber’,
the flight of the Regent and the high court from Valladolid as the mob ‘rose up in
arms, roaming the streets that night knocking down houses, under their captain,
the harness-maker Vera…’.74 For Guevara, the rebels had legitimate grievances, but
the uprising itself was plunging Castile back into that state of anarchy from which
the Catholic Kings had so recently rescued her: ‘there is no safe highway any more…no
one can plough his land, no one can bring in supplies, no one can administer justice,
no one is safe in his own house’. It was probably this war-weariness which told in
the end against the success of the revolt, as the respectable classes began to withdraw
their support, leaving the hardliners to be crushed at the battle of Villalar on 23
April 1521. Though the monarchy had reasserted its control, it had done so only
thanks to the active cooperation of the nobility, whose cavalry carried the day at
Villalar, and to the passive support of the urban elites, who now distanced themselves
as much as they could from the whole episode. It was mostly members of the lower
133
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
classes who paid the ultimate price on the scaffold, and city chronicles thereafter
tried to emphasise the loyalty of the regidores to the Crown.
The social divisions in the Comunero movement were even more apparent in
its Valencian counterpart, the revolt of the ‘Brotherhoods’ or Germanías (1519–
22). Plague in the great Mediterranean city led in July 1519 to the exodus of
many nobles and patricians and to the hunt for public sinners, a campaign fired
by preachers and focusing on sodomites and Moors, and eventually on the protectors
of the latter, the nobility, who were also accused of not paying their debts. A
‘brotherhood’ of thirteen guildsmen, in memory of Christ and the twelve apostles,
was set up to enforce a godly commonwealth, and in particular the payment of
debts (according to the chronicler Escolano). It went on to demand that two guildsmen
should be represented on the council of six jurats or aldermen, and eventually—to
the cry of ‘Long live the king, and death to taxes’ —mounted an attack on the
fiscal offices of both the city and the Crown (21 February 1521). The disturbances
were spreading, meanwhile, to other towns, often taking the form of attacks on
neighbouring seigneurs. A long-running boundary dispute between the city of
Alpuente and the lord of Chelva now came to a head, for example, with armed
guildsmen from Valencia joining their ‘brothers’ in Alpuente in an attack on this
hated feudal neighbour (1520).
There was much temporising by the Crown and the nobility at this time, in view
of the uncertainties of the situation in Castile. But the viceroy had already withdrawn
from the city of Valencia in June 1520, and a year later—after the crushing of the
Comuneros at Villalar—the dukes of Gandia and Segorbe summoned their vassals.
The participation of the Moors in the feudal levies envenomed old hatreds and led to
the pogroms and mass baptisms which characterised the response of the Agermanats.
The lords, indeed, were not immediately victorious. The silk-weaver Vicent Peris
defeated the army of the south at Gandia (25 July 1521). However, the duke of Segorbe
was victorious in the north at this time (battle of Sagunto), and the Castilian nobles
under the marquis of Los Vélez came to the help of their Valencian brethren, capturing
Orihuela (29 August 1521). A ring of steel began to encircle the heartland of the
rebellion, the cities of Valencia, Xàtiva and Alzira. Riots in the capital on 4 October
1521 broke the Germanía in two, with merchants and notaries (as Escolano notes)
worried about the disruption to trade and the food supply and now seeking an accommodation
with the viceroy. Eventually on 18 October a compromise was hammered out, by
which an amnesty would be accorded if the rebels laid down their arms and dissolved
the junta of thirteen and restored the patrician monopoly of city office. The uneasy
truce was broken on 3 March 1522, on the eve of carnival when spirits always ran
high. The journeymen wool dressers, after a riot against their masters, were joined by
their fellows in the silk trade, in a procession to the house of Vicent Peris, the retired
radical leader of the Agermanat army, calling out: ‘Long live King Charles and death
to the masked traitors in our midst!’ The latter—‘the honourable, householding wool
dressers’ —got the viceroy to sound the cathedral bell, which summoned a guild militia
to disperse the hotheads and lynch Peris. The Germanía was over in Valencia city;
134
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
but Xàtiva held out until 2 December 1522, inspired by a strange visionary, L’Encobert
(‘The Hidden One’), who claimed to be the son of Prince Juan (himself the only son
of Ferdinand and Isabella, who had died tragically young in 1499). He was the instrument
chosen by God, he told his followers, to install a reign of justice, the first since the
Flood and the last before the recovery of Jerusalem. He would convert the Jews and
the Moors in these Last Days—as well as lowering taxes.75
The Germanías collapsed, like their counterpart in Castile, largely through internal
divisions. Yet the ferocity of the punishment subsequently meted out gives some
idea of the fear inspired in the ruling classes. In Valencia, the amnesty of October
1521 was forgotten after the disturbances of March 1522, and those who paid the
penalty in executions and confiscations of property seem to have been mostly humble
men. The chronicler Viciana in 1563–4 was at pains to distance the patrician elites
in the towns from any hint of sympathy for the rebels. With shame he had to acknowledge
the ‘very evil and scandalous conspiracy in Xàtiva, which most of the common
people joined’; but he could point out with relief that the knights and honoured
citizens, ‘and many respectable householders [hombres buenos], who are those who
make up the corporation’ had to flee for their lives, and joined the royalist army. It
was a similar attitude to that taken by the chronicler Colmenares with regard to his
beloved city of Segovia, one of the ringleaders in the Comunero movement: the
magistrates had been forced to temporise with the common people, who had lost all
respect for law and hierarchy in an act of collective madness.
And yet the jurats and regidores had generally continued in office throughout
the disturbances. There was no radical overhaul of the structures of municipal
government. What had emerged, though, was the power of the crowd. The parade
of the guilds in Valencia before the Regent, Adrian of Utrecht, on 19 February
1520, ‘dressed in all their finery, with jackets of brocade and silk, under their
forty banners and to the number of 8,000 men’ (as Escolano later described them),
must have been an awe-inspiring sight. The drums which summoned the guildsmen
remind us of the role which the government itself expected them to play as an
urban militia, and they proved able to give a good account of themselves in field
engagements with the nobility (as at Gandia in 1521). By contrast the Royalists
found it difficult to gather their forces: reluctant Moorish peasants living on seigneurial
estates, some Castilian mercenaries who deserted when pay was late …The forces
on each side seem rarely to have exceeded 4,000 men in any encounter, and knives,
clubs and swords were still the chief weapons, conferring little advantage, therefore,
on the aristocratic side. Towns proved able to hold out behind their medieval
walls against royalist cannon (Alzira, for example—though not Villarreal), church
towers were still invaluable places of refuge (Olleria, Quart, Torrent), and manor
houses (Albatera) could present formidable obstacles to an opponent. It was a
very fragmented world, where the great political issues tended to wither away in
a morass of local, often ineffectual struggles.
Certainly the result of the great wave of revolts of 1519–22 was to reinforce
social hierarchy in Spain. The original grievance in Castile over high taxes was
135
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
resolved in part by leaving the cities free to administer their own quotas, the
encabezamientos, and keeping these, for a time, relatively low. But inevitably it was
a truce rather than a solution. The bankruptcy of the monarchy by the time of the
accession of Philip II (1556–98) raised the old problems of municipal finance,
with its implications for the government of towns. When Philip II tried to increase
the alcabalas threefold in 1575, he unleashed a small storm of protest. The efforts
of the Crown to use its intermediaries—the corregidores in the first place, but also
the bishop in Salamanca and the duke of Infantado in Guadalajara—met with only
limited success. As Diego de Abalos, regidor of the wool-manufacturing town of
Cuenca, put it in 1577, he and his patrician colleagues would not bear the brunt of
the excise duties, ‘but rather the traders and tax-payers of this city, and it is other
people’s property that we have to talk about’ —which led to efforts to consult the
community more widely. A few years later Castillo de Bobadilla would warn the
corregidor of the danger of pushing through the royal business too eagerly: town
councillors needed time to reflect, and the wider community must not be alienated.76
It was, in fact, by a mixture of threats and promises—of rewards for loyal supporters—
that the Crown got at least part of the tax increases it was seeking in 1575–77. But
the prolonged negotiations during these two or three years demonstrated the continuing
delicacy of the political equilibrium.
Events would show that as long as the patrician elites could guarantee an adequate
supply of ‘bread and circuses’ for their communities, the populace would not repeat
the rebellions of 1519–22. But the great food riots of 1648– 52 in Andalusia served
as a reminder of how insecure this compromise might be. As the price of bread
tripled in Granada in the spring of 1648, crowds gathered at various points. While
the corregidor took to his heels, they advanced on the high court, to the cry ‘Long
live the king and down with bad government!’, and forced the court president to
inspect a ‘wheaten loaf mixed with millet and ashes’. To the president’s promise
to have cheap bread provided, the crowd demanded that he appoint the popular
Don Luis de Paz, who had been active in charity some time before, as interim
corregidor in the king’s name. The fears of Don Luis that he would look like the
leader of an insurrection were calmed by the president: ‘Good Don Luis, this is
God’s business, which we must carry out for his holy service and for the peace of
this commonwealth.’ Led on horseback by the crowd, Don Luis held aloft a crucifix:
‘My children, this is your corregidor, not me.’ On the following day, 19 May 1648,
as the old corregidor came out of hiding, the crowd rioted again, and the patricians
too closely associated with him had to seek sanctuary in the archbishop’s palace.
Don Luis had to parade through the streets again in order to restore calm, accompanied
by a Capuchin friar, one of the high court judges and two of the titled nobility,
holding the reins of his horse. The storm was allowed to blow itself out: a general
pardon and a fresh supply of grain enabled the authorities gradually to recover
control of the situation.77
Fundamentally the tranquillity of the population depended on keeping the 3-
pound loaf of bread, reckoned necessary to feed the average household for a day, at
136
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
two reales or thereabouts—approximately half the daily income of a working man at
the time. When the loaf reached six reales in Seville in the spring of 1652 trouble
was bound to follow. The price rises of that year seem to have been provoked less
by actual shortages than by the devaluation of the currency decreed by the Crown
the previous November in the desperate hunt for revenue to pursue its wars. Lack
of business confidence led to the interruption of silk manufacture in Granada and
the threat of renewed unrest there, while in Seville the failure of the Crown to pay
its bond-holders led the nobility to dismiss some of their servants. The tense situation
was contained in Granada, but erupted in rioting in Cordoba on 6 May and particularly
in Seville on 22 May 1652, where a mob from the artisan districts of Omnium
Sanctorum and the Feria converged on the municipal granary, and isolated groups
attacked the houses of individual merchants. As the Regent of the high court (Audiencia)
of Seville reported to the king on 23 May, a decree reducing the family loaf to one
and a half reales did not immediately calm the situation. The mob invaded the Audiencia
building, threatening the Regent and the archbishop, and eventually forcing these
dignitaries to ride round town proclaiming the restoration of the coinage to its old
value and the suppression of the excises on food (the millones). They then headed
for the gaol, where they released the prisoners, and came back to the Audiencia to
seize and destroy criminal records. As in Granada in 1648 and in Cordoba earlier
in May 1652, tranquillity was only restored by changing the corregidor (or asistente,
as he was known in Seville). A knight of Calatrava, Don Juan de Villasis, was installed
as the people’s choice in Seville. But the patricians made use of the interval, when
the artisans dispersed to their homes, to recruit a mob of their own among the
smugglers and ruffians of the San Marcos district, leading a violent assault on the
working-class districts on the night of 26–27 May. A hundred were killed and fiftyseven others arraigned for rebellion. The insurrection was effectively over, though
tranquillity was only restored to Andalusia that July when the Crown announced a
restoration of the currency to its old value.78
These disturbances throw light on the fragile compromise on which public
order ultimately rested, in particular on the commitment of local elites to providing
bread for the population at an affordable price. The social and political hierarchy
itself was not called into question: rather, the populace demonstrated its confidence
time and again in leading members of the patriciate, chosen as popular corregidores.
But the eighteenth-century transition to freedom of the grain trade—solemnly proclaimed
by the Crown on 11 July 1765—led to some of the most severe popular rioting in
the Old Regime, starting in Madrid on Palm Sunday 1766 and spreading to many
of the other provincial cities thereafter.79 At this stage, and in view of the increasing
withdrawal of the patricians into private life—or at least a civic life orientated
more to promotion at court than within the local community—it became evident
that the structure of local government itself would have to be reformed.
Already in 1652 the popular corregidor of Cordoba had warned the Crown about
the alienation of the ‘middling sort’ from the ruling elites and their tendency to
do little to counter the fury of the mob. In Seville, the parish clergy of the artisan
137
PATRICIANS AND PAUPERS
parishes were rumoured to be encouraging artisan unrest. As the Bourbon government
accentuated the trend away from the idea of a ‘moral community’, buttressed by
the guilds and the charitable confraternities and the public granaries, towards a
concept of ‘enlightened self-interest’, the old hierarchy of patricians and paupers
became increasingly unstable. Instead, a search began for some way of broadening
the basis of municipal government so that it would include the respectable middle
classes. As one of its responses to the popular riots of 1766, the Crown decreed
that ‘deputies of the commons’ would henceforth be elected by householders to
sit with the hereditary regidores and vote on taxes and supply. It was a small step,
which was combined with an effort, after the law of 1783 declaring trade to be
honourable, to have former shopkeepers or their sons accepted as aldermen—if
they had the money to purchase the office in the first place, of course. Further
developments would have to await the collapse of the Old Regime in 1808. But
one cannot help feeling that for some time before the commonwealth was being
redefined as a national rather than a local forum—with enormous implications for
the whole self-image and function of ruling elites.
138
7
THE CONSOLIDATION OF
AN ARISTOCRACY
Onofre Esquerdo, son of a merchant and himself an ‘honoured citizen’ of Valencia,
set out his ideas of nobility in an important manuscript work of about 1686. Early
civilised man, he tells us, ‘for the benefit of the commonwealth, divided the population
of which it was composed into three orders or classes’. These were the tillers of the
soil, the handcraft workers and ‘those who would govern the others in peace and
justice…and defend them by force of arms’. Those who aspired to govern, by the
pen and the sword, ‘must cast off any tie of kinship or friendship’ and purge the
impurity of the soul, like silver tempered by fire, ‘through the hardship, sleepless
nights, discomforts and dangers which are experienced on campaign, and have to be
put up with at university and when one is sitting examinations’. It was a similar
picture which the Castilian authority, Guardiola, painted in 1591. The original equality
of man gave way as a grateful citizenry paid tribute to the ‘virtue’ of those who
governed it by the pen and the sword.1
 Men of this period were still close enough to
the memory of civil war to recall how fragile was the veneer of civilisation. ‘Tell me,’
wrote the Valencian chronicler Viciana in 1564—himself a notary but sprung of a
gentry family—‘if we had no knights in the land, how many virgins would be abducted,
how many married women and widows put to shame, how many churches desecrated?’
The cult of chivalry had its legitimate recompense in the honour paid to the good
man: ‘for where there is no honour, the spirit weakens, and a society which does not
respect its sage and powerful members will not be short of tyrants to crush it’.2
Ideas of a ruling elite changed gradually over the early modern period. Antonio
Ponz signalled the change of mood, common to the rest of Europe, when he spoke
of the improving landlords as ‘true conquistadors’ towards the end of the Old
Regime. This idea that the nobility must become leaders in the material betterment
of their country was taken up by Xavier Pérez y López, lawyer and representative
of Seville at court, and by the Valencian jurist Mariano Madramany (1750–1822),
who embody some of the key ideas of the Enlightenment. For Madramany, ‘letters’
and ‘industry’ were necessary for the running of a modern country, whose elites
must demonstrate their utility to the patria in that way. What the role of a nobility
would be in all this was beginning to be questioned: ‘some think that…it would
139
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
be useful to the state to have a nobility composed only of individuals’ —who had
earned their status, that is, through service to the fatherland.3
This was to substitute an aristocracy—‘government by the best’ —for a nobility
—‘men of known families’. In fact, the early modern period had seen much debate
already on the values of ancestry. The Renaissance humanist, Fernando del Pulgar,
pointed to the varying abilities of children in the same family: can one be surprised
if nature itself wills that some rise to eminence through talent at war or letters,
while the offspring of the great fall into obscurity, ‘since they lack ability and are
of weak character’? His conclusion was that ‘everything leads us to believe that
God made men, not lineages’, and that human society can no more be still and
motionless than can the heavens.4
 Yet there was still a place for hereditary nobility,
as Madramany pointed out right at the end of our period. ‘The upbringing which
a noble father may perhaps give his children, the care and concern to instil in
them lofty aspirations, are almost always lacking in those who have to earn their
own nobility.’ New men, as magistrates and army officers, may well find it difficult
to command respect; and certainly it was useful to have a class of eminent families
which ‘with their authority and example…can uphold in the populace a due reverence
for the sovereign’. Haunted still by a sense of how fragile the veneer of public
order actually was, the men of the Enlightenment still clung to some idea of hierarchy.
Though eager to see nobles get down to work and accept newcomers in their
ranks, Pérez y López praised still ‘those inhabitants who from time immemorial
have kept a tradition of honour in the town where they were born’, who have
‘fostered and maintained…their local patria’.5
If anything, it would seem that the early modern period saw a strengthening of
this idea of ancestry, as part of a growing concern with establishing a settled society
and a stable polity. The nascent state of the absolute monarchs and their ally, the
Counter-Reformation church, depended upon a clear idea of hierarchy. There is
an impression left by writings of the time—by Viciana in Valencia (1564) or Argote
de Molina in Andalusia (1588) —that now that the reconquest of Spain has been
completed, it was time for the elites to put down roots as well. Viciana set out the
genealogies of the Valencian nobles, he tells us, ‘so that all may know where they
come from, so that by this description each may strive in virtuous rivalry with
others, in virtue, diligence, courage and skill’. And Argote affirmed a similar desire
to clarify ancestry, ‘for our fathers were extremely negligent in these matters’. But
it was precisely the passion for genealogy in this period which generated new
sources of conflict. Viciana’s research stirred bitter controversy, and he confessed
his hesitations about how to list noble families, whether by antiquity or by prestige,
eventually settling for a simple alphabetical order.6
In the proliferating lawsuits of the sixteenth century over noble ancestry (hidalguía),
one theme emerges strongly: that nobility was equivalent to that more intangible
quality of trustworthiness, which would also include being sprung of a pure Christian
line. When Luis Ruiz de Arriola tried to prove his hidalguía before the courts in
1611, he recalled how his grandfather, a notary of the village of Colomera near
140
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
Granada, had always been entrusted with Inquisition business in preference to
the other notary in town ‘because he was a gentleman from the Basque Country’
(where no Moors or Jews had been allowed to live). In another case from Granada,
the alderman Guillén de Contreras appealed that his brother should be decapitated
as a noble, not hanged as a commoner for fraud (1640). One aged priest who
acted as witness to the reputation of the family, recalled how he had listened as a
child to his elders discussing family backgrounds: ‘In those days most of the citizens
who had come to Granada recently would frequent each other and talk about
their origins, since the upheavals and rebellions in this kingdom were so fresh in
people’s minds and there were so many Moors, so that everyone was keen to say
who he was and where he came from.’ The opening of the Indies kept alive this
frontier mentality. Thus, Juan de Córdova, the fourteen-year-old son of a silk
merchant in Granada, set out to prove his hidalguía in 1625, for ‘I am intending to
go to the kingdoms of the Indies, so that if I enter religion or marry out there,
there may be a record of where I come from and whose son and grandson I am,
and that I am a pure-blooded Old Christian.’7
It was never suggested, of course, that good lineage on its own should be a passport
to elite status. The chronicler of the Andalusian nobility, Argote de Molina, himself
of somewhat uncertain gentry background, wrote in 1588 of the famous Stephen
Bathory, who had died shortly before, that he had risen from being a ‘simple knight’
to become king of Poland, while the ‘one time schoolmaster’, Xarife, had taken command
of Morocco. ‘This was and is a very common phenomenon in every age, so that with
these examples each man may persevere in virtue, for it leads to great things, when
allied with diligence and perseverance.’ Shortly afterwards, the Cortes of 1593 warned
the king against tightening up on the requirements for hidalguía: ‘If you look at all the
histories of old, you will see that no better means was ever found of strengthening the
disposition to serve the commonwealth than to allow its members entry into the ruling
councils and offices, whereby nobility was acquired.’8
But that, perhaps, was the essence of the problem in the early modern period:
the rise of too many new men, with the consequent risk of subverting the social
hierarchy. Privileges of nobility, but without noble status, had been allowed to
those who were regarded as in some way benefiting the commonwealth. Thus,
graduates of the principal universities of Salamanca, Valladolid, Alcalá and Bologna
enjoyed exemption from taxation, from being gaoled for debt or from being tortured
if accused of a crime. Those who had over 1,000 ducats of property in Andalusia
were expected to maintain a horse and weapons and were known as ‘commoner
knights’ (caballeros villanos or cuantiosos), and enjoyed similar privileges. But the
question of whether one could go on from there to become a full noble was more
delicate. Guardiola noted in 1591 that a brave commoner might be knighted on
the field of battle, but only a hidalgo, of known ancestry, should be admitted to
that vanguard of chivalry, the Military Orders. As in other European countries,
the monarchy began to put noble status up for sale in the sixteenth century, though
the response seems to have been more disappointing in Castile than elsewhere.
141
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
The reasons were expressed forcefully enough by Pedro Crespo, the peasant hero
of Calderón’s drama The Mayor of Zalamea, in answer to his son’s suggestion that
he should buy nobility in order to exempt his household from the billeting of
soldiers. ‘Is there anyone who is not aware that I, though of pure Christian blood,
am a plain man?’ People would say ‘that I am noble for 5,000 or 6,000 reales, and
that is money, not honour, for no man can purchase honour’. Yet the father goes
on, later in the play to advise his son, who is setting off to serve the king, to
‘aspire, in a prudent way, to better yourself’.
And it is this gradual acceptance by one’s fellows and superiors which is a
marked feature of the frontier society that was Spain. The family of Saint Teresa
of Avila managed in this way to cover their origin as converted Jews and traders,
and acquire hidalguía, within a couple of generations. The saint’s grandfather,
Juan Sánchez, had been penanced by the Inquisition for practising Judaic rites in
1485. Ten years later he had moved from Toledo across the Guadarrama mountains
to Avila, where he continued his woollen and silk business. His sons branched
out into the more respectable world of tax-farming and finance. The eldest son,
father of Saint Teresa, married a patrician lady, and in 1522 he and his brothers
gathered their aristocratic friends to testify before the courts to the hidalguía of
the family. Though the case was contested and though Teresa’s brothers found it
prudent to emigrate to the Indies, where fewer questions were asked, the grandchildren
managed to climb a step higher into the Orders of Chivalry.9
 Purity of Blood
(limpieza de sangre) was an added, complicating factor in the whole story of hierarchy
in Spain. One could be a noble and of non-Christian ancestry, and therefore something
less than a true noble—ineligible, in theory, for the Orders of Chivalry. Hence the
joy which the Valencian noble Bernardo Catalá de Valeriola felt in 1601 when his
brother, a Dominican friar, was promoted as assessor (calificador) of the Inquisition,
for ‘they went over again our four quarterings, which pleased me, especially for
the Valeriola line’ —where there was suspicion of Jewish ancestry.10
The sheer proliferation of these investigations of ancestry, covering both hidalguía
and limpieza, gave a new twist to the old concern with establishing one’s background
in a racially mixed society. From the middle of the sixteenth century, monasteries,
cathedral chapters, university colleges and the chancery courts began to pile up
archives on this business. The Cortes of 1593 suggested that the great expansion
of warrants of nobility being issued by the courts over the previous twenty years
had something to do with the need to prove exemptions from the levies of troops
and billeting which were becoming an increasing nuisance. But more likely the
development of the bureaucratic state itself fostered the need and the ability to set
down in writing what had previously been the gossip of a mobile, frontier land.
One may note that as well as the formal attempt to prove hidalguía in the king’s
high court, there were many more interim informaciones de testigos (affidavits) sworn
out by parties seeking release from gaol for debt and the like. These documents
had only a doubtful legal status, but they could be a demonstration that a family
did indeed enjoy a superior status in the eyes of its neighbours.
142
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
Before the diffusion of registers of baptism and marriage in the later sixteenth
century, it was actually rather hard to document ancestry, other than by common
repute. The witnesses to the investigation of the Granadan merchant’s son, Juan
de Córdova, spoke of his relationship to the counts of Alcaudete. A sixty-year-old
illiterate weaver’s wife, presented by the Córdovas, recalled a conversation with a
man from Alcaudete, who had told her that Juan’s great-great-grandfather ‘had
been a brother or a first cousin of the count of Alcaudete, but she does not remember
for sure if he said brother [hermano] or first cousin [primo hermano]’.11 Bernardo
Catalá de Valeriola recorded in his diary his anger at the ‘boldness’ of Doctor
Jeroni Valeriola, armed as a knight in the Cortes of 1604 for his services to the
Crown, going on to claim that he was of the same Valeriola line as himself. ‘Since
he and his relatives are wealthy, they are making good matches.’ So, to nip this
usurpation of status in the bud, Bernardo summoned twenty-six of his friends to
testify before the governor of Valencia—ad perpetuam, rei memoriam—that this new
lawyer-knight had no blood ties with himself. The governor rubricked the testimony
on 14 March 1605, ‘and in case any register of this tribunal goes missing’, he had
the declarations recorded as well before the chancery court and that of the archbishop.12
The sheer impreciseness and confusion of status, therefore, has always to be
borne in mind. In the Crown of Aragon it was, indeed, easier to tell who was or
was not a noble because of the existence of flourishing estates of the realm, which
met in regular session and kept lists of members. In Castile, not paying direct
taxes might be one sign of noble status, and there were towns where certain offices
were reserved for hidalgos. But the Cortes of 1593 pointed out how uncertain and
non-universal such indicators were, and that the basic test was common fame, as
established by witnesses. As one witness for Jacinto de Fuentes, alderman of Granada,
put it in 1625, a hidalgo went around with his fellows, ‘showing off, and turning
up for fiestas and tournaments with many servants and horses…’. The more wealth
one had, suggested one writer in 1629, the easier it was to rise into this charmed
circle: ‘for we see time and again that common folk, if they are rich and powerful
and show themselves generous to their neighbours who might speak against them…not
only win a reputation for nobility but for distinction’.13 The peasant girl Dorotea
told Don Quijote in the same vein about her parents, ‘plain folk…pure Old Christians,
but so pure that their wealth and fine life-style are winning them little by little the
title of hidalgos’.
There was another way of rising in the world, at least in the bad old days of
civil war in late medieval Castile: intimidation. In 1550 the town council of Salvatierra,
near Cáceres, denounced twenty-five named individuals who had usurped hidalguía—
‘wealthy men, well connected and well supported by their friends… We are afraid
that for challenging their status they will wound or kill or dishonour us, as they
killed others in this region who stood up to them in the same way.’ It was one of
the standard questions posed by the courts investigating nobility, whether the
family had been exempted from taxes ‘because they were men of power, or allied
to great men who held castles or fortresses…or because they were so wealthy and
143
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
powerful that no one would have dared include them in a tax list’.14 Even as the
threat of violence receded after the early sixteenth century, money continued to
play a key role in the usurpation of noble status. Speaking of limpieza de sangre a
century later, the Inquisitor General Andrés Pacheco noted: ‘great offences are
committed in the sight of God in the enquiries…and most often those who have
most to hide get a declaration of purity of blood, while those who are of Old
Christian stock cannot, because they have not intrigued enough or have too many
enemies’.15
There was increasing concern, therefore, with the disorderliness of social mobility
in early modern Spain. The main issue, as regards hidalguía, was probably not
government fear of losing tax revenue, since the direct taxes paid by commoners
were a relatively small and shrinking part of the budget. Rather, it was the tidiness
of the bureaucratic mind which led the strengthened monarchy to regulate social
hierarchy. Hence in a sweeping decree of 1592 Philip II ruled that witnesses to
nobility must be interrogated directly by a high court judge, rather than allowing
their statements to be taken down by a clerk, with all the risk that entailed of
laxity or fraud. In a major statement on the subject the following year, the Cortes
argued that this would damage poor rural hidalgos, especially from that seedbed of
the medieval Reconquest, the mountains of the north stretching from the Basque
Country to Galicia, who had no money to pay for a judge to visit their villages.
The new law would only encourage commoners on the town councils, ‘with the
natural hatred which they bear towards the hidalgos, to hound any of that number
who lacks means’. And the Cortes went on, as we mentioned above, to point out
the inconvenience of too strict a standard of proof for nobility. It was a similar
point which some town councillors of Toledo made in 1586 about Philip II’s attempt
to reserve noble office there for genuine ‘old nobles’: ‘there is no more hateful
thing, nor anything which generates more rancour and vendettas or is more likely
to upset the peace of a group of citizens than to examine their status and lineages’.16
In practice, the law of 1592, as amended in 1594, seems to have been a dead
letter for much of the seventeenth century, during which the only curtailment of
social mobility may have been the decline of wealth within Spanish society. In
any case, a fresh attempt was made to stabilise the social hierarchy with the advent
of the new Bourbon dynasty in 1703. The law of that year complained of the
continued growth by stealth of the numbers of the nobility. No one henceforth
was to be accorded that status unless he had furnished explicit proof to his local
town council, which was to forward all documents to the high courts. The law
tightened up an older provision of Henry IV (1454–74), never properly enforced.
What had changed in the interval was really the institution of parish registers of
vital events, so that claimants were now expected regularly to furnish a good run
of baptismal certificates going back at least three or four generations.
Overall, the number of hidalgos must have risen to a peak some time in the
early seventeenth century—though this may be an optical illusion, created by the
increasing bureaucratisation of the concept. In Cartagena, for example, a clear
144
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
list of who was noble only began to be kept from the later sixteenth century, as
fiscal pressure grew and tax exemption became an issue. In Castile as a whole,
nobles were one in ten of the population in the census of 1591, with great contrasts
between the Basque Country, where virtually everyone was an hidalgo, and León,
where a quarter were, and Andalusia, with only one in twenty.17 But the following
century marked a dramatic reversal of the trend, and by the end of the Old Regime,
following the tighter criteria for establishing hidalguía, only about 5 per cent of
the population were accorded this status in the censuses.
In a sense, what one witnesses is the passing of the age of Don Quixote, of the
rustic knight whose ideology of chivalry and lack of means were both an embarrassment
in the modern age. The Cortes of 1585 investigated the popularisation of the title
‘don’, quietly usurped—‘over the last fifty years’ —by the upwardly mobile, tax
farmers and ministers of the Crown, when in times past it had been reserved for
the titled nobility. The complaints about the spread of luxury at this time and the
attempt to introduce sumptuary legislation restricting the use of coaches and fine
clothes were all tribute to a similar phenomenon, of the rise of an aristocracy of
power and wealth, whose lineage and knightly valour might be suspect, but whose
role within the body politic had to be recognised by the grant of honours. As well
as the creation of the ‘dons’ from below, there was the explicit conferment of
titles by the Crown, corresponding to that fear of Castillo de Bobadilla in 1597
that feudal lords were often just the newly rich. Philip III created 51 marquises
and 62 counts in all Spain between 1598 and 1621, while Charles II (1665–1700)
made 236 and 80 respectively. There were 60 titled nobles in Spain in 1520, 124
in 1597, 241 in 1631 and 533 by 1700.18 What we seem to be witnessing here is
the harnessing of the idea of nobility more explicitly to the service of the state,
through the conferment of public recognition on the wealthy and powerful.
‘Nobility is kept alive and strong when it is attached to wealth,’ wrote one
commentator in 1629, ‘and without money it is like a dead thing, for those who
are in need have often to turn their hands to vile things.’ Viciana advised his
readers that, while all nobles were in a sense equals, ‘titled lords and wealthy
knights’ would provide the framework of his study for obvious reasons. And he
dedicated the third book of his chronicle to Don Giner Rabaça de Perellós, who
‘keeps a household richly adorned, wherein you will find well appointed officers
and servants, and many horses and mules in his stables, and in his chamber
many rich jewels and ornaments and silverware and tapestries’. Nobility was, of
course, character, but ‘God has compensated the virtue and honour of these
good men with temporal possessions’.19 Honour led to honours. The king ‘is
obliged to give alms for the love of God’, ran a typical chancery formula of the
fifteenth century, setting up lordships in Andalusia; ‘it behoves the estate of
monarchs and of nobles to ennoble, honour and privilege those vassals who
give him loyal and good service’.20
It was, as we suggested in Chapter 5, in the later Middle Ages that a feudal
aristocracy began to take shape in Castile. As well as the natural trend in this
145
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
direction prompted by the colonisation of a frontier land, there was a change in
the relationship of the nobility with the cities, within whose walls the gestation of
their power began, and with the Crown. Feudal lords had come and gone in earlier
centuries of Spanish history, but it was from the fourteenth century—as the humanist
Antonio de Guevara was one of the first to remark in an essay of 1526— that a
modern aristocratic hierarchy really began to take shape. While the usurping Trastámara
dynasty proved remarkably generous after 1369 in rewarding its supporters and
courting their continued favours, the new families which rose at this time and
which would constitute the political elite of early modern Spain (Velasco, Manrique,
Enríquez, Pimentel, Mendoza, Pacheco, Córdoba …), managed to perpetuate their
power by a new inheritance strategy: the mayorazgo or perpetual entail of their
estates. ‘It is clear that by the division of inheritance patrimonies are weakened
and undermined,’ wrote the Valencian jurist Cerdán de Tallada. That had been
the lesson of the great families of the Middle Ages, with their numerous offspring
and clan-like structure, in which a clear line of descent in a particular fief seemed
often to be lacking. When the count of Tendilla created his entail in 1478, he said
that it was ‘to increase our house and make it greater and leave behind a memory
of ourselves, and also so that the descendant who is to be lord of all should have
more patrimony and power to gather to himself and shelter all our other descendants’.21
The trend was not all one way. Successful families liked to split off new acquisitions
and create a second patrimony for a younger son. Thus, the Constable of Castile,
Juan Fernández de Velasco, duke of Frías, set up a substantial new mayorazgo for
this purpose in 1612. But his idea was still that the brothers should cooperate for
the good of the family as whole: ‘In great houses we do not talk or think so much
about the law of legítimas (guaranteed portions of the inheritance reserved for
each child), for the first law is by custom, as it ought to be, that younger brothers
depend on the elder and look to enhancing his authority and the grandeur of his
house, so that the elder, in return for so much respect, should always look out for
his brothers, always helping and favouring them.’22 The social reformer Mateo
López Bravo wrote in 1616 that entails were useful in a monarchy, creating a
wealthy elite which had a stake in upholding the political order and which could
attach their networks of clients and dependants to the Crown. It was a similar
point that the Valencian jurist Cerdán de Tallada made in 1604, that the great
estates might provide a framework for the body politic, defending the throne against
its enemies both at home and abroad.23 Yet both writers soon revised their opinion,
pointing out the damaging consequences, social and economic, of the institution.
The aim of the mayorazgo was to confer stability on the aristocracy, but it is not
clear that it was wholly successful in doing so. One problem which became acute
was that of succession, where there were no male offspring of the previous holder.
In the demographic circumstances of the pre-industrial period, it may come as
little surprise to find, for example, that barely 3 per cent of the patricians of Madrid
managed to hand on their entails in the direct male line to their great-grandchildren.24
Females were encouraged to marry cousins in order to preserve the name, and
146
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
daughters normally took precedence over more distant male kin after the law of
1615—unless there was a specific intention in the original foundation to exclude
them. A more serious problem than the shortage of male heirs, at least in the
short term, was the too great numbers of offspring born to many noble houses.
Gerbet’s systematic study of the nobility of Extremadura under Ferdinand and
Isabel indicates that titled families had to provide for five or six surviving children
at the death of the holder, whereas the knights and the gentry had four or five.
These averages tend to iron out the differences between those who had few and
those who were at their wits’ end in providing for a numerous progeny. The third
duke of Gandia (1495–1543), father of Saint Francis Borgia, had nineteen legitimate
children, as well as one illegitimate, whom he recommended to the care of his
heir; and the genealogy of the dukes of Infantado in the sixteenth century is replete
with successive generations of a dozen or more offspring.25
In the Extremadura of Ferdinand and Isabel younger children seem to have
found little difficulty in marrying and establishing themselves in life. But as
the frontier closed and the entail became more general, the situation became
more grim. Already in 1510 and 1542 the Valencian Cortes referred to the
plight of younger sons, who were now demanding subsistence payments as a
matter of humanity if not of law from their elder brother in order to prevent
themselves falling into ‘poverty and distress’. The Valencians threw their support,
though, behind the elder brother—as did the Catalan gentry in 1585, who strengthened
an earlier measure of the fourteenth century that a father did not have to leave
more than a quarter of his estate for division among his younger offspring.26
The Venetian ambassador Soranzo (1597–1602) discussed the options open to
these unfortunates: ‘either to receive as favour whatever their elder brother is
pleased to give them, or to obtain ecclesiastical benefices, or to serve the king
in war, or to marry some woman who has means’ (taking her surname as a
result). In theory the heir was supposed to look after his siblings and see to
their placement in life. But was this really the case? ‘Ask what has happened
to so many sons and daughters and their descendants who have come to grief,’
wrote Cerdán de Tallada, ‘some falling by the wayside or dying in hospitals,
and others…taking shelter in convents.’ As a judge himself—and a noble, whose
relations with all his sons seem to have been particularly close—he bewailed
the proliferation of lawsuits over alimony between elder brothers and their
cadets. Two centuries later, towards the end of the Old Regime, another member
of the gentry class, the reforming statesmen Jovellanos, was still denouncing
the mistreatment of segundones (younger sons) under the laws of entail. ‘Nothing
is more repugnant than to see individuals from noble families, whose firstborn hold fat mayorazgos, lacking a career or a position, condemned to poverty,
celibacy and idleness.’27
A pious father like Don Luis de Requesens was genuinely troubled by the lack
of resources for his younger children, when he came to draw up his will in 1573,
shortly before leaving for Flanders as governor of that insurgent province. If he
147
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
had more than one son, his trustees were ‘to try and direct one into the church,
and another into the Order of Saint John…or into the service of the lord king,
each one according to the inclinations he shows’. As regards daughters, if he were
to have more than the one whom he had recently married to the marquis of Los
Vélez, he could only afford a dowry for a nunnery, not for a marriage. If these
girls showed no inclination to become nuns, they were to have a small annuity
and go to live with ‘some lady who is a kinswoman of our house’.28
Undoubtedly mobilising cash for dowries was the single biggest headache in
the lives of most aristocrats of the early modern period. The size of the dowry
had been tending to grow in the Renaissance period, in Spain as elsewhere in
Europe —testimony, some thought, to the materialism of the age and the growth
of a money economy, perhaps equally a reflection of the need to mobilise liquid
funds somehow when so much land was being tied down by entail. Marriage
negotiations among the nobility came to resemble a game of ‘beggar my neighbour’,
or a version of the dog chasing its own tail, with some families scoring a coup at
one generation and falling back into debt at the next as they saw their daughters
come of age to marry. From the later sixteenth century the dowries of the house
of Gandia had reached their peak of 100,000 ducats, virtually twice the annual
revenue of the estate. Lesser Valencian aristocrats might be content with about a
tenth of this sum on average, often more than what they collected in rent in a
year.29 Since each duke of Gandia regularly married off two of his daughters over
the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries, he faced a herculean task in actually funding
this strategy—which, of course, brought valuable connections and influence of an
indirect kind. The bulk of the dowry would often be settled as an annuity on the
entail—easier to do in Valencia than in Castile, where such settlements would
require specific royal authorisation.
The success or failure of a particular generation of a noble house might be measured
in terms of its ability to settle its daughters in life. But the care for daughters could
also be reflected in a concentration of resources upon them at the expense of younger
male siblings, who were expected to make their own way in the world. Hence, the
Portuguese aristocrat Mello, writing in 1651, noted that a father might well ‘recruit’
a son-in-law through marriage to his daughter from a slightly lower social category
than his own. A saving could be made on the dowry in such a case. If the suitor
were not quite of impeccable lineage, yet ‘if he stood well at court or were very
wealthy or was eminent in arms or letters’, he might be an acceptable match. Among
the nobles of Extremadura, one suspects that many of the cases of young hidalgos
leaving home to settle down in their bride’s town of residence reflect this pattern, as
do the examples of restricted dowry paid out by the members of the Council of
Castile to their sons-in-law between 1621 and 1746.30
The question of how the great families were to settle their daughters depended,
therefore, on the pool of upwardly mobile suitors from the gentry. The younger
son had typically to fend for himself—in service to the church or the king or in
‘trade overseas’, as the refrain cited by Cervantes put it. The Catalan gentleman
148
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
Perot de Vilanova tells us in his autobiography how he set out in 1561 to visit his
younger brother Gaspar, whom he had not seen for ten years. Educated together
at the university of Lleida, Perot had gone on to inherit the family estate, while
Gaspar had been placed as a clerk in the Council of Castile. Fitted out with a suit
of clothes at the start of his new job in 1552, Gaspar ‘since then did not ask or
spend a penny from our patrimony’. The two brothers hardly recognised each
other, but great joy followed the reunion. Since Gaspar had acquired a position of
receiver general of the Council, ‘he did a lot for me with his money’, commented
Perot. ‘May God grant him a long life,’ he concluded piously, ‘for the good of His
service, and may he rise to become a great man so that he may do good to Him
and to everyone else.’31 One recalls the words of the Franciscan moralist Juan de
Pineda, who wrote scathingly of the imbalance in career prospects between the
heir to the mayorazgo and his younger brothers. ‘The heir is not allowed to study
…and the other sons who have nothing to inherit are put to school…But the
schoolmen…win honour and wealth, and protect their ignorant, wealthy brothers
and run their affairs.’32
More often, though, the younger brother remained like a millstone around the
neck of the heir. The first count of Carlet provided an annuity of 300 Valencian
pounds a year for his younger son, Felipe. After his father’s death in 1617, Felipe
went off to Flanders to serve as a private soldier. By 1622 he had risen to the rank
of captain, whereupon his brother, the second count of Carlet, decided to cut off
his annuity, alleging that the estate was so encumbered with debt that he and his
wife had barely 2,100 pounds clear between them. A bitter lawsuit followed, which
envenomed relations between the two for years thereafter. In a twist to a familiar
story, the count of Real managed to offload the alimony he was paying his younger
brother, Alfonso de Calatayud, by appointing him to command the company which
he had been asked to raise in 1630 for the campaign in Italy. What the count had
to pay in bounties and equipment for the soldiers was compensated for by placing
Alfonso on the royal payroll. But another brother, the priest Francisco, was at
daggers drawn with the count over his annuity, and furious when his request to
the Crown to be appointed archdeacon of Alicante in 1643 was countered by his
elder brother’s desire to obtain the post for one of his own eleven offspring.33 The
sheer volume of petitions for favours coming from the gentry of Castile or Aragon
cast light on the tensions within families created by the problem of younger sons,
but also suggest the enormous resilience of the system— not a neat pyramid of
deference and obligation as envisaged by theorists of the entail, perhaps, but a
struggling throng of candidates from which a ruling elite could be recruited.
Before we explore that point in a little more detail, it might be useful to say
something about the economic situation of the great families, since on the deepening
sense of crisis here so much else was to turn. In general, the rents of the feudal
lords were fairly buoyant over the early modern period, with the notable exception
of the seventeenth century, an interval of recession. In Old Castile, where seigneurs
owned little land directly and relied mainly on fixed dues from copyholders or on
149
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
alienated royal excise taxes, incomes were probably less dynamic in the sixteenth
century than in Andalusia, where many of the lords farmed for the market; but
the difference was probably narrowing by the eighteenth century, as a market
economy penetrated the countryside of Spain as a whole. In Catalonia and Valencia
a more typically feudal system placed some restraints on seigneurial enterprise in
this respect, but in Valencia the eighteenth century also saw great expansion: thus,
the rents in many parts of the Gandia estates tripled between 1710 and 1790.34 In
other words, it is difficult to see the early modern period as a whole as representing
any real crisis for the seigneurial class. Certainly, a sufficient number of the nobility
kept a watchful eye on the administration of their rents. Books for the running of
seigneurial households became popular from the sixteenth century onwards, setting
out the duties of stewards and accountants. One of the letters of Don Diego de
Vargas (1643– 1704), governor of New Mexico, from El Paso in 1691 to his sonin-law advises him of the arrangements in hand to increase rentals from the family
estates round Granada by providing more irrigation. If the grain can be stored
after the harvest until the following March or April, then it ‘will sell at the best
price’.35
Yet, despite the large rents of many nobles, ‘you will find very few who know
how to run their houses properly and who do not have huge debts’, as the Venetian
ambassador Tiepolo reported already in 1563. He blamed their lavish expenditure
on ‘liveries, gambling, benevolences, mistresses and jesters’. And his successor,
ambassador Soranzo, painted much the same picture in 1602, though adding now
that they could no longer get by: ‘they do not pay what they owe and they are
coming to be hated’.36 What had gone wrong? There was, in the first place, the
sheer difficulty of adjusting agrarian rents—often scattered in remote areas, always
liable to be undermined by bad harvests or the poor state of the roads—to the
relentless rhythm of an urban economy. Don Luis de Requesens, in his testament
of 1573, alluded to the confusion built up in his accounts by the fact that his
steward paid the bills which fell due with whatever money he had to hand, either
his own or that of his master. In a chivalrous society, one expected to be repaid as
much in favours as in cash, and questions only arose when the personal relationship
between two men ended.
There was, in other words, an inherent tendency towards indebtedness in the
structure of a pre-industrial economy, and the bigger the enterprise, the more
sizeable its debt burden was liable to be. At the beginning of our period the count
of Tendilla was complaining constantly about his lack of means and his need to
sell off part of his large patrimony; yet he was at the same time acquiring other
estates and engaging in their colonisation, as was the count of Benavente around
the same time. But the process could not go on indefinitely. By 1580 the Cortes of
Castile were considering the damage inflicted on society at large by the bankruptcy
of so many great families, who had got others to stand surety for their obligations—
‘and these cannot refuse to help them out, since they are their vassals or servants
or so dependent on them that they cannot turn their backs’. Requesens in 1573
150
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
had engaged in a variety of expedients: letters of exchange on the European fairs,
which left him with an uneasy conscience in spite of the reassurance of his confessors
(‘for I am not a merchant’), mortgages on the estates of ‘gentlemen who are friends
of mine’, and money borrowed on his behalf by his peasantry. Holders of an entail
were not legally allowed to mortgage it without special royal dispensation, which
created some uncertainty when a nobleman died. Thus, when the duke of Sessa
passed away in 1606, of an illness brought on mainly (according to the chronicler
Cabrera de Córdova) by ‘a great melancholy, to which his many debts and lack of
means contributed’, his son and heir refused to take responsibility for 80,000 ducats
worth of obligations left behind.37
The elaborate manoeuvring by the aristocracy and its creditors has to be viewed
within a framework of constant renewal of resources within the ruling class. Most
wealthy people in the Old Regime were or became nobles, and much of the borrowing
was actually the reallocation of resources within this group. This is evidently true
when one considers that the biggest cause of debt was likely to be the establishment
of dowries. So, when the count of Buñol married his son and heir to the daughter
of his creditor, Don Giner Rabaça de Perellós, in August 1609, the dowry of 15,000
Valencian pounds was partly paid in the cancellation of debts on the Buñol estate;
and the count of Real’s biggest creditors at this time included his own wife, his
son-in-law and, indeed, the heiress Ana María Mateu, to whom he married his
grandson and heir.38
But undoubtedly some great houses got themselves into such a muddle with
their accounts that more drastic measures were needed. In 1594 the government
had to take over the administration of the estates of the duke of Osuna, assigning
him an allowance of 24,000 ducats, while devoting the rest of his rent-roll of
138,062 ducats to administration and the payment of his creditors.39 These socalled ‘sequestrations’ became common in the early seventeenth century, but were
far from satisfying the creditors. They represented how difficult it was to keep a
check on what the seigneur was actually up to among his own vassals, and allegations
of massive fraud usually led to some kind of concordia or ‘agreement’ between the
two parties. Thus in 1633 the duke of Osuna recovered control of the administration
of his estates, with a guarantee of retrenchment on his part and reimbursement of
outstanding sums.
The assistance which the Crown gave to the great families in order to persuade
the creditors to accept limitations on their demands became particularly evident
in Valencia. There the premier nobleman, the duke of Gandia had gone bankrupt
in 1604. He nevertheless proved able, in a last exercise of feudal power, to round
up his Morisco peasants in the autumn of 1609, following royal orders for the
expulsion of this people. His letter to the king of 9 October betrayed his sadness
at ‘the ruin of this land’, but also affirmed: ‘I am quite happy about all these
losses, since I have been of service to Your Majesty, for it was for this that my
house was founded. But I am confident that Your Majesty will be pleased to set it
on its feet again, so that you may call on it again in time of need.’ A major political
151
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
battle developed, in fact, between the duke’s creditors—well ensconced in the noble
estate and led by the count of Buñol’s brother—and the embattled grandee, who
was a kinsman of the royal favourite, the duke of Lerma. Eventually, in 1621, the
Council of Aragon resolved against following the plea of the creditors for the
break-up and sale of the Gandia estates—a momentous political decision, which
committed the monarchy to a campaign of persuasion among the disgruntled creditors,
that they should reach a concordia with the duke, limiting their claims. The duke
would recover control of his shrunken rent-roll of 28,810 Valencian pounds, out
of which he would guarantee, as a first claim on the budget, an annual deposit of
10,000 pounds—a reduction of some two-thirds on the old interest payments. Probably
no more than 133 of the 500 creditors ever formally accepted this agreement of
1622, but it was solemnly ratified by the Crown. Commenting on the decree publishing
it on 26 February 1622, the priest Joan Porcar confided to his diary that the king
had invoked ‘all his supreme power and majesty and absolute lordship…in order
to bail out the duke of Gandia, so that he will never have to pay what he owes to
his creditors’.40 One begins to understand what ambassador Soranzo was referring
to when he spoke of the debt-ridden aristocracy becoming ‘hateful’ to the people;
the risk was that they might drag the monarchy down with them.
The Venetian ambassadors had commented on the link between aristocratic
indebtedness and the growing power of the monarchy, in the sense that those who
were in debt could no longer cause trouble to the Crown. But the economic writers
of the seventeenth century were beginning to see things in rather different terms,
emphasising the harm done to society as a whole by this phenomenon. Deploring
the concentration of nobles in wasteful idleness at court, Fernández Navarrete
wrote in 1626 that ‘if they would only reside on their estates, they would save
money, they would not destroy their vassals, they would have funds with which
to serve the king, they would look after their subjects like fathers…’. If the great
aristocracy only destroyed itself, the situation might be tolerable: ‘but, just as
great trees, when they crash, bring down all that lives in their shade, so the bankruptcies
of these lords ruin a countless number of vassals, servants and friends’.41
What seemed to be at stake here was the collapse of a traditional feudal hierarchy.
The Venetian ambassadors commented on the loss of the military vocation of the
nobility after the conquest of Granada in 1492. ‘Young knights and gentlemen,’
complained the Cortes in 1590, ‘although they have the duty and inclination to
ride on horseback, lack anyone to teach them, so that they spend their time idly
strutting around, instead of learning skill and dexterity.’ And their predecessors
had attempted to revive the martial arts by spending public funds on tournaments,
providing ‘lances for the knights to exercise with, and music for their fiestas’.42 It
was a similar story in the Crown of Aragon. The Cortes of Valencia in 1537, and
then again in 1552, arranged for subsidies to mount tournaments, ‘for the good
of the common weal, and for the better safeguarding and defence of the city and
kingdom of Valencia’. In Catalonia, meanwhile, the medieval jousting fraternity
of Saint George was revived in 1565 in order to arrest the perceived decline in the
152
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
military vocation of noble youths. But the decline of the martial spirit seems to
have gone on relentlessly. In 1626 Fernández Navarrete could write: ‘Not so many
years ago in all the noble houses you could find a stock of armour, pikes and
arquebuses, which kept alive in the owner and his children the ardour for combat
inherited from his ancestors’ —but not any more.43
In 1604 Barthélemy Joly noted the contrast with France: ‘Our gentlemen live
in the country and practise soldiery since they are always on horseback, riding to
the hunt…living in towns undermines the valour of the Spaniards.’ But there was,
perhaps, a more general problem: that war itself was becoming increasingly professionalised,
and no longer open to the casual gentleman adventurer. The Granadan aristocrat,
Pérez de Herrasti, could look back in the history of his family which he published
in 1750 on the exploits of his ancestor, the second lord of Domingo Pérez, who
had served Charles V in Flanders and Tunis. On his father’s death in 1538, he
had returned to take up his inheritance in Granada, taking with him ‘a splendid
baggage train of packmules, all well laden and decked out with his coat of arms,
and the memoirs of that period assure us that he was carrying more than 20,000
ducats in gold and silver. Weren’t those happy times in which a soldier could do
so well for himself!’44 From then on, a mixture of city politics and estate administration
had kept the family in Granada, only torn from its roots by the turmoil of civil
conflict in the War of the Spanish Succession (1702–13).
For many of the Spanish aristocracy life must have been one of rustic mediocrity.
The humanist writer Antonio de Guevara, himself sprung of this milieu, in his
attack on the lure of the court (1539), sketched a portrait of the type. The country
gentleman should look after his household, ‘visit the hospitals, succour the poor, be
kind to orphans, give money to the less well-off’, as well as ‘frequenting monasteries,
hearing many masses and listening to the sermons’; after which he could go off ‘to
prune his vines, see his farm, inspect his livestock and have a word with the ploughman’,
without losing ‘a jot of his honour’.45 A couple of generations later Cervantes left a
memorable portrait of the genre, in the Knight of the Green Coat and, of course, in
Don Quixote himself. The fifty-year-old knight of La Mancha, ‘in the times when
he had nothing to do (which was most of the year), gave himself over to reading
about knights errant’, forgetting his other occupations, the hunt and the running of
his farm, which was tended for him by a lad who doubled up as a lackey when
required. The dreadful problem for such men was idleness—the vice of ocio, against
which preachers of the time were beginning to thunder. Esteban de Garibay, the
historian of Philip II’s reign, tells us in his memoirs of the pointlessness of his own
existence as the eldest son and heir of a small Basque gentleman. After leaving
university, he had little to do but mount fiestas and strut around town in fine clothes.
Though Guevara praised the quiet life of the village as truly Christian, he
admitted that it was a hard option for a man of spirit to follow: ‘Every time a post
of bishop or an encomienda or a lieutenancy fall vacant, wild and pointless thoughts
assail him, telling him that if he had not gone into retirement, he would surely
have been promoted.’ So, Cervantes describes the three brothers, hidalgos of León,
153
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
who were told by their father of the old Spanish proverb, that they must better
themselves by service in the church, on the high seas (trade) or at the king’s court.
The eldest went abroad as a soldier, the second made a fortune in Peru, paying
for the law studies of the youngest, who rose eventually to an appointment as
judge in the high court of Mexico. It is a fictional portrait of a class to which
Cervantes himself belonged and whose aspirations he knew well. As one reads
the chronicles of the Spanish regions at this time, one comes across similar experiences.
Cristóbal de Espinosa de Monteros figures in the chronicle of Jaén, for example,
as a local gentleman who had left to join the army at twelve years of age, ‘when a
captain passed through this city enlisting people’. After five years at sea, he ended
up in Mexico, calling on a wealthy uncle who was a merchant out there and who
recommended him to a captain who was organising an expedition against the
Indians. By 1608 he was in the Philippines, ‘from where his parents in Jaén got a
letter, telling them about a great battle which he had had with some pirates’. But
since then, silence: ‘We have heard nothing further from him.’46
Service to the king had been a traditional feature of the age of chivalry, now
much augmented by the sheer growth of the Spanish empire. The expansion of the
state, with all the opportunities it offered for careers in the army and the bureaucracy,
was one of the signal features of the early modern period, and it was symbolised in
Spain by the growing importance of the court. Medieval Castile had lacked a fixed
capital, even a fixed ‘national shrine’, like the great mausolea of Westminster Abbey
or the Abbey of Saint Denis near Paris, where the rulers of England and France
were interred. Instead, the bones of Spanish kings lay scattered in half a dozen
locations, following the pattern of the Reconquista. It was one of the achievements
of Philip II to give his country a new political and cultural centre—a national pantheon
in the Escorial (built between 1562 and 1585), where the rulers, starting with Charles
V, came to be buried, and a capital in Madrid. Already in the fifteenth century the
high court had been settled in Valladolid, and government papers were becoming
so voluminous that it was decided to find them a fixed home too, near Valladolid,
in the great castle of Simancas, in 1547. But it was not until 1561 that Philip II
chose Madrid as a seat of administration for the empire. It had already been growing
in popularity from some time before—the geographer Pedro de Medina refers already
in 1548 to the great building work being carried out on the royal residence there. It
had advantages over its nearest rivals—better drinking water than nearby Toledo,
the old imperial capital of the Visigoths and the seat of the ecclesiastical primate of
Spain, and better access to timber and firewood than Valladolid, which was also
regarded as damp and unhealthy, though better supplied with bread. Ultimately,
though, the decision finally to abandon Valladolid in 1606 (after the capital had
been temporarily shifted there in 1601), may have depended, as the chronicler Cabrera
de Córdova tells us, on the complaints of other cities—and some of the most important,
like Seville—that it was just too remote, too far north.
In any case, the mushroom growth of Madrid—from a city of perhaps 20,000
people in 1561 to one of 45,000 by 1597, then a maximum of 150,000 by the middle
154
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
of the seventeenth century—caused some soul-searching. Joly pointed out in 1604
the difficulty of keeping this land-locked city supplied with food, while Sancho de
Moncada in 1619 noted that Madrid, not being a trading city like Paris or London,
was attracting this huge population for all the wrong reasons, as parasites on the
court. The Cortes began to complain in the early 1600s that, whereas Philip II had
only been spending 400,000 ducats a year on his court, Philip III was managing to
get through 1,300,000. There were 1,700 or so posts in the royal households in
1623—including those of the queen and the king’s brothers—as compared with 762
in that of Charles V.47 However, if the court was beginning to assume a new importance,
it was far from satisfying the aspirations of all who sought its favour. The Sevillian
nobleman, Alonso Enríquez de Guzmán, who set out, armed with a letter of introduction
to a remote kinsman, the Admiral of Castile, to claim a position in Charles V’s
household in 1518, was rebuffed by the royal secretary, Los Cobos. ‘Do not think
that you will get what you are seeking just by showing us your family tree,’ he was
told, for others with as long a lineage and more distinguished service ‘cannot get
what they ask’. The humanist writer Eugenio de Salazar (c.1530–1601) was pretty
scathing about ‘men whose rents and fortune are not sufficient for them to have at
their beck and call a lackey or a page-boy’, but who want command over a city and
its region. Since there were so many claimants, ‘if God does not work with these
offices a miracle like that of the five loaves and two fishes, not one in a hundred of
the mouths now gaping open at court will get a bite’.48
Talent rather than lineage must be the first rule for appointment to office,
affirmed that testy Valencian humanist Fadrique Furió Ceriol in his famous essay
on statesmanship of 1559. ‘Some will say that knights and lords have to be rewarded
according to the authority of their houses and the services of their persons. I
would answer to this that I say no different; but that it is not the same thing to
reward a man and appoint him to the government.’49 What, indeed, was happening
in Renaissance Spain, as in the rest of Europe at the time, was the formation of a
new elite, based on the expanding competence of the state. The chronicler Lorenzo
Galíndez de Carvajal (1472–1532) echoed a conventional wisdom when he wrote
that the Catholic Kings, Ferdinand and Isabel, ‘paid more attention to placing
men who were prudent and had talent, though they were of middling background,
than men who were high-placed and from the principal families’. And it was the
same point which Don Diego Hurtado de Mendoza, himself a younger son of the
count of Tendilla, made in his great history of the Morisco uprising of 1568.
Recalling how his own family had been edged out of power in Granada, he referred
to their rivals, the judges and ministers of the Crown, promoted since the days of
Ferdinand and Isabel, as ‘a middle class (gente media), half-way between the great
and the small, men given over to the profession of law’.50
In practice, this bureaucratic elite was often drawn from the ranks of the gentry,
often from among the small noble families which served as regidores in the royal
towns of Old Castile. Of those appointed to the chief governing body, the Council
of Castile, between 1621 and 1746, 90 per cent could trace their noble ancestry
155
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
back beyond their great-grandparents, though there was usually a tradition of
university study and legal careers in the family.51 A system of patronage and clientage
within the university colleges ensured that the relatives or dependants of existing
members of the bureaucracy stood a better chance than outsiders of being considered
for promotion. Attempts to open up this cursus honorum in the later eighteenth
century did not, perhaps, markedly change its basic character. The leading minister
of the Enlightenment, Campomanes (1723–1802), was born into a petty hidalgo
family of Asturias. After learning Latin with an uncle who was a canon, then
studying for a while at the university of Seville, he moved to Madrid in 1742 as a
clerk in a lawyer’s office. He married his employer’s daughter, set up his own
legal practice in 1749, from where he made useful contacts with the great —the
counts of Benavente and Miranda, the archbishop of Toledo—and eventually was
promoted as fiscal of the Council of Castile in 1762. His lively, enquiring mind,
his range of personal contacts, and his key role in preparing the case for the expulsion
of the Jesuits in 1767, gained him the promotions which culminated with his tenure
of president of the Council, and effective prime minister of Spain between 1783
and 1791.52 It is often difficult, at this distance in time, to recapture the personality
and charisma of such men that must have recommended them to their superiors.
Of some, like the first minister Ensenada (1743–54), the son of a notary with
pretensions to hidalguía, we are told (by the man himself in his later reminiscences)
that he got his start in life as a clerk in various legal offices and commercial companies
because of his good handwriting (then a prized asset like command of information
technology today). He had the good luck to be noticed by the naval minister
Patiño and brought to Madrid as his assistant (1720), from where he climbed to
royal favour.53 From an earlier period, the careers of the great secretaries of the
Catholic Kings, of Charles V and of Philip II, suggest broadly similar lines of
ascent. Fernando del Pulgar’s intelligence shines through in his letters; the more
discreet Francisco de los Cobos was a skilled manipulator of patronage. Discretion,
charm, a good memory, a knack of pleasing the right people: all of these were
ingredients in the making of the perfect bureaucrat.
But the ability of the state to command obedience depended on wider social
ties —in spite of Furió Ceriol’s warning that ‘the good councillor must rid himself
of any ties of friendship, kinship, partiality or faction’. In practice, one feels, the
stability of the early modern polity depended rather on the contrary phenomenon,
of a network of favours which linked the bureaucrat in with the older social elites.
Thus, 40 per cent of the Councillors of Castile married women from their province
of origin, rather than choosing them randomly at court, and most chose to found
their mayorazgos not in Madrid but at home. The career of one of the most influential
Andalusian families of the seventeenth century, the Bohorques, may serve as an
illustration. Alonso Núñez de Bohorques, from the small Sevillian town of Villamartín
and claiming descent from a man knighted after a victory over the Moors in 1340,
rose through the law to become judge of the high court of Granada. A strategic
marriage to a Girón girl, daughter of another Granadan magistrate and a remote
156
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
kinswoman of the duke of Osuna, helped his ascent into the Council of Castile by
1588, while he began to purchase lands and jurisdiction round Granada, laying
the foundations for a new noble dynasty. His son Antonio Alvarez de Bohorques
(1575–1640) obtained a post of gentleman in the royal household and married a
cousin of the Ximénez de Góngora clan, who were patricians of Cordoba and
members of the Council of Finance, to which Antonio himself was appointed in
turn. His interests and connections ranged, thus, from Madrid to Cordoba (which
city he represented in the Cortes) and Granada, where he and his mother built a
splendid mausoleum for their dynasty (the monastery of Saint Basil). Created
marquis of Los Trujillos in 1632, he was in a good position to act as a powerbroker between the government and regional elites in Andalusia. The career of
Francisco de los Cobos (1482–1547) illustrated much the same phenomenon. Of
a petty gentry family of Ubeda (Andalusia), he became by the time of his death a
powerful aristocrat as well as a minister of the Crown, lord of several fiefs in
Andalusia as well as near the court in Valladolid, and an in-law of the Zafras, who
had risen under the Catholic Kings, through ministerial office and a post of town
councillor in recently conquered Granada, to lordship in that province.
Service to the Crown, thus, involved a restructuring of the old balance of power
between centre and periphery, between bureaucratic and feudal elites. The Venetian
ambassador Soranzo (1597–1602) noted an apparent change which was taking
place in his own time. Under the late king, Philip II, the great families had been
‘without authority, kept down by his majesty, and not employed by him in important
positions’; whereas the new monarch ‘makes use of them and pays them compliments’,
appointing great numbers to the Council of State in particular. It has often been
suggested that the aristocracy staged a political comeback in the seventeenth century,
but it has never been clear whether this was a genuine recovery of power by the
old families, or merely an optical illusion, caused by the aristocratisation of the
ministerial elite, like the Cobos and the Bohorques.
Service to the Crown had been the origin of the fortune of most of the grandees,
and the continuation of that tradition was evident throughout the early modern
period. Removed from the governorship of Granada for his lack of success against
the Moorish rebels in 1570, the marquis of Mondéjar protested to the low-born
chief minister, Cardinal Espinosa, against the damage done to his reputation. The
king was obliged in conscience and honour to find him a new job, ‘so that my
honour, reputation and income do not suffer more than they already have for no
good cause, for, given the services of my ancestors, of my father and myself, I
deserve much favour and indulgence from His Majesty’.54 The running of the
empire depended in great measure on the willingness of those with resources to
deploy their best efforts. The third duke of Alcalá had begun to serve the Crown
as viceroy of Catalonia in 1618, then ambassador to Rome in 1625, from where
he moved to the viceroyalty of Naples in 1629, then to Sicily in 1632, before
dying at the age of fifty-three on his way to the Congress of Cologne (1637). The
duke of Frías, in his testament of 1612, listed his long record of service, including
157
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
the governorship of Milan, membership of the Council of State and participation
in the peace talks with England (1604). ‘I have served in this and all other business
which has come my way with great love and fidelity to my king and great peril to
my own life, including the loss of my health…not to mention the heavy expenses
and losses to my estate which I have incurred.’55
Part of the obligations of service was the looking after hordes of dependants.
Employment under the Crown enormously increased one’s own patronage and
hence influence in the wider world, but equally it could be very costly. When the
duke of Alcalá left for his Roman embassy in 1625, he was accompanied by 32
pages from ‘illustrious Sevillian families’; and when the duke of Alba passed through
Valencia in 1622 on his way to the viceroyalty of Naples, his magnificent suite of
100 men on horseback and 81 on foot, all in livery of bright velvet, caught the eye
of the local chronicler. There were official salaries, of course, but they were generally
too small. The writer Diego Hurtado de Mendoza, ambassador to Rome, complained
in 1552 that the 5,000 escudos assigned to him every year went on feeding his
household of 120. He had had to borrow 9,000 more on his own account, especially
for repairs to the fortress of Siena through which Spanish troops passed north.
Without funds, he could not maintain the authority of his office: ‘I would not
mention all this, if it did not involve a certain question of honour.’ After the fall of
Siena to the French later that year, Mendoza was relieved of his post. In a stormy
interview with Charles V, he protested that the dismissal had called his honour
into question, that he was the victim of slander at court, ‘and thus I begged His
Majesty to put a stop to the murmuring by giving me new honours and promotion’.56
Service to the Crown was a delicate business, which, if it could enhance the prestige
of a nobleman, could also bring him low if royal favour was withdrawn or deemed
inadequate.
Above all, there was the problem of whether the costs of service might outweigh
any political gain. The duke of Arcos left at his death in 1573 debts which could
be traced back, for the most part, to his campaigns with Philip II in Flanders and
subsequent sojourn at court (1558–61). The rewards of office were often substantial—
over 700,000 ducats for the count of Benavente, not counting his salary as viceroy
of Valencia and Naples; but he managed in this period (1580–1624) to run up
debts of over 400,000 ducats, and by 1624 he was officially bankrupt, his estates
sequestrated and his family put on an allowance by the courts.57 But this situation
gradually became a vicious circle: without royal favour, earned by unremitting
service, one could never hope for relief from debt. The duke of Osuna, bankrupt
since 1594, was allowed to divert some of the payments owing to his creditors in
order to subsidise further activity on the Crown’s behalf. The duke of Medina
Sidonia was allowed in 1629 to suspend for six years the reimbursement of the
capital on his mortgages, because of ‘the diligence with which he attends to his
obligations’, in the words of the government committee, ‘and it is only fair that he
should have some relief so that he has the wherewithal to come to Your Majesty’s
aid when needed’.58
158
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
However, this alliance with the monarchy posed wider social and political
problems, threatening to open a gulf between those who enjoyed the fruits of
power and those who had to foot the bill. The Cortes of 1615 had placed among
their first demands the need to limit the immigration of the feudal lords to court,
since it only encouraged wasteful expenditure and deprived the peasantry of
succour. The Junta of Reform, set up in the last years of Philip III’s reign to
stem the perceived decline of the economy and the finances of the state, returned
to the problem, though without coming up with any viable solution. ‘If it was
once a good policy to keep the nobles near the king’s person in order to make
sure of them, to get them to spend and waste their substance so that they would
no longer have the resources to engage in upheavals,’ wrote Fernández Navarrete
in 1626, that age was past. Now the danger was rather that lack of means, ‘like
a bad counsellor, would lead a man to seek, in the revolutions of the commonwealth,
what he threw away so prodigally on vice’.59 The problem was one addressed by
the great reforming minister Olivares, albeit from a slightly different perspective.
Founding his great new mayorazgo of Sanlúcar (1642), he aimed to have his successors
enjoy a rent-roll of 100,000 ducats a year. It was potentially ‘very dangerous’
for the security of the state for a noble to have more; but equally it was desirable
that he should have no less, so that he would not have to ‘bother and pester (the
king) for subsidies…which all fall in the end on the shoulders of the people of
these realms’.60
This was the great issue which the early seventeenth-century monarchy was
having to address, of how to settle the fiscal and military burden so that it did not
imperil the stability of the social hierarchy. The president of the Council of Castile
warned the Cortes of 1623 that taxation would have to be shifted from excises on
the food of the poor towards a direct impost on the rich: ‘with this [other governments]
achieved the tranquillity and security of their commonwealths, for from the extreme
poverty of some and the excessive wealth of others, riots, turbulence and civil
wars usually follow’. The debates tended to reveal a fundamental disquiet, though,
on the part of the provincial oligarchies represented in the Cortes, about the whole
growth of the state. A strong state, affirmed the president, would protect Spanish
trade as well as religion. But the deputies looked rather to the fortunes made by a
new political elite on the back of the tax-payer. Don Fernando Alvarez de Toledo
suggested that if the king needed more money, the fairest way would be to tax
those who had profited from the growth of the state in recent times. ‘If His Majesty
who is in heaven granted me an annuity of 3,000 ducats, and now the king our
lord, his son, finds himself left with no option but to make the poor even poorer…it
is incumbent upon me as a gentleman (hidalgo) to succour His Majesty with half of
the amount of the favour which I so graciously received from his father.’61
One of the classic statements of this position came from the pen of Mateo
Lisón y Biedma, deputy for Granada in the Cortes of 1621. The growth of court
favours ‘is one of the main reasons why Your Majesty is short of money and
something which your vassals feel most deeply about, seeing that the taxes which
159
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
they pay in with so much effort, which is to say with the blood and sweat of so
many poor people, are turned to the profit, benefit and increase of favourites’.
Olivares’s planned replacement of the excise on food with forced loans from the
wealthy to a state bank (erario) was no solution to the real problem, which was the
irresponsible growth of a state bureaucracy, misusing tax-payers’ money. ‘Wealth
does not consist of collecting and gathering in a lot, but of holding on to what one
has got and spending little.’ Lisón needled Olivares by his opposition to fiscal
reform. After distributing printed copies of his pamphlets to the members of the
Cortes of 1627—at which time he was no longer deputy for Granada but represented
the interests of his city as procurador mayor at court—he was ordered out of Madrid
by the great minister, who told him that ‘the enemy could not do as much damage
if they entered these kingdoms with an army’. This was surely to overstate the
case, and to ignore the very real ties which, in spite of appearances to the contrary,
bound the provincial elites ever more tightly with the court. After all, Lisón had
asked for a post in the king’s household at the conclusion of the Cortes of 1621,
and was to offer the Crown money in 1634 for the sale of positions of familiar of
the Inquisition—a way of consolidating his own influence in the kingdom of Granada
and, as the royal commissioner in charge of the negotiations pointed out, removing
the suspicion of Jewish ancestry attaching to his second wife, Baltasara Madera.62
Baltasara was the daughter of the royal minister Gregorio López Madera, member
of the Council of Castile since 1619 and purchaser of a small lordship, Cozvíjar,
near Granada, through whose chancery court this able lawyer (son of a physician
to Philip II) had risen to power. Lisón himself, though a member of the town
council of Granada, was laying the foundations of a noble dynasty through strategic
marriages like that to Madera, through the accumulation of offices in various
towns of the Granadan kingdom, and through building up his own little estate of
Algarinejo into a feudal lordship. Though he opposed the sale of feudal jurisdictions
in 1626 as undermining the good administration of justice and the authority of
cities like Granada, he had already obtained in 1614 a grant of jurisdiction over
Algarinejo, ‘if people come to settle there’. Indeed, in 1621 he advocated such
private enterprise as a way of encouraging the repopulation of rural Spain. His
politics, he told Olivares in a stormy interview on 1 June 1627, came from ‘grandparents
and ancestors who won many lands and cities for their liege lords’ —that vivid
memory of the Reconquista, still alive among the petty gentry, which might inspire
occasional flashes of insubordination towards the king, but ultimately through its
very individualism would guard against any wider solidarity at the regional level.
From the ideal of chivalry the path led not towards republicanism based on Granada,
but towards a refashioned feudal axis linking Algarinejo and the court. Lisón’s
daughter married an illegitimate son of the great aristocratic house of Fernández
de Córdoba, and their heir became first marquis of Algarinejo in 1689, gentlemanin-waiting at the courts of Philip IV and Charles II. It was perhaps typical of the
ultimate solidarity of the political elites that the man who represented more than
any other the interests of Olivares and the government in Andalusia in the 1620s,
160
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
Antonio Alvarez de Bohorques, should have stood up in the Cortes of 1623 and
asked his colleagues to support a petition for royal favour for the natural rebel,
Lisón y Biedma.
The bridge between the court and the country was kept open by what one
might call the rambling network of kinship, friendship and patronage among
the aristocracy. But there was always the danger that some of the grandees might
seek to preserve as much as they could of the old feudal order by challenging
the fiscalism of the modern state—that is, by setting themselves up as protectors
of their vassals against levies of troops, billets and taxes. ‘The landowner serves
the king most by the extent to which he defrauds the government rather than by
what he pays in taxes,’ protested the duke of Medinaceli in 1655, ‘because the
latter is of value for only one year, but the former ensures the preservation of
his goods, lands and capital.’ However, as in France at this time, the great families
tended in the end to buckle under the pressure of the court, abandoning their
local allies. ‘The greatest risk which we run,’ the duke of Béjar recognised, ‘is to
think that we can avoid the numerous quarrels and dangers which would inevitably
arise from not doing what His Majesty asks.’63 An illustration of the point came
in the failure of the conspiracy of the duke of Medina Sidonia, so immensely
powerful in the hinterland of Cadiz, who was at daggers drawn with his kinsman
Olivares and minded to follow the example of his brother-in-law, the duke of
Braganza, who proclaimed himself king of an independent Portugal in 1640.
But Medina Sidonia was less resolute and was arrested, forfeiting his ducal capital,
Sanlúcar de Barrameda to the Crown (1645) and losing his near-hereditary post
of Captain General of Andalusia. The Venetian ambassador Soranzo had already
reached the conclusion in 1602 that, in spite of heavy taxes and unrest in the
provinces, general revolt in Spain was unlikely. The grandees would have had
to lead any such movement, but ‘they have no authority with the people, no
fortresses to which to retire, no following, no obedience from their vassals, no
good understanding within their own ranks…’.64
The military power of the aristocracy does, indeed, seem to be in considerable
decline at the time Soranzo penned his comment. True, the seigneurial fortresses
still dotted the landscape of Castile, ‘land of the castles’. These could be grouped
into at least two types. First, there were the medieval towers, often situated on a
hill overlooking the town beneath and serving as a refuge for the population in
time of danger: the hill tower of Cocentaina might serve as an example. But the
actual residence of the count of Cocentaina by the fifteenth century was a fortified
town house, partly incorporated into the walls of the Old Christian quarter and
dominating the Moorish ghetto and the market square nearby. The old castle of
Lerma, standing on its hill, would give way to the new palace in town built by
the duke, favourite of Philip III, in the early seventeenth century. The counts of
Oropesa developed their hilltop fortress in the Toledo region into a fine Renaissance
palace, extending downhill from the old fortifications. The old legend about the
tearing down of towers by the Catholic Kings, as part of the pacification of the
161
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
country in the wake of their triumph in the civil war of 1474–9, seems to have
some basis in fact. The fine castle of Montilla was dismantled in 1508 as a punishment
for its lord’s insubordination, and nearby Valenzuela was also demolished after
a vaguely similar incident. But those nobles who kept out of trouble were allowed
to go quietly on fortifying their residences. The palaces of Los Vélez and of
Calahorra, on the dangerous Granadan frontier, are examples of Renaissance
comfort combined with military security. Not perhaps until the construction of
El Viso by the marquis of Santa Cruz around 1564 do we get a clear statement
of aristocratic confidence in public order—that private fortifications are no longer
necessary, even in this rather exposed wilderness of La Mancha. Nor should we
forget the urban towers—the great palace of the Constable, the duke of Frías, in
Burgos (1483), which was part fortress, or the palace which the count of Benavente
wanted to build in Valladolid (1518). The day that the work was allowed to
proceed, warned the council, ‘on that day Your Highness will make him absolute
master of Valladolid’. But by this time the urban palaces of the aristocracy—that
of the duke of Infantado in Guadalajara or of the duke of Alcalá in Seville (1520)
— increasingly lacked fortifications.65
Some of these houses still bristled with arms. Viciana in 1564 described the
palace of Gandia, with its ‘armoury from which fifty men at arms and 600 arquebusiers
can quickly be fitted out’, while Enrique Cock admired the duke of Infantado’s
arsenal in Guadalajara in 1585, with its 126 harnesses and goodly supply of arquebuses.
Seigneurial levies, as we noted in the last chapter, had been the first real response
to the revolt of the Germanías in 1519–22, as indeed to that of the Comuneros.
But at the same time that war illustrated some of the weaknesses of the feudal
levy, its tendency to disintegrate for lack of pay or food, especially given the
interruption to seigneurial rents during the revolt. The same impression is left by
its activity in the struggle against the rebellious Moriscos of the Alpujarra (1568–
70). Here the great fortresses of Vélez Blanco, of the Alhambra (where the marquis
of Mondéjar held nearly independent sway as the king’s Captain General of Granada),
of Calahorra, and others, were supposed to provide a ring of steel to hold down a
recently conquered kingdom. In fact, the marquises of Mondéjar and Los Vélez—
quite apart from the rivalry between themselves—found it difficult to get troops of
the right calibre to master the insurrection. Discipline in these seigneurial forces
proved a headache, and eventually it was the royal army of Italy, commanded by
the king’s half-brother, Don John of Austria, which carried the day.
One notes from around the time of the Revolt of the Alpujarra an increasing
preoccupation with military security. The Venetian ambassador Donà commented
in 1573 that Spain, since the closure of the frontier with Granada, had allowed
her defences to fall into decay, since she was not directly threatened by any European
power. And it was a similar observation which the soldier-historian Francisco Manuel
de Mello made about the difficulty of mastering the revolt of the Catalans in
1640: ‘there were no carts…there were no horses…we were short of every kind of
ammunition, of planking, pontoon bridges, scouts, tar, pitch, saltpetre, sulphur’.66
162
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
Great efforts had been made, nevertheless, in the interval since 1568 to improve
state defences. Under Philip II a major fortification of the Mediterranean coastline
was undertaken with a view to preventing the incursion of corsairs from the Berber
states. Though some of this work was undertaken by the feudal lords—like the
strong tower at Santa Pola run up by the duke of Maqueda in 1557—it was mainly
subsidised by public taxes and administered by public bodies (in the case of Valencia,
a committee of the viceroy and representatives of the three estates of the realm).
From the time of the sack of Cadiz by the English in 1596, serious efforts were
made to institute trained bands of militia throughout the various kingdoms of the
peninsula, instead of relying on the ad hoc levies raised by towns or feudal lords.
The change may not have been immediately apparent. The trained bands of Sanlúcar
de Barrameda in 1609 comprised 1,612 men under officers wholly or partly nominated
by the local seigneur, the duke of Medina Sidonia. And in Valencia as late as 1648
the forces sent to defend the frontier against the French and Catalans could only
be mobilised through the personal influence of the militia officers with their ‘friends,
vassals and dependants’.67
If the Crown was in some ways assuming more control of the military situation,
by instituting militias and establishing publicly funded coastal fortifications, it
continued to depend for the operation of the system on the goodwill of the local
elites. Olivares found it convenient, as Francisco de Mello tells us, to appoint the
marquis of Los Vélez to command the army against rebellious Catalonia in 1640,
for he was ‘the descendant and heir of the house of…Don Luis de Requesens,
much esteemed as a son of Catalonia, and he kept up ties of kinship, friendship
and marriage with many illustrious houses in that province’.68 Los Vélez had been
viceroy of Valencia shortly before and his subsequent military career was followed
with interest by the natives of that kingdom, who often converted their ex-viceroys
into protectors at court.
Cementing the institution of patronage was the shared culture of chivalry and
religious devotion, explored by Amelang for the Catalan gentry of the seventeenth
century.69 In Valencia the household of Juan de Ribera, the great Counter-Reformation
archbishop of the diocese (1569–1611), grouped a score of young nobles at any
one time, serving him as pages and learning the rudiments of Latin through a
study of the classics (Caesar, Cicero), as well as acquiring a rudimentary acquaintance
with Renaissance humanism (Vives, Nebrija). Here the sons of the old Valencian
families rubbed shoulders with kinsmen of the Castilian nobility from whose ranks
Ribera himself was sprung.70 But it was above all within their own informal meetings
that the nobility was beginning to acquire a new outlook on life, for few were
formally educated beyond the basic instruction in Latin grammar. The Academia
de los Nocturnos (‘the academy of those who met at night-fall’), meeting in Valencia
between 1591 and 1594, brought together men of letters, like the priest-historian
Escolano, jurists (including the austere Tomás Cerdán de Tallada), and cavaliers,
like the dashing and undisciplined Don Gaspar Mercader, later first count of Buñol.
Its purpose was that of the ‘poetic joust’ —to familiarise a ruling elite with the
163
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
peaceful competition of the wit rather than the violent feud of the sword. As its
founder, Bernardo Catalá de Valeriola (1568– 1607) explained in another context:
‘Every kind of emulation is allowed and indulged in in all well-ordered commonwealths,
in order that men inclined to virtue should practise and get better at the things
which they do best.’71
The culture of the class to which Catalá belonged was that of chivalry in a
broad sense. These men had mostly ceased receiving formal tuition at fourteen or
fifteen years of age. But the Count of Buñol, for example, could read Italian and
translated a sonnet of Petrarch. And the great Duke of Alba once recited fifty
lines of Virgil ‘from memory’ to the Master of the Military Order of Montesa,
Don Pedro Luis Galcerán de Borja, who ‘being so well read, took particular note
of it’. The story comes to us from the jurist Tomás Cerdán de Tallada (1604), a
keen advocate of learning for the nobility. Yet the aristocratic experience of life
was mostly of jousting and bullfighting, of courtship and fiesta, and it was this
which found its way into their chief medium of literary expression—the poem.
The poems which they wrote for each other, in the Nocturnos and elsewhere, were
rather artificial constructions, celebrating the hollow victory of the expulsion of
the Moriscos (1609), which left so many of them economically ruined, or the
virtues of the saints (the count of Buñol was particularly active in the cult of the
Immaculate Conception, as well as of the folk saint Mossèn Simó, whom we shall
discuss in Chapter 10). But above all it was the vein of amorous gallantry which
attracted them. One of the most famous members of the Nocturnos was Guillén de
Castro (1569–1631), whose play ‘The Youth of the Cid’ transformed the medieval
epic into an affair of love and honour, which served as the basis for Corneille’s
well-known drama. Castro was a member of the Valencian gentry, serving as a
captain in the coastguards before becoming steward to the duke of Gandia around
1600. By 1619 he moved to Madrid, under the patronage of the duke of Osuna
(who, in spite of his own bankruptcy, set a small estate at his disposal). The life
and culture of the court represented little interruption to the poet, who participated
in the literary ‘jousts’ for the canonisation of Saint Ignatius Loyola in 1621 and
for Saint Isidore (patron of Madrid) in 1622.72 Castro embodied that cosmopolitan
culture of chivalry, now shading off into gallantry and the fantastic, which served
to bind the elites of Habsburg Spain together.
The Orders of chivalry—Santiago, Calatrava, Alcántara—served also to create
a Hispanic elite of specially favoured nobles. Bernardo Catalá de Valeriola tells
us in his diary how he received his knighthood of Calatrava in January 1605, in
the great convent of the order in Castile—a solemn occasion: ‘May God allow me
to carry out the good intentions I that day set forth.’73 Regional patriotism, it is
true, could prove stronger than all these ties. Don Diego de Vich (1584–1657),
knight of Alcántara, has left a splendid diary and other writings through which
we can glimpse the tension between the Valencian elite and the court. A cultivated
man, he pleaded his infirmities and that he was ‘over sixty years of age’ (he was
actually fifty-six) —when the king asked him to help defend Catalonia against the
164
THE CONSOLIDATION OF AN ARISTOCRACY
French in the spring of 1640. Nor could he send a substitute, he said, for his
house had been ruined by the expulsion of its Moorish vassals in 1609 and—
another jibe at mistaken royal policy—he had never been paid the allowance owed
to him as a knight of Alcántara. In fact, at this time he was spending quite impressive
sums on the decoration of his tomb in the convent of Murta. Nor was he reconciled
to the monarchy when the royal aesthete, Philip IV, visiting Valencia in 1645,
agreed to accept a ‘gift’ of one of the Vich family heirlooms, a painting by the
great Sebastián del Piombo, in settlement of the arrears of one of Don Diego’s
ancestors who had administered the royal treasury in Valencia.74
Not everyone, then, sought the honours of the court. The capital itself was,
after all, still so remote. The diary of Bernardo Catalá conveys all the hardship
and peril of a journey which, from Valencia, could take five or six days, with bad
weather and uncertain communications. Once one had got there, the pressure of
business was intense. In 1599, when his fellow Valencian the duke of Lerma had
come to power, Catalá resolved to press on this high-placed patron his claim to
office; but, to make doubly sure, he insisted on his ‘great friend’, Don Martín de
Idiáquez, secretary of state, talking to Lerma, ‘so that it does not slip his mind
with the infinite amount of business which they place on his shoulders’. And,
finally, there was a certain cultural barrier to be overcome. Catalá’s diary was
kept in the Catalan language—until he began to frequent the court and to move
his household to Castile in 1605, after his appointment as corregidor of León. At
this stage, the diary, to all appearances spontaneously and unconsciously, lapses
into Castilian. This cultural transition was symptomatic of a wider process of
integration of provincial elites with the monarchy.
For, in spite of all the differences between court and country, there was an
undeniable attraction exerted upon the minds of the provincial elite by the growing
concentration of literary and artistic talent around the court. Catalá records his
admiration of the great ‘convent of the Jerónimos’, as he called the royal palace of
the Escorial then recently completed (1585), and of the Alcázar of Madrid, ‘with
its very fine paintings’.75 The development of the theatre in the early seventeenth
century would confirm this cultural hegemony of the capital and of the Castilian
language. In the reign of Philip III—particularly after the definitive return of the
court from Valladolid to Madrid in 1606—and then more markedly in that of his
successor, Philip IV (1621–65), the artistic patronage of the monarchy began to
give Spain for the first time a real cultural centre. But if this formation of a new
‘national’ commonwealth depended on the integration of its provincial elites, its
stability required other forms of social and cultural change among the population
at large, which we must now seek to explore.
165
8
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
‘Now that the advance of civilisation has made apparent the rights conferred on all
men by nature and civil society, and the authority of monarchs is sufficiently powerful
to have these respected,’ wrote the Granadan magistrate Sempere y Guarinos in
1805, ‘we can hardly appreciate the cost and true worth of protection of life and
property.’ In the days of the overmighty subject, ‘no one could live at peace without
a godfather’.1
 The contrast could hardly be greater between the time when he wrote
and those far-off days in the fifteenth century when the chronicler Pulgar could
describe the state of Castile thus: ‘Justice was toppled and force reigned supreme,
while more room was found for the harsh temptation of arrogance than for the
humble promptings of obedience.’2
 But the accession of Isabel (1474) seemed to
mark a turning-point. She was ‘the most feared and respected queen that ever was in
the world’, wrote her chronicler Bernáldez, ‘for all the dukes, masters (of the Military
Orders), counts, marquises and great lords feared her and stood in awe…so that
throughout the realm there was peace and justice’. Her work was consolidated by
her successors, notably Philip II, whose achievement attracted the praise of the moral
philosopher Pineda in 1589: ‘a stable lad can ask for his eight reales wages from the
count and a judge will have them paid, and the lad has no cause to fear, whereas a
hundred years ago it would not have been worth his while to go on living on the
face of the earth’.3
Foreign visitors echoed this praise. Barthélemy Joly noted that the law in Castile
‘does not spare the great ones as it does in France’. The Venetian ambassadors,
meanwhile, quite regularly drew attention to the phenomenon in their reports.
Despite their discontent with high taxes, wrote Tiepolo in 1567, the common people
of Castile were not likely to revolt because, among other things, ‘justice was meted
out with equal rigour to the grandees as to any one of themselves’.4
 There was
one blemish on the picture, though: the increasing problem of banditry in the
Mediterranean provinces—Catalonia, Valencia, Aragon. The scourge was becoming
a general one throughout the Mediterranean world at the time, as Braudel once
made plain. Its existence, and indeed the shaky nature of law enforcement in
Castile itself, throws up the question of how far the state was really able to acquire
a monopoly of dispute settlement in the early modern period.
166
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
Anthropologists have made us aware of the difficulty of settling disputes in
small-scale societies, where the subject of the disagreement—the boundary of a
field, perhaps—is either not the real cause of the tension between two parties
or will merely serve to envenom relations between them, passing on a sense of
injury to the next generation. ‘Men may engage in litigation over property
without losing goodwill and becoming alienated from each other,’ wrote the
moral philosopher Camos; but he thought it unlikely. Judges should try to
reconcile parties to a dispute rather than adjudicating, urged Castillo de Bobadilla;
lawsuits were ‘abhorrent’, even though one party might lose its rights.5 The
memoir of the Catalan peasant Sebastià Casanovas (1700–56) gives a fascinating
insight into a world where much property was tied down by commitments to
family and neighbours by agreements which might not be written down, or, if
they were, might be undermined by informal understandings. Sebastià’s father
came back after fighting for the losing side in the War of the Spanish Succession
and sued the local bailiff for the income from his farm during his years of
exile (1716–23). The governor’s court in Girona awarded him 560 Catalan
pounds after a confused hearing, in which the sheer lack of written receipts
led to a reliance on neighbours’ memory of who had paid what to whom.
Getting the award enforced presented other difficulties, as the authorities were
reluctant to indispose the bailiff, and Casanovas himself, with a wary eye on
his own creditors, considered leaving the money with the official as a way of
securing the latter’s benevolence in other matters.6
Law in traditional societies was part of an ongoing regulation of relationships
between individuals, in an age when the anonymous exchange of services through
the market, satisfied by money or credit, did not yet apply. Cerdán de Tallada noted
that law was instituted in order to help men become good. The instructions for the
new viceroy of Valencia in 1566 bade him remember that the administration of
justice was ‘the principal business to which kings and princes and their ministers
ought to pay attention’. His task, therefore, was to see that the citizens ‘enjoy in
peace and quiet their property, and that no one make bold to harm another, rather
that they should treat one another with the love and harmony of Christian people’.7
Like the viceroy, the Castilian corregidor was both a law officer and a general administrator.
Castillo de Bobadilla’s treatise sets out a wide variety of tasks: feeding the poor,
maintaining public works, fixing prices on the market, checking on the quality of
goods. It was all part of the ideal of a Christian commonwealth, regulated by laws,
which were themselves only statements of broader moral principles. The great law
code of Castile, the Nueva Recopilación, published originally in 1567 and reissued in
1640, reflects the all-embracing nature of law, in which administration, morality
and adjudication seem to be gathered together in a way which leaves little room for
that separation between public and private space characteristic of a modern society.
At the base of the pyramid stood the elected village or town justices—the alcaldes,
as they were known in Castile—a mixture of mayor and justice of the peace. Above
them were the district governors, the corregidores of Castile, from whom appeals
167
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
lay to the high courts—the Chancillerías of Valladolid and Granada, and the more
localised Audiencia of Seville. The autonomous kingdoms of the Crown of Aragon
had each their separate Audiencia—in Zaragoza, Barcelona, Valencia—whose magistrates
had to be native sons. Adjudication was basically ‘popular’, or at least assumed to
be so. Calderón’s great drama The Mayor of Zalamea portrays the elected justice, a
wealthy peasant, in all his dignity. And Castillo de Bobadilla suggested that even
the corregidor—not necessarily a trained lawyer—might give judgement without a
qualified assessor, at least in smaller towns: ‘For the fairness of his proceeding
may make up for any defect of formality in a judgement made without consultation
with a lawyer.’ Peasant alcaldes, though often ‘unlettered men’, judging by ‘natural
reason’, were capable of giving ‘just decisions’. However, the corregidor would be
well-advised to consult as widely as possible before making up his own mind —
among the ‘senior and most level-headed aldermen’, or ‘some friar of good life
and learning’.8
The description of court-rooms of old by Castillo de Bobadilla—‘as much confusion
and shouting as you would find in the shambles’ —tends to emphasise the impression
of informality. But the great jurist noted in his own day (1597) that the imposition
of attorneys (procuradores) on the parties to litigation before the corregidor or audiencias
had calmed matters, for they had to submit allegations in writing. One notes an
increasing concern with the formalisation of procedures. The royal visitor or inspector
of the government of Valencia expressed his disquiet in 1635 with the referral of
cases by the local justices to the assembly of heads of household for decision: ‘a
collection of peasants, who must inevitably be kinsmen or friends of the accused
in smaller communities, have absolute discretion, and no one can ask them to
explain their judgement’. He affirmed that he could now understand why banditry
was so prevalent in Valencia. Though the assessors of the municipal courts—usually
notaries—were supposed to appeal against unjust acquittals, there were never enough
of them, or they were themselves barely qualified in the law.9
There was increasing concern in some quarters during the sixteenth century
that adjudication was becoming excessively professionalised—removed from the hands
of village authorities who alone knew the real circumstances of the case and taken
on appeal to remote, costly and oppressive tribunals. The instructions for the Valencian
viceroy in 1566 bade him stop the trend, which was becoming a matter of concern
to the parliaments. And the Cortes of Castile were trying to prevent disputes over
property worth less than a certain sum being taken on appeal from the locality: the
old threshold of 10,000 maravedís—equivalent to perhaps a year’s wages for an unskilled
labourer—was pushed up to 20,000 in 1604 and then 30,000 in 1632. This was part
of the general move at this time to restore the rural economy—to prevent what the
reforming writer Lope de Deza denounced in 1618 as the wastage of peasant resources
on lawsuits. ‘Fearful and envious of their neighbours’, rustics were being induced
by lawyers to pursue their vendettas through the courts. Let them at least accept the
arbitration of their elected alcalde, if possible without paperwork and on rainy days
only, when work was impossible in the fields.10
168
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
Paradoxically, the sale of jurisdictional autonomy, to small towns as well as to
feudal lords, so characteristic of the later sixteenth and seventeenth centuries,
was making this informal arbitration less possible. As a memorial to the Junta of
Reform explained around 1623, in the old days the village alcaldes had been able
to ‘reconcile neighbours and nip litigation in the bud’, because it was so easy to
refer troublesome parties, blinded by ‘prejudice or hatred’, for a definitive ruling
to the corregidor in the next big town. But now, ‘with any and every lawsuit they
go on appeal to the chancillerías’. Liberty was a good thing, affirmed Castillo de
Bobadilla, and the autonomy of villages had sometimes been justified by their
remoteness from the nearest corregidor. However, ‘I am of the opinion,’ he was
forced to conclude, that ‘the abuse of exempting villages is one of the things that
most requires reform in these kingdoms’, for it led to more litigation, not less,
and, rather than helping the citizen, the main reason for the concessions ‘has
been and is that the kings need money’. There was a particular problem with
seigneurial immunities. Absentee lords were leaving their authority in the hands
of ‘their household retainers, men who manage business in a very devious fashion,
so that they can get money from the public purse, and gifts and presents from
litigants’.11
In spite of the concerns of Lope de Deza and others, it seems clear that the bulk of
litigation had to be settled locally in the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries, with
the audiencias exercising only a very loose kind of supervision. Cases taken on appeal
rarely received a definitive judgement in these superior tribunals, bogged down as
they were by an excess of paperwork and a paucity of magistrates —‘the cemetery of
the living’, as the chronicler Escolano called them in 1610. ‘The proverb says, “let my
friend draw up the documents, then it hardly matters who the judge is”.’ Castillo de
Bobadilla was referring here to the rambling network of attorneys and notaries who
were actually responsible for assembling the pieces which might be used in litigation,
including the información de testigos, the ‘statements of witnesses’, which were used fundamentally
as moves in a game of nerves designed to reduce the other side to desist or compromise.
There were five notaries in the peasant community of Llombai, with its 600 households,
noted the steward of the estate in 1756: ‘rather a lot for such a small place, and since
they have no other means of subsistence, they get people to sign agreements’ — depriving
him, as chief magistrate, of the responsibility of adjudication.12 The feudal lords should
not auction off the post of notary on their estates, commented Castillo de Bobadilla,
for these men are driven to fraud and extortion in order to get by. No theme was
perhaps more common in the centuries of the early modern period than the complaint
about the poor quality and excessive powers of the notary. Like pharmacists dealing
in poison, thought Castillo de Bobadilla, they needed to be men of breeding and
confidence. But now, complained the Cortes of 1579–82, they have become so numerous
that they are of suspect lineage, ‘and many have been traders and worked with their
hands’.13
One might conclude, from this brief survey, that the formal process of law in
Spain was much less impressive in practice than the ordered hierarchy of tribunals
169
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
might lead one to think. The role of written documentation in a pre-industrial society
is somewhat problematic anyway, as the letter of the contract is liable to be modified
by tacit arrangements between the parties, who typically know each other through
ongoing relationships as members of the same small group of friends, kin, neighbours
or clients. This consideration is what lies behind the denunciations of mohatras—
fictitious sales—in early modern Spain. Thus, the Cortes of 1586–8 complained that
peasants were being persuaded to sell land or catte to powerful people for only half
what the goods were worth, on the understanding that they would be allowed to
continue using them for a certain period.14 Such agreements may lead to extortion
and misunderstandings later, as anthropologists point out, if the original patron—
client relationship sours, and moral and legal ownership come into conflict. This
ambiguity was, indeed, one of the causes of the latent violence which was never far
below the surface in pre-industrial communities. The problem was compounded by
the loss of memory typical of an age which relied so much on oral tradition. There
were, indeed, written records. But, as the Cortes of Castile and Valencia reiterated
time and again, the archiving of court and notarial records was very imperfect. The
Castilian parliament of 1579–82, for example, wanted the papers of notaries who
had died to be placed with the local justices for safeguard and ease of reference. But
tracking down documentation remained an adventure—a costly, time-consuming business
of going from place to place in person, and then copying out laboriously by hand
the precious icon (whose authenticity and relevance to the dispute in question were
sometimes questionable). The faith in the document—any document—seems to increase
the more illiterate the society.
Castillo de Bobadilla referred to the great risk of dispute over boundaries of
fields, in an age when so much land was ill-surveyed and often given over to
rough pasture. Litigation on this subject was possibly the main source of tension
in pre-industrial Spain. As one year follows the next, wrote the great jurist, one
forgets ‘how one of the villagers ploughed up part of the common lands, how an
outsider got hold of a piece of the royal demesne, and how a regidor…took bits for
himself. In the less-policed areas conflicts of memory were liable to take violent
forms. It had been 162 years, complained the Valencian hill town of Alpuente in
1645, that she had been contesting her boundary with the lordship of Chelva.
‘Every day’ the field guards from Chelva confiscated her cattle pasturing on the
disputed range, forcing her to take matters into her own hands ‘and make good
the annoyance’. Not too far away there was a similar, long-running feud between
Carlet and Alcudia over pasture rights. When the count of Carlet seized cattle
which had come into his territory around 1618, the lord of Alcudia impounded
some horses belonging to the count’s peasants. Thereupon the latter gathered a
gang of a dozen masked men who attacked the hostelry in Alcudia, freed the
horses and wounded one of the inhabitants in the process.15
The most spectacular example of this kind of range war was the conflict between
the so-called ‘mountain men’ and the Moriscos in the Aragon of the 1580s. The
peasants of the Pyrenees had traditionally taken their flocks to winter in the lowlands,
170
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
along the banks of the River Ebro, where the converted Muslims formed a large
part of the farming population. No love was lost between the two communities
anyway, but with population rising in the region by about 50 per cent over the
sixteenth century, pressure on the available land must have become acute. In any
case, when a Morisco killed one of the mountain transhumants in 1585, the latter
sacked one village (Codo), from which most of the inhabitants had fled, and massacred
between 300 and 400 men, women and children in another (Pina). The fighting
coincided with the struggle for possession of the Pyrenean county of Ribagorza
between the duke of Villahermosa and his peasants, to which we alluded briefly
in Chapter 5. Men of violence were used (or it was hoped they could be used) on
one side or the other—the Catalan bandit El Minyó (‘The Kid’), fresh from his
capture of the king’s treasure on its way to Barcelona in 1587, on behalf of the
rebels, while the mountain men, after their exploits against the Moriscos, were
invited to help the duke. The lawlessness became so worrying that Philip II sought
to impose a non-native viceroy on Aragon, setting in train a complex series of
confrontations with the Aragonese elites which ended with the sending in of a
small royal army in 1591.16
Ribagorza was not particularly valuable to the duke in economic terms, but
it was a mainstay of his prestige. One of the difficulties in adjudicating disputes
in the Old Regime was the loss of face, the dishonour, of having to concede
ground to an adversary. The separation between private and public life which
has taken place in modern times was something foreign to the outlook of our
ancestors. The diary of the vice-chancellor of the Council of Aragon, Don
Cristóbal Crespí de Valldaura (1599–1672), gives a vivid insight into the ‘theatre
of power’ —the aura of magnificence and prestige which leaders needed to maintain
if they were to get obedience. On a week’s retreat around Christmas 1653 in
the quiet of the Carthusian monastery of Segovia, Crespí felt the need to justify
to his diary his decision to take a back seat in the choir and refectory: ‘It
seemed to me that it inferred no slight on my office, since I was there as a
private individual.’ But otherwise his relentless inventory of who sat where
and who accompanied whom to the door at audiences occupied much of his
time and energy, in spite of his own manifest piety: ‘God free our hearts from
these vanities,’ he wrote, ‘so that this maintenance of the authority of office
may be only what is necessary for the good administration of justice.’17 Meanwhile,
when the marquis of Almenara had gone to Zaragoza as Philip II’s envoy in
1588 to seek a change of the rule against non-native viceroys, the splendour
of his household advertised his authority—‘many servants well fitted out’, as
the chronicler Argensola noted, ‘his halls adorned with very rich tapestries,
keeping open house for anyone who wished to eat at his table’. Correspondingly,
his enemies made it ‘a point of honour not to visit him’.18
If ‘honour’ —visible, publicly acknowledged respect—was one weapon in the
arsenal of authority in the Old Regime, it was also peculiarly unstable and likely
to disturb the hierarchy it was meant to uphold. ‘There is no thing more esteemed
171
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
than good reputation and honour,’ affirmed Castillo de Bobadilla, ‘for men hold
it higher than life and wealth.’ And he went on to warn the corregidor that much
would be pardoned him in the exercise of power if he acted with courtesy, whereas
he would never be forgiven for harsh language and insult. ‘If some of the regidores
begin to contradict each other with insulting language and are in open conflict,
let the corregidor immediately intervene…ordering them to hold their peace on
penalty of grave sanctions.’ Indeed, he may well suspend the session there and
then: ‘for failure to put out a spark, a city has been known to burn down’.19
In small-scale communities disagreements over one issue were liable to generate
wider resentment over an implied attack on one’s good faith, and this public loss
of face would require reparation. The cloth-merchant Jeroni Soria recorded in his
diary in 1529 how the attorney handling his mother-in-law’s estate had demanded
to meet him ‘with a cape and a sword’, just outside the gates of Valencia, in order
to settle a dispute over the inheritance. Though Soria wrote back that he was
surprised at a man of law challenging anyone to a duel, he was forced to demonstrate
his courage by turning up at the rendezvous, where the two men slashed at each
other for half an hour, until the wounds were judged sufficient to establish the
honour of both sides. The nobility, of course, had fewer scruples about taking to
the sword. Joanot Martorell (1413–68), author of the classic novel of chivalry
Tirant lo Blanc, would issue challenges of this kind to opponents, damning resort
to law as ‘not something for knights and gentlemen, but only for women and men
of the robe, whose whole defence lies in the pen and in their tongue’.20
This attitude was sometimes condemned as hubris—the prompting of the Devil,
‘the enemy of human kind’, as the jurats of Valencia described one vendetta of
1381. A magistrate like Castillo de Bobadilla took up the theme in his work of
1597: feuds were the work of the Devil, fostering an arrogance which would brook
no impediment.21 But the violence of everyday life perhaps assisted the powers of
darkness. The Jesuit missionary Pedro de León noted how in the Seville of the
1600s ‘it was the custom on Sundays and holidays for crowds of youths to gather
outside the Macarena and Cordoba gates and, divided into two gangs, to stone
each other’. Ruffians would bring along swords in order to settle scores in the
general mêlée. Around the same time in Valencia Escolano was describing the
pastimes of the youth, who ‘have barely learnt to swing their arms when they
head for the river on a summer’s day and, split into rival gangs…give battle with
slings and stones’. Sometimes the high spirits got out of hand—especially since
‘youngsters of fifteen or sixteen may be wearing a sword and can shoot’ —so that
the jurats might have to intervene and stop the contest.22 One of the most famous
examples of these rough games concerns the nobility of the capital of the sherry
country, Jerez de la Frontera. They would form into two bandos, the Villavicencio
resplendent in red and white, the Dávila in purple and yellow, and charge on
horseback from opposite ends of the main square, hurling reed lances or cañas at
each other. A fatality in 1597 led to an investigation which condemned the irresponsibility
of manoeuvring on horseback in such a confined space, with so few rules.23
172
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
‘Being brought up in isolated farmsteads set among woodland and scrub…
produces a fierceness of temperament,’ wrote Gilabert in 1616 of his fellow Catalans,
which made them ‘impatient when thwarted.’ A century before, the famous Guicciardini,
travelling through Catalonia in the winter of 1512, remarked how bandit-ridden
this part of the peninsula was: one factor was ‘the lie of the land, for the region
is…mountainous, savage and underpopulated’.24 In Castile too at this time it was
the open, empty steppe of La Mancha, together with the mountain passes from
Castile to Andalusia, which tended to be the hardest to police. ‘The mountain
people are like the land where they are reared,’ wrote Argensola in 1608 of the
outlaws of his native Aragon, ‘tough men, used to hard work, but prone to disturbances
and rebellions, implacable in their outbursts of anger and feuding.’25
But it was the old customs of the nobility which posed the greatest threat. The
early modern state needed the feudal warrior less and the improving landlord
more. Urging that the violent marquis of Guadalest be not allowed to return to
his native Valencia, the Council of Aragon suggested in 1641 that ‘since this gentleman
shows spirit and daring’ he should be employed abroad, preferably as a soldier.
One cannot help feeling that the great duke of Osuna (1579–1624), a pugnacious
defender of Spanish interests as viceroy of Naples, presented similar problems
when a young man. In 1602 he escaped from house arrest, along with ‘the goodfor-nothings with whom he usually consorted’.26
Gilabert believed that the Catalan nobility presented more of a challenge to
public order than the Castilian because they had not yet learned to study law
and compete for bureaucratic office to the same extent. A memorial of 1632
denounced their idleness in a changing world: ‘they are brought up without
religious instruction or letters…learning only how to use a pistol’. But there
was a further problem, to which Gilabert drew attention: the sheer lack of offices
at the Crown’s disposal in Catalonia suitable for a gentleman, especially since
the king lived in Castile and appointed mainly Castilians to his own household.27
It was, indeed, not just a Catalan problem. Power in the Old Regime resided in
magnificence and in patronage—in the ability to command resources and influence
out of which one could build up and reward a following. All men need friends,
proclaimed Castillo de Bobadilla, ‘for they are the sturdiest pillars and supports
for the maintenance and increase [of authority]’. The corregidor had to be very
careful to keep an even hand in supervising elections to local office and in the
distribution of seating and processional rank in public celebrations. There was
no town or village, he noted, ‘which is not divided into factions and parties
(bandos) and opposing leagues’, and the corregidor would need all his wits in order
to manouevre between them and prevent violence.28
The danger of confrontation between such groups motivated the intervention
of the Crown, especially in the aftermath of the civil wars of the fifteenth century.
Ferdinand and Isabel wrote to the town councillors of Jerez in 1492, expressing
their displeasure that ‘you have built up a following among officials and citizens,
who come to your door on holidays and take your side in disputes’. These clients
173
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
were abandoning ‘jobs and farms’ and living at their patron’s expense, giving rise
to ‘disturbances and scandals’. A law of 1493, repeated in the codes of 1567 and
1640, forbade throughout Castile such men living ‘in a permanent way with regidores
and knights as their familiars or men who share their table’, or ‘accompanying
them when they have a quarrel and escorting them with arms’. A further decree of
1500 prohibited members of a particular faction or bando in the Basque Country,
Galicia or Asturias from assembling in strength at weddings or funerals.29 At first
sight these factions seem so vaguely defined that the laws must have been difficult
to enforce. Certainly the reformer López Bravo was still complaining in 1616
about the problem of wastrels—badly brought up nobles who were poor but yet
too proud to work, who found refuge in the houses of the powerful ‘as pimps and
bullies’.30 These were the kind of men with whom the great duke of Osuna had
allegedly been surrounding himself not long before.
But it was, inevitably, in the mountainous and less-policed territories of the
Crown of Aragon that the problem was by then worst. ‘Most of the knights live in
their villages, which are so small and badly walled that four ruffians can easily
break in,’ commented Gilabert of his fellow Catalans in 1616, ‘and they need to
keep armed men in order to defend themselves.’31 But this was a vicious circle, as
the author tacitly acknowledged: so many gangsters roaming around made selfdefence imperative. Guicciardini, commenting on the insecurity of the roads in
the region in 1512, noted that ‘the cause of this disorder lies in the fact that many
knights and gentlemen of Catalonia are at daggers drawn and keep up continual
wars with one another’. According to a long-established privilege a noble could
attack his enemy after five days’ warning. ‘It is customary also…that all the kin
take part in the quarrels, and…when they exhaust their strength, they turn to the
local ruffians.’ An Andalusian noble like the essayist Luis Zapata (1532–98?) found
it bizarre, as he surveyed the feuds of Catalonia, Valencia and Aragon, ‘that if
they cannot avenge themselves on the one who caused the offence, they will kill
his kinsman, his son, his wife, even his dog or horse’.32 In these small-scale communities,
rather locked in on themselves and lacking the Castilian ease of access to an imperial
world, the memory of a wrong was carefully nourished and passed on from generation
to generation. The Valencian diarist and later corregidor of León, Don Bernardo
Catalá de Valeriola, was thus heir to an old memorandum drawn up by his grandfather
of those who had fought for his family against the Peñarroja. Imposing the norms
of ordered government on such a society was likely to be particularly troublesome.
It was, in fact, the rambling network of obligations to friends and family—part of
the maintenance of one’s own honour—which made quarrels often intractable. The
career of the noble bandit Lupercio de Latrás may illustrate the way violence was
liable to spread, moving in the process from feuding to robbery. Latrás was born
around 1550/1560, the younger son of the lord of Latrás, a hamlet of the high
Pyrenees near Jaca in Aragon. An obscure affray between two factions in the local
market town of Hecho left a man dead and Lupercio a refugee in France with a
price on his head (1579). The young man now gathered a gang together to force the
174
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
Hecho authorities to ‘come to terms’ (dar paz), as he put it, only to be confronted by
a posse from the royal town of Jaca. The latter took advantage of the situation to
lay waste the lordship of Latrás, with which it had had boundary disputes in the
past, despite the protests of Lupercio’s elder brother, who was not directly involved
in the dispute. From his hideout in the impenetrable Pyrenees, Lupercio waylaid
traders and travellers to Jaca, using the proceeds to keep his ten to twenty followers
happy, until the Crown was forced to offer him an amnesty on condition he enlist
in the army of Italy (1582). But following an affair of honour with a brother officer,
he was transferred to the army of Flanders, only to be shipwrecked in transit off the
Spanish coast in the fateful year of 1588. Taking advantage of the disturbances
then raging in Aragon between the duke of Villahermosa and his vassals of Ribagorza
(see above, p. 107), Latrás offered his services to the former, but was then captured
and executed after the duke surrendered the fief to the Crown.33
Violence was intermittent; but contemporaries noted that the threat was never
far away, because so many gentlemen kept armed followers, particularly in the
Crown of Aragon, hoping to intimidate their opponents. While they lived with
their patron the gangsters were under some sort of control, commented Gilabert,
but when they left, ‘used to a life of ease, they take to the gun rather than the
spade in order to make a living’.34 The power struggles in Catalonia, like those in
Aragon, gave them their opportunity. There was a running feud between the bishops
of Vic and their undisciplined cathedral chapter, with armed men breaking into
the episcopal palace on the eve of Palm Sunday 1580, forcing the government to
transfer the prelate to another see shortly afterwards. But his successor had no
better luck. The assassination of the archdeacon (1600) sparked a wave of retaliatory
killings. We begin to get increasing reference about this time to the two great
factions, the Nyerros and the Cadells, which appear to dominate much of the history
of Catalonia for the next couple of generations. Judges, nobles, peasants, clerics
were all accused of belonging to one or other of these nebulous groupings. Whether
they existed in any concrete form seems doubtful, but they provided a brush with
which to smear one’s opponent and to justify hatreds, on the assumption that one
could never obtain justice through the ordinary channels. The peasants of Ripoll,
demanding restoration to the royal domain in 1609–11, accused the abbot, their
feudal lord, of keeping a band of Nyerros to overawe them. This was the faction
associated with the canons of the cathedral chapter of Vic, so that the bishop was
alleged to be sheltering Cadells in his palace.35
It was in this feud that one of the most famous Catalan bandits, Rocaguinarda,
won his spurs, as a Nyerro, implicated in attacks on the bishop. Born the younger
son of wealthy peasants in Vic in 1582, Perot Rocaguinarda was forced to take to
his heels after the killings which followed the assassination of the archdeacon in
1600. Cervantes left an endearing portrait of the young rebel, who encountered
Don Quixote on his way to Barcelona (1614). ‘I am by nature compassionate and
well-intentioned, but…in seeking to avenge a wrong done to me, I saw all my
good intentions fall away…One false step leads to the next, one sin to another;
175
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
just so, one act of revenge feeds into another, and I find myself now fighting other
people’s battles as well as my own.’ In order to subsist in the hills he must steal—
as little as possible, of course, and only in order ‘to satisfy this gang which follows
me’.36
The link between economic conditions and banditry was complex. Macanaz,
the commissioner charged with the reform of the government of Valencia after
1707, was one who saw a connection. ‘The lords in this province levy such exorbitant
taxes and tribute from many of their vassals,’ he wrote, ‘that they reduce them
from free men to slaves or make it so hopeless for them to farm the land that they
drive them to rob on the highways.’ In Castile as well growing poverty during the
seventeenth century was blamed by the chronicler Barrionuevo in the 1650s for
outbreaks of thieving; and he pointed to the main road to Andalusia where gangs
of over twenty waylaid travellers. Travelling from Ecija to Cordoba in 1687 the
merchant Lantery thought it best to join a party of nine armed with shotguns,
given the risk of banditry.37
In a sense it was not simply poverty but the opportunities of preying on increased
trade which fostered highway robbery in this period. The transfer of the king’s
silver to the Genoese bankers for the war in Flanders had to be effected from the
1570s, given the dangers of the Atlantic, via the port of Barcelona. But the mule
trains had to cross the ill-policed territory of Catalonia, where they were ambushed
on at least two occasions, in 1587 and 1613. The viceroy reported on the parallel
growth of counterfeiting—a scourge since copper coins had been introduced in
1587 to cater to the needs of petty trade. Valencia was suffering from a similar
growth of counterfeiting at this time. But the more serious problem there was an
epidemic of smuggling, of raw silk across the customs frontier with Castile. The
towns of Alzira, Carcaixent, Algemesí and others, in the valley of the Xúquer,
where most of the mulberry was grown, were full of armed men anyway, engaged
in bitter feuds. Robbery of the leaf and the export of raw silk to Toledo were
undertaken by gangs ‘armed with shotguns, crossbows and the like, riding by
night or at other unwonted times along unfrequented paths’.38 Lack of respect for
the law was perhaps as important an ingredient in all this as the use of physical
force itself. The royal commissioner in Alicante around 1640 found it impossible
to enforce the contraband regulations against those countries like The Netherlands
and France with which Spain was then at war, and he denounced the complicity
of merchants with native-born ministers of the Crown. Lantery, merchant of Cadiz,
recalled in his memoirs of 1673–1700 with what great reluctance the governor,
Don Diego Caballero de Yllescas, would apply the law against smugglers. Give
‘this wretched tell-tale’ his share of the condemned cargo, he would bellow in
open court, ‘pointing him out with his baton so that everybody would know who
it was’. Informers had a short life, ‘if they did not get out of Cadiz quickly’.39
The enforcement of law, then, had to take account of a culture where the sense
of honour and friendship might dictate a line of conduct at variance with that of
the public weal. The long survival of the idea of a crime as being fundamentally
176
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
a hurt inflicted on another party rather than a challenge to good order reflects
another aspect of the same phenomenon. The great Castilian law code of the
thirteenth century, the Siete Partidas, retained the idea of the duel as a useful deterrent
to underhand conduct by the nobility, though in other respects it was seeking to
impose the rational adjudication of disputes by a qualified judge. Its Valencian
counterpart, the Furs, though heavily influenced by the Roman idea of the lawgiver
and peacemaker, maintained the right of the nobles ‘and other honoured persons
who do not work with their hands’ to issue a challenge to those who had allegedly
offended them, so long as the two sides were evenly matched in status and physique.
Castile moved more quickly than the Crown of Aragon to limit this freedom, it is
true. Alfonso XI (1312–50) affirmed that the king would have to approve all such
duels, ‘for so great is the power of the king that he holds all business and all
privileges in his own hand, and he does not derive his power from men but from
God’. Isabel tried to outlaw duelling altogether in 1480, on pain of forfeiture of
one’s property, though allowing a felon, if legitimately challenged and failing to
turn up to court within a month to clear his name, to be hunted down by his
challenger. In the Crown of Aragon the right to private vengeance was more sturdily
maintained by the parliaments throughout the sixteenth century.
But the influence of the church, which clearly outlawed the duel at the Council
of Trent (1563), may have been the decisive factor in its ultimate demise. All
Valencians must remember that they are brothers, decreed King Peter IV (1336–
87), as he tried to limit the feud, ‘brought to a new life by the one father, creator
and redeemer, through one mother, the church’. The ritual of peace-keeping assumed
great significance, in Spain as in other parts of Europe, in that popular expression
of late medieval piety, the confraternity. That of Nuestra Señora de la Antigua
(Zamora) ruled in 1566 that if one member offended another, ‘the aggressor is to
ask pardon from the entire council and the injured one, and to be friends’.40 Duels
were ‘a plague and a pest gnawing at the heart of the commonwealth’, thought the
chronicler and priest Escolano in 1610. And sainthood was often associated with
the peace movement, as in the case of the great fifteenth-century Valencian Dominican,
Vicente Ferrer, or the sixteenth-century Andalusian, John of God, graphically represented
in his famous hospital for the poor in Granada reconciling the warring factions.
The Jesuit preacher Pedro de León (1578–1616) has left us a vivid account of the
reconciliations between enemies which he effected in the course of his missions
through the countryside of Andalusia. Some were persuaded through the confessional,
others, ‘as they came out after the sermon, would throw their arms round those
they had offended: “it is no time to do anything else; the fathers tell us that if we
do not forgive each other, God will not forgive us”’.41
Whatever the immediate success of such missions, they could not always outweigh
the claims of honour. ‘Since I am not a saint but a sinner, I trust more to the
mercy of God than to my own works,’ affirmed the Seville nobleman and memoirwriter
Don Alonso Enríquez de Guzmán (1518–43). Though aware that vengeance was
prohibited by ‘our holy Catholic faith’, Don Alonso believed that God was more
177
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
likely to forgive the ‘heat of passion’ than the underhandedness of malice.42 In
actual fact, he demonstrated in the course of his autobiography the crucial role of
intermediaries as a factor limiting the violence. Typically a celibate clergy—like
Vicente Ferrer or Pedro de León—could fulfil this role very well, of ‘imposing’ a
reconciliation by virtue of their moral authority, without public loss of face by
either of the contending parties. But Don Alonso seems to have relied more on
powerful patrons, men of whose friendship he stood in need or whose enmity he
could ill afford to provoke. The important thing was to stand one’s ground, to
show that one had the courage to stand up to an opponent, then to defer to the
‘moral authority’ of a great man—whose influence could be almost visibly measured
in terms of the gratitude of his reconciled following. Thus, Don Alonso fell into
dependence on the marquis of Ayamonte—‘I sent him presents and he did favours
for me.’ But the relationship was somewhat delicate, since Ayamonte was suspected
of favouring the other side. The business of reconciling feuds was a complex strategy
and, if it went wrong, was liable to spread dissatisfaction even further. It was
perhaps this latent tension at the heart of so many relationships, rather than the
outright violence of the duel or the ambush, that shaped the ambivalent attitudes
of so many towards the intervention of the state in their quarrels.
That intervention built itself up gradually. Since it might be counterproductive
to take sides, a favourite recourse when trouble threatened was to impose a ‘truce’.
In Jerez in 1436 the justices tried to pacify two quarrelling aldermen, asking them
formally, ‘for the service of God and of the king our lord, and for the well-being,
peace and quiet of this city, and out of respect for the justices, that they might
deign to forgive each other’. But when one refused outright, he was confined to
his house and a truce of two months imposed anyway.43 These truces were a safeguard
against violence, because any breach caused an aggravated offence—an attack not
on the person of one’s opponent but now on the public good. Anyone who kills,
wounds or takes another captive during a time of truce,’ ran the old Castilian law,
still reissued in 1640, ‘let him die the death of a traitor.’
But the Valencian parliament of 1552 complained that the Crown had begun
compelling all parties which issued challenges to come before the courts and sign
these letters of safeguard—of ‘peace and truce’. But these were supposed to be
voluntary agreements, unless there was some ‘urgent or compelling cause’, which
too often there was not.44
Conciliation was a fundamental aspect of the administration of justice in those
days. Writing around 1620 to his brother-in-law, governor of Milan, the duke of
Sessa pleaded for clemency for a certain prisoner. His aim, he affirmed, was not
to interfere with the law—‘for that would be to presume overmuch on your friendship
and kinship with me’. But he drew the governor’s attention to the honourable
standing of the accused’s family: ‘when the punishment of a culprit will spread to
many who are not guilty, but who are related to him by blood, it is most convenient
that the judge remit much of the penalty’.45 In practical terms it was often necessary
to pardon the bandits of the Crown of Aragon in order to get them to come down
178
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
from the hills. Thus Rocaguinarda, and Latrás earlier, were offered amnesties on
condition of service in the army, a proceeding which had at least the advantage of
removing them from the network of local friendships and enmities in which they
flourished. A variant on this system was the offer of release of prisoners to their
kinsmen who gave information relating to even more horrific crimes. Thus, the
Audiencia of Valencia promised freedom for any two prisoners under sentence of
death for help in tracking down the killers of the Admiral of Aragon in 1627.
There was, after all, a general feeling that crimes were particular offences against
specific individuals, and that the commonwealth would not be the loser if the
parties were able to reach an accommodation between themselves. The Cortes of
1584, for example, made a ‘charitable donation’ to a lady of Toledo in order for
her husband to negotiate a pardon from the family of a man he had murdered.
And the parents of the great playwright Pedro Calderón de la Barca (1600–81)
had had to pay out 600 ducats in order to secure his pardon after a brawl in which
he was involved in his student days at Salamanca, in which a man died.46
Such attitudes were becoming less common in the early modern period, as
the state sought to acquire for itself a special role as guardian of the peace.
Castillo de Bobadilla agreed that there was a difference between offences which
were mainly directed against a private party and which could therefore be pardoned
by the latter, and those which represented a more general affront to public welfare.
But he counselled the corregidor to ignore the distinction and to pursue all wrongdoing, even where the injured party was reluctant to press charges. His contemporary,
the jurist Cerdán de Tallada, meanwhile deplored the custom in Valencia which
left it to the discretion of the victim as to whether he prosecuted an attacker in
a street brawl through the courts or not. He urged the magistrate to take action
ex officio in all cases.47 The developing concept of the ‘public weal’ was a slow
construction, built up in an empirical and often untidy way from the Middle
Ages onwards. We have alluded already to the special retribution reserved for
someone who attacked another during a period of truce. The Furs of Valencia
still proclaimed the death penalty in 1580, in similar fashion, for the treacherous
act of wounding a man ‘on Good Friday or other days of great devotion’. And a
fourteenth-century Castilian law, reissued in the code of 1640, put the highways
—‘like that which leads to Santiago, or goes from one town to its neighbour, or
runs to a market or fair’—under the protection of the king, so that an offence
committed on these attracted a fine in addition to whatever punishment was
incurred by the act itself.
This gradual carving out of privileged space—special days, sacred places — gradually
familiarised the citizen with the notion of a common good superior to his own
private grievances against an opponent. Perhaps the most significant feature of
this educative process was the increasing restrictions placed on the use of weapons.
There had long been limitations on their handling inside city walls and during
hours of darkness as precautionary measures. Thus it was the task of the local
constable to see that the church bell was tolled every night for an hour—at nine in
179
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
winter, ten in summer, according to Castillo de Bobadilla—in order to give country
folk returning from the fields and travellers due notice of the ‘curfew’ which was
approaching. During curfew the constable had increased rights of disarming passersby, even those bearing traditional weapons like a sword if the circumstances were
deemed suspicious (such as that the man was not carrying a lantern). Castillo de
Bobadilla devoted much space to discussing the problem of who could be allowed
to bear arms unchallenged. Muleteers clearly needed cutting weapons, and though
any group of three armed individuals might be held to constitute a threat to public
order, the constable would be well-advised not to question them if they were standing
in front of the house of one of their number, taking the air. One senses here the
slow evolution of the idea that bearing arms was a privilege, not an automatic
right. Travellers were allowed to carry guns, but magistrates were insisting that
these must be unloaded at the entrance to their town. Castillo de Bobadilla’s list
of those who could normally carry weapons of all kinds, whether by day or night,
in built-up areas as well as in the countryside, was fairly restrictive: knights of the
Military Orders (but not ordinary nobles) and public officials. Hence, perhaps,
the increasing popularity in the seventeenth century of posts in the local militia
or revenue collection (tax-farmers claimed a royal privilege of 1574 allowing them
to go armed even at night, as a precaution against smugglers) or Inquisition.48
The development of the gun was making the new restrictions all the more
necessary. Particular concern was shown at the flintlock mechanism (pedreñal),
which meant that from the later sixteenth century ordinary citizens could carry
on their persons a deadly weapon, no longer requiring the length of match needed
to ignite the cumbersome arquebus of old. Already in 1563 the government decreed
that the use of a firearm constituted an aggravation of any assault, entailing confiscation
of all one’s property. Laws dealing with guns speak of them as a ‘treacherous’
(alevoso) or ‘cowardly’ weapon, particularly the flintlocks going on sale now with
a barrel shorter than four ‘palms’ (about 84 centimetres), which could be concealed
under the cloak. The Valencian authorities originally banned guns under three
‘palms’ in length, but then found it necessary after 1584 to outlaw flintlocks altogether,
given the particularly disturbed conditions in the province. These laws were extremely
unpopular. The Valencian estates alleged that travellers needed to protect themselves,
and suggested that the crime rate had actually increased since the ban. Anyway,
said the Cortes of 1626, flintlocks were ‘often carried by our young people, without
the least intention of causing bodily harm’. This was perhaps the key point: were
the restrictions enforceable? Castillo de Bobadilla spoke of seeing short-barrelled
pedreñales openly on sale in the streets of Madrid. From a contrary viewpoint, the
Valencian Cortes of 1626 complained that the judges were not respecting the relaxation
introduced in 1621, which permitted bona fide travellers to carry guns over four
palms in length through the countryside. The king returned a non-committal reply.
What one senses here and elsewhere is a desire on the part of the government to
have a free hand to intervene with full rigour when and where disturbances or
banditry were rife. Overall, it is clear that it was winning this war of attrition—
180
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
very gradually building up a mentality of good citizenship in which the risk of
carrying weapons was seen to outweigh the advantages of self-defence.49
But ultimately the efficacy of this policy depended on the functioning of the
courts. The cosmographer Pedro de Medina described in 1548 the sight that
greeted him as he crossed La Mancha from his native Andalusia. Just north of
Ciudad Real, ‘I saw beside the road, here and there, bodies of men shot to
death with arrows, a great multitude of them’; and on a hill-top a charnel house,
where their bones were thrown when the flesh rotted—‘one of the fiercest deaths
meted out to delinquents in a Christian country’.50 These were the culprits tried
and executed by the famous Santa Hermandad (Holy Brotherhood), set up by
Ferdinand and Isabel as a league of towns to police a disturbed countryside.
With a special royal commission, municipal alcaldes enjoyed summary jurisdiction
over criminals who acted or took refuge outside their community, and could
mete out one hundred lashes for petty theft, proceed to cut off ears or feet for
anything graver, and put to death by a firing squad of crossbow-men for thefts
over 5,000 maravedís (equivalent to half a year’s wages for an agricultural labourer
at the time). ‘From this derives great security of property in the countryside,’
commented Pedro de Medina, ‘and men pass along the highways day and night
with great peace and safety.’ The contrast with the bandit-ridden Crown of Aragon
could hardly have been greater.
But it was above all the famous corregidor—the ‘corrector’, sent out to preside
over the regidores—who may be chiefly credited with the transformation of
Castile from one of the most factious to one of the most law-abiding societies
in early modern Europe. The chronicler of John II (1406–54) wrote that,
‘because in the cities and towns of his realm there were many feuds, from
which stemmed many deaths of people and robberies and arson and other
great mischiefs…for this reason he would often send out his corregidores’. 51
The officers might enjoy a certain initial popularity, and we find their equivalent
in Valencia at this time— commissioners dispatched with the full authority of
the king, sometimes at the request of the local aldermen, in order to restore
justice. But these authoritarian outsiders were not welcomed as a permanent
institution. Thus the Andalusian town of Ubeda wrote to the king in 1412
that they did not need a corregidor, ‘for the citizens and regidores here are all
principal noblemen…and in order to put a stop to the disturbances and scandals
which there had been, the town council ordered the inhabitants not to go
about armed and not to form gangs, and told innkeepers to report the names
of anyone coming in to lodge with them’.52
It was under the Catholic Kings (1474–1516) that what had been intermittent
commissions became permanent features of the Castilian landscape. Their number
increased to sixty-eight officers by the middle of the seventeenth century, delegated
initially for two years at a time but usually staying five or six, spread out over the
main cities of Castile. Their peace-keeping functions extended to cover all matters
of government: thus in 1608 they were asked to report to Madrid on the state of
181
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
the harvest in their area. After an initial reluctance to have them, which surfaced
in the revolt of the Comuneros (1520–1), the towns seem to have settled down to
regarding them as a useful part of the civilising process. The Cortes of 1579–82,
though concerned that ‘sometimes we have seen these offices given away as a
reward for services…and by way of favour’, nevertheless accepted that most corregidores
were ‘men of ability’ (personas calificadas). Its main concern—like that of its predecessor
of 1576–8—was to ensure that the king got to know the names of all ‘the gentlemen
and virtuous persons in these kingdoms’ who, because of their provincial obscurity,
were never considered for appointment. Also, it was worried that the investigation
into their conduct (residencia) which corregidores were supposed to undergo at the
end of their term was perfunctory: ‘they usually have men of standing (in the
community) who are their friends and supporters, who speak up for them and
protect them’.53
The ideal corregidor was supposed to conform to the portrait painted by Castillo
de Bobadilla in 1597. He should be an outsider to the community in which he
administered justice, for people tended to have less respect for an official whose
private life was known to them, while ‘many who know his failings will reproach
him with these’. On the other hand, the Valencian jurist Cerdán de Tallada, in
whose province all magistrates had by law to be natives, thought this was less of
a disadvantage than might appear, for ‘we cannot be confident that an outsider
will not very quickly make enemies and friends, and have his own interests’. A
balance had to be struck, concluded Castillo de Bobadilla, between allowing the
corregidor to get acquainted with the people he was governing and ensuring that he
did not put down local roots. ‘For we see that friendships often spring up between
ruler and ruled, who become good comrades, playing cards and attending festivities
together.’ The ideal corregidor would avoid such compromising relationships. He
did not have to be a professional—a man of the law; normally he would have a
university-trained deputy, an alcalde mayor, for that. Rather, it was useful if he was
capable of inspiring respect through his birth and breeding. Noble birth acted as a
spur to virtue, though it required strengthening through study, which ‘corrects
the vices of intemperance, rashness, injustice, imprudence and pusillanimity’. Julius
Caesar and Alfonso the Wise, the thirteenth-century king of Castile, were the
models to imitate here.54
Above the corregidores were the chancery courts. Their rise was one of the significant
features of Habsburg power in both Castile and the Crown of Aragon. The Chancillería
building in Granada, completed in 1587, carried on its façade the proud legend
that it had been built so that its architectural magnificence ‘might not be out of
keeping with the weightiness of the business herein transacted’. Legend has it that
the staircase was paid for out of a fine on a nobleman who had refused to take off
his hat to the king’s judges. Whether or not you can keep your hat on in my
presence, Philip II was alleged to have told him, you certainly cannot do so in the
presence of the law represented by my judges. As the Granadan chronicler Bermúdez
de Pedraza put it, a writ of the Chancillería was ‘a graven image of the king,
182
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
sometimes more highly esteemed than in other kingdoms is the person of the
monarch’.55
Studies of colonial Latin America have made us aware of how human these
emblems of the majesty of the law actually were. Sent in to Mexico or Quito as
representatives of the king of Spain, they often ended up acquiring property in
the locality or marrying into the landowning families, and could scarcely be relied
upon to enforce the more unpopular edicts of the sovereign. The Castilian oidores,
as these chancery judges were known, were perhaps more mobile, but suffered
from a similar tendency to put down roots. Graduates of the law schools, commented
the humanist Diego Hurtado de Mendoza around 1570, they had been the backbone
of the administration of the Catholic Kings. ‘A middling sort of people,’ they were
expected to lead a life of ‘modesty, reserve, truthfulness, simplicity, all free of
scandal; not to pay social calls, not to accept gifts, not to have any close friends;
not to dress or spend in a lavish way…’ In brief, they were to set an example, in
their deportment, which was at odds with the wild life-style of the nobility.56 Perhaps
it was hardly surprising that the noble families somewhat turned their backs on
them in the early days. There was also unease at the pettifogging, hair-splitting
activities of the lawyer. The Basque chronicler Garibay, born in 1533, tells us
how, ‘when I was getting ready to study law…my uncle …so persuaded my father
that this field was so dangerous for the soul’ that he abandoned the idea. Another
member of the gentry, Cristóbal Crespí de Valldaura (1599–1672), recalled how
his mother had advised him against a legal career, ‘because she held it to be dangerous
for one’s salvation’. But ultimately the hardships of life as a widow ‘forced her to
change her mind’, so that her son went on to become a high-court judge and
eventually vice-chancellor of the Council of Aragon.57
By the time Castillo de Bobadilla was writing (1597), however, the Castilian
nobility had overcome such prejudices against the men of the long robe. In the
Crown of Aragon the caste-like differences, as Gilabert suggested in 1616, survived
longer. But in 1644 the viceroy of Valencia could report that the nobles were now
anxious to have more members in the Audiencia, ‘now that there are so many
men of letters in their ranks’.58 The problem by this time was rather the suspiciously
close links, of marriage and friendship, which were uniting the judges with local
elites. Already in 1579–82 the Cortes had sounded a note of alarm which grew
stronger with the years: ‘since the oidores are left so long in the same tribunal, they
often go on to acquire relatives and friends in the area’. And the jurados (lesser
town councillors) of Seville, possibly because as former merchants they had been
exposed to favouritism, asked that judges there be moved on after three years to
prevent them acquiring ‘clients’ (allegados).
59
Some 70 corregidors, perhaps 150 magistrates of the high courts and councils
of Madrid: on their broad shoulders reposed the government of Castile.60 But
beneath them was an army of bureaucrats—bailiffs, clerks, police constables— whose
unpopularity is reflected in the outbursts of the sixteenth-century Cortes. The
alguacil was an enormously responsible peace-officer, more akin to a sheriff in the
183
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
Old West than to a modern policeman. He would need great self-discipline, wrote
Castillo de Bobadilla, and must be immune to the temptations he would surely
face of anger, bribery or arrogance. For this reason the Valencian Cortes of 1604
wanted him to be of noble status. But Antoni Clara, who was denounced by the
Valencians in 1625 for opening fire on a man ‘without any cause or justification
whatsoever’, remained extremely unpopular, even though he (or possibly his son)
purchased the status of noble from the Crown in 1645 for the hefty sum of 10,000
reales.
61 Though there were supposed to be only fourteen alguaciles in the kingdom,
answerable directly to the viceroy, the Cortes of Valencia complained constantly
about the growth in number. Their ideal was self-policing. Thus, they demanded
in 1626 and 1645 that the governor of Xàtiva should not have a standing police
force, ‘but that when he needs men for any duty, he should summon them there
and then’. On the other hand, the Cortes also sought to reduce the liability of
towns to escort prisoners, and those of 1585 secured the exemption of the city
guilds from having to form a posse to chase bandits more than four or five leagues
(say, 25–30 kilometres).
The best-known example of the posse in action is the Catalan sometent—a general
call-out of citizens to chase outlaws. In reply to the viceroy’s suggestion that it be
used, however, Philip II showed himself reluctant in 1565: ‘It is a great burden,
which people will much resent and they will in the end not turn up… and the first
day they catch one of the wanted men, all his side will join together and harry the
town.’62 The sometents were tried anyway, on a piecemeal basis, usually lasting
about a month in disturbed areas. But the government also drafted in troops, in
Catalonia and Aragon from the 1560s, sometimes paid out of the treasury, sometimes
(after much haggling) subsidised by the local communities. In Valencia in 1615,
the town council of Alzira, threatened by a high court judge, ‘who says that he
will bring in soldiers at our expense’, resolved that its own justicia would raise
twenty-five men to sweep the territory. There was major protest on the whole
subject in the Cortes of 1626, where the forces under the command of Antoni
Clara and others were denounced as ‘idle vagrants and ruffians [who], under the
name of soldiers…have committed great crimes and offences, including some killings…and
demand food and lodging in a high-handed manner’.63 Olivares, desperate to placate
the Valencians so that they would vote subsidies for the war, promised that only
the Crown could in future authorise such commissions. But the Cortes of 1645
were soon complaining that this restriction was not being observed.
There were other measures that could be adopted, but all seemed to lead to an
increase in the arbitrary power of government. Around 1580 the Council of Aragon
debated and rejected a proposal that the kin of wanted men should be removed
from their homes—‘it is so repugnant to our notions of fairness and in conflict
with the laws of that kingdom [Valencia]’. But in 1586 it threatened the galleys for
anyone, family member or friend, who gave succour to an outlaw — ‘even though
he did this just once and without evil intent, since the public good comes before
that of the individual’. And the saintly Juan de Ribera, as viceroy of Valencia,
184
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
published the draconian decree of 1603 for the disturbed Alicante territory, that
if any wanted man was seen in his native village, all his family to the second
degree (parents and siblings) would be expelled from the place forthwith, ‘without
any other proof being needed’.64
Such measures were, no doubt, a confession of weakness. In Catalonia, Valencia
and Aragon a running feud began to develop in the later years of the sixteenth
century between the authorities and the estates over the medieval privileges which
safeguarded the liberty of the subject, restricting the use of torture and the length
of time suspects could be held without trial. In Castile, where royal authority was
stronger, Castillo de Bobadilla wrote of the problem of well-born troublemakers—
‘dissolute characters, seditious and causes of scandal’ —who had not actually broken
the law or could not be dealt with in open court. ‘Let the magistrate draw up
secret indictments against them and send these to the government…telling them,
for the sake of public order, to leave town and show themselves at court.’ In 1662
the viceroy of Valencia submitted a list of a score of prominent citizens— including
the Admiral of Aragon and two canons of the cathedral—whom he wanted removed
in this way. But when he followed this up with a second list a month later, the
Council of Aragon recoiled from ‘ordering so many people out all at once’.65 In
this faction-ridden province, the decision was taken in 1693 to interrogate suspects,
after the defeat of the peasant revolt (the Second Germanía), in secret—‘given the
delays and inconvenience which might arise in villages so infested with factions,
feuds and vendettas, if it was generally known what one person said about another’.66
One of the causes of disorder in Catalonia, commented Guicciardini in 1512,
was that many of the feudal lords ‘have villages and castles over which the king
exercises no authority, and in these places all the criminals take refuge’. In Castile,
the situation may not have been so very different, to judge by the opinion of the
Chancillería of Granada as late as 1687, that seigneurs often allowed criminals ‘to
walk around free on their estates, though responsible for atrocious crimes’.67 In
fact, a long campaign from the middle of the sixteenth century would gradually
change this situation. One finds early echos of it in the use of troops by the Chancillería
of Granada throughout the Alpujarras in the 1560s, and in 1586 the Valencian
seigneurs were threatened with loss of their jurisdictions unless they showed themselves
active against banditry. It is true that the Cortes of 1604 rescinded this decree of
1586, but in return the feudal lords agreed that anyone sentenced as a ‘thief or a
highway robber’ would not find shelter with them but would be returned forthwith
to his place of trial.
The authorities tried to get the localities to form ‘unions’ —agreements signed
for generally four years at a time in Catalonia, allowing the men of one area to
pursue outlaws into another, and to club together to compensate anyone who
suffered loss as a result of bandit activity anywhere in the Union. The viceroys of
Catalonia had to keep up a relentless pressure in order to secure these agreements,
writing in 1565 to the steward of the viscount of Cabrera i Bas that he should
join, since his territories were ‘rugged terrain, ideal for such rogues and bandits,
185
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
and much favoured by them’. The fundamental problem, in Catalonia as in Castile,
was that all communities wanted to keep jurisdiction in their own hands and showed
a fierce mistrust of their neighbours. Nor were they keen to commit themselves to
reimbursing arson damage in the countryside, as the Union contracts required.
But the Crown was reducing the possibility of non-cooperation, sequestrating the
barony of Baga in 1564 for allegedly being a safe-haven for bandits, or ordering
the abbot of Ripoll to cut down the trees on the roads through his estate so that
travellers could not be waylaid so easily.68
What tended to happen in the seventeenth century was that a partnership developed
between seigneurs and the Crown, each relying for help on the other. Thus the
marquis of Ariza, faced by the return of amnestied outlaws to his villages of Calpe
and Altea, where they were given refuge by the inhabitants ‘partly out of friendship,
partly out of fear or kinship’, asked the Audiencia in 1636 to send in an alguacil
with troops. On the other hand, the patrons of these outlaws prevailed with the
royal judges the following year—much to the annoyance of the marquis— to have
the commission withdrawn. Indeed, given the relative weakness of feudal authority
in Spain, to which we referred in Chapter 5, these ties of patronage between village
potentates and the royal authorities might well undermine seigneurial control.
Thus the duke of Infantado complained in 1648 that the royal commissioner sent
in to settle the feuds in the ducal fief of Ayora was himself involved on the side of
one of the factions.69 And when the steward of the duke of Gandia tried to investigate
feuding in the town of Pego on his master’s estates, he was met with a hail of
bullets from behind the walls and an appeal by the citizens to the Audiencia that
the duke was oppressing them. It required a royal judge to restore order. Nevertheless,
as late as 1690 the viceroy of Valencia was writing that the turbulent Antonio
Palacios, farmer of the seigneurial revenues of the barony of Alcalalí, could only
be captured by the forces of the duke of Gandia, who had his estates near this
remote, mountainous village.70 Rather than a clear confrontation between seigneurial
and royal jurisdictions, there was thus a network of multiple ties of dependence
and influence.
Judging by the amount of space he devotes to it, it was the immunity of the
Church rather than of the seigneurs which preoccupied Castillo de Bobadilla.
The great jurist acknowledged the special role of the clergy: they were engaged
alongside magistrates in the common task of building a Christian commonwealth,
and their sacred status entitled them to the privilege of governing themselves.
Very tentatively—‘I lay myself always under correction by Holy Mother Church’
— Castillo de Bobadilla suggested that clerical tribunals were subject in certain
matters to supervision by the royal courts. In civil matters—marriage cases were a
recurring problem—a layman might sue out an injunction (recurso de fuerza) ordering
the bishop or his vicar general to amend his proceedings, though leaving the definitive
judgement in his hands. As regards ‘criminous clerks’, an old source of contention
throughout Europe since the days of Thomas Beckett, the Council of Trent (1563)
had ruled that such individuals would only enjoy immunity from state prosecution
186
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
if they wore the tonsure and a soutane or its equivalent, and held some benefice.
But in practice much confusion continued to reign. Even priests were supposed to
be handed over to the royal courts if accused of ‘atrocious crimes’, but the archbishop
of Valencia wrote to the king in 1649 that manslaughter was regrettably so common
in his diocese that it could not be classed, without further enquiry, under this
heading. In Catalonia, given the ferocity of banditry there, the authorities had
managed to secure the so-called Papal Brief (Breve), allowing a mixed panel of
ecclesiastical and royal judges to arbitrate on this matter, and it was a prime aim
of the Valencians in the seventeenth century to secure an equivalent concession.
In 1622 the viceroy was complaining that many unsavoury individuals were being
given the tonsure only to acquire immunity for their bad behaviour, ‘as the way
they dress and live goes to show’.71 The problem with the church courts, as Castillo
de Bobadilla pointed out, was the laxity of the sentences they bestowed. Reluctant
to shed blood, their greatest penalty—in cases other than heresy, of course—was a
perpetual life sentence, at a time when the Crown sought to impress the people
with the savage spectacle of public execution. Hence, ‘secular magistrates, for the
peace and quiet of the commonwealth…delay and resist handing over criminous
clerks to their ecclesiastical colleagues’.
A further problem was sanctuary—the right of even a layman to claim immunity
by running into the sacred space of a church. The Furs limited sanctuary in Valencia
to the main church in each town, and excluded it in cases of murder with intent or
highway robbery. But the Spanish ambassador in Rome was still trying to get this
limitation extended to the hinterland of Alicante, which had only been incorporated
into the Valencian kingdom in 1305, after the Fur in question was decreed.72 The
ramshackle nature of these privileges meant that judges were often tempted to
drive a coach and horses through them. But for many people a bad privilege was
better than no protection at all against arbitrary government. The chronicler Bermúdez
de Pedraza reports how the crowd clamoured for the ‘freedom of the Church’
when the Chancillería hanged a priest in Granada in 1556. ‘You did not hang a
man, you hanged Christ,’ a Jesuit preacher thundered from the pulpit, as the judges
gathered for mass in the cathedral, and the archbishop proceeded to lay an interdict
on the city. The three judges mainly responsible backed down and agreed to accept
any penance imposed by the prelate; but our source grimly notes that they and
their children all came to a bad end.73 Interdicts—the prohibition of the sacraments
in a particular town— recurred through the seventeenth century in relation to
such matters (in Valencia, for example, in 1620 and 1680). More usually, it was
personal excommunication which an over-eager magistrate had to face. Castillo
de Bobadilla noted the inevitability of conflict—the royal judge determined to uphold
the rigour of the law the more resistance he encountered, the bishops and vicars
general responding with sanctions. The government will not be much help, Castillo
advised the corregidor, rather, do what you have to do, then ask for absolution and
perform the penance required, ‘for if justice was done, you will hold your head
up, not hang it in shame’.74
187
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
Two concepts of public order were here in conflict, and they were only part
of a wider struggle between traditionalists and the new proponents of strong
government. Rebutting criticism of the Fueros of Aragon which seemed too
favourable to the criminal, the chronicler Argensola wrote (1604): ‘Some peoples
love punishment so much that they give a free hand to the judge, so that no
offence may escape retribution…Others feel that a man not limited by law is a
wild beast, and that they would rather have many culprits go free than that
one innocent man should suffer.’75 Castillo de Bobadilla set out the alternative
expectations of the Castilian judge: that the safety of the commonwealth was
the supreme law, as in ancient Rome, and the corregidor might well execute
summary justice against offenders. However, he did recommend caution, noting
that only the king or his specially delegated commissioner could safely set
aside due process. In practice, the very vivid picture of justice in operation in
Toledo in 1613, contained in the picaresque memoir of Diego Duque de Estrada,
suggests that much latitude had to be left to individual magistrates. Here torture
was applied in a manslaughter case to a man who claimed to be noble; detention
without trial was applied not only to him but to the kin of the victim, in order
to nip any feud in the bud; the culprit’s escape from custody seemed very
close to succeeding until the justice of Ecija took a personal dislike to him and
decided to return him for trial in Toledo. Finally, one has a picture of the
sheer horror of the Toledo gaol, where suspects languished for up to seven
years, awaiting trial or review of their sentence, and the arbitrary action of
the government in 1614 ordering all prisoners awaiting appeal to be transferred
immediately to the galleys in view of the need for oarsmen. When Duque de
Estrada joined a riot, he was sentenced summarily to death, and only escaped
through the intervention of his patron at court.76
The great Valencian jurist, Cerdán de Tallada, insisted that the letter of the
law had to be interpreted according to the spirit—in a ‘Christian’ and not a ‘Pharisaical’
manner. But here lay the rub: the Crown of Aragon had its very specific privileges—
Habeas Corpus, limitation or prohibition of torture—which were repeatedly denounced
by the authorities as making their task of peace enforcement impossible. In reply
to a protest by the noble estate of Valencia against detention without trial, the
government invoked ‘the difficulty there has been in getting evidence together’;
but the Valencians resolved that this was not a satisfactory answer, for it could
apply to ‘any case at all in future’, so that ‘we can only conclude that the minds of
the magistrates are not well disposed towards the members of this house’. In this
same year (1616), a major confrontation erupted over the humiliating treatment
of one aristocratic prisoner, so that the estate resolved to exclude four members
of the Audiencia from ever sitting in its ranks. The debate was over more than
law and order: it was an attempt to define the limits of government itself. At least
that was how it appeared to the diarist and priest Joan Porcar. No friend to the
irresponsible and violent nobility of his native Valencia, he yet could not refrain
from setting down in his journal the way people were talking about the end of an
188
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
era, the demise of a feudal nobility: ‘People say that…the upholders of the freedom
of the land are all dead now.’77
It was becoming clear, in fact, that the government was finding quite a few
supporters for its hard-line attitude within the ranks of the governed. The
‘Unions’ of Aragonese towns to pursue bandits represented a voluntary suspension
of the Fueros in some instances for the greater good of public order, and Zaragoza
set forth a spirited defence of its invasion of local immunities in the same
cause (1588). In 1653 one of the rising stars in the Valencian political firmament,
the first count of Cervellón, defended—in a session of the estates, no less—the
high-handed actions of the government against outlaws. ‘When one could see
that the law was being applied in a way which kept the peace,’ he affirmed,
‘one would have to have a very cogent reason before criticising the ministers
of the Crown.’ Anyway, such magistrates stood in relation to the subject like a
father to his children, ‘and if they are found wanting, one should rather accept
this as a chastisement from the hand of God’.78 One senses a shift in attitudes
towards good citizenship. The Valencian Cortes of 1626 had already tried to
limit the sacrosanct right of duelling, allowing any ambush or any attack of a
weaker party by a more numerous gang to be prosecuted ex officio by the
state, without waiting for a complaint from the victim. In 1716 and 1757 the
Bourbons tightened up the old Castilian prohibition of the duel, applying it to
Spain as a whole and sanctioning infractions now with the death penalty. Spaniards
no longer needed to show their valour, ran the decree, ‘in such an ugly, criminal
and abominable way’.79
Tracing the change in social attitudes which underlay this legislation is not
always easy, and more will be said on the subject when we come to religion and
family control. But clearly the advance of a new urban and bureaucratic elite was
significant. The Jesuit Luis de la Palma recalled in his Life of his father (1595)
how this merchant of Toledo would teach his sons to fence but rarely wore a
sword himself because of his short temper. ‘The more valiant a man is,’ he would
say, ‘the more patience and forbearance must he display.’ It was equanimity (apacibilidad)
which Cristóbal Crespí counselled to his younger brother in 1627 as the latter set
out to join the army of Flanders: ‘It is right to give vent to a grievance, but let it
be in due time…Not to feel resentment shows a want of feeling, but to display
forbearance is a mark of wisdom.’80 Castillo de Bobadilla’s prescription for the
ideal corregidor, that he should be of good lineage as well as of good character,
lettered as well as self-disciplined, was holding up a new model of aristocratic
leadership.
Of course, the bureaucracy would meet the nobility half-way. When Don Luis
de Gudiel, former judge of the Chancillería of Granada, was sent back to that city
in 1636 to press the local elites for donatives to the Crown, the chronicler refers
to the heart-attacks his mission caused. But then we see Don Luis admitted to the
chivalric order of Calatrava during his stay, in a splendid ceremony at which the
high-court judges rubbed shoulders with ‘the flower of the knighthood of Granada’.
189
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
The patronage ties between both no doubt facilitated the new judicial absolutism.
Thus we find the duke of Sessa writing to one of the Granadan magistrates, Don Juan
Chumacera, around 1618 thanking him for a favourable decision in a lawsuit:
‘Though truly it would not be proper to invoke friendship if one were not also in
the right, yet it often requires effort to establish that right.’81 The Chumacero
connection stretched back through his mother’s family, the Carrillos, to Cordoba,
where Sessa was influential. Whether the duke’s promise of 1618 to have him
promoted actually played any role in his subsequent ministerial career, as member
of the Council of Castile from 1626, then president from 1643, is unclear. Chumacero
had a reputation, at least in later life, as something of a puritan. The essayist Luis
Zapata (1532–98?) described one Granadan judge as turning his back on all such
compromising friendships. At his death they found ‘three or four chests full of
letters from princes and great lords, which he had not looked at nor read nor
answered’. And Castillo de Bobadilla recalled that he as a corregidor had been in
receipt of numerous begging letters, which he had carried around in his pocket
for days without opening. But he advised a magistrate to refrain always from
discourtesy. If a petition can be granted ‘without hurting the public weal’, then it
was perfectly legitimate to show oneself attentive to it. After all, Holy Mother
Church ‘invokes and requests the help of the saints, like favourites who have
special access to God’.82 No doubt this cultural model helped to shape a certain
expectation of the bureaucratic system, even though its practical application in
individual cases would be hard to demonstrate. In this way, over time it would
help reconcile the old nobility, who had lived by a different code, to the constraints
of legalism.
Part of the education in the new ways was, of course, judicial terrorism. In
Seville over the thirty-eight years that the Jesuit Pedro de León served as prison
chaplain (1578–1616) there were 570 death sentences issued (and 309 executions
carried out), mostly for murder but also for robbery.83 In Valencia one finds
an equally steady stream of men going to the scaffold, the common criminals
usually garrotted (as an act of mercy) before their bodies were strung up in
the market square, the relatively few nobles being decapitated in front of the
cathedral. Particular examples were made of any who had resisted authority:
bandits, for example, might be dragged through the streets—unless the rains
had turned them to mud—before being hanged and then quartered.84 But this
spectacle was perhaps a confession of weakness: running parallel to it was the
strategy of amnesty and pardon for those with influence or for those who
could not be caught.
The idea of mercy was, after all, built into the judicial system through the
pervasive influence of the church. ‘God have mercy on his soul’, commented Mossèn
Porcar on a bandit executed in 1612; and the popular ballads of seventeenthcentury Castile displayed a certain compassion for the outlaw, though only after
he had paid the penalty for his misdeeds.85 The most visible expression of this
sense of a common, fallen humanity are the various confraternities dedicated in
190
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
one form or another to the succour of the criminal. Thus on Saint Mathias’s Day
(24 February) the Valencian brotherhood of Our Lady of the Forsaken would
gather up the remains of those executed during the preceding year, whose corpses
had been left to rot on gallows a couple of kilometres outside the city gates. The
bones were brought back, ‘in solemn procession’, for interment in the grounds of
the General Hospital. In Granada the Confraternity of Mercy, composed of the
greatest families in the city, would accompany condemned men to the scaffold
and gather the remains of those quartered for burial in its chapel. The most famous
of all, that of the Holy Charity in Seville, knelt in prayer while the execution took
place, then at three in the afternoon, in memory of the Crucifixion, took down
the corpse.86
One of the significant changes taking place in the early modern period was a
greater attention to the soul of the condemned man. As part of its campaign of
evangelisation, the Counter-Reformation church sought to use ritual in a more
‘rational’ way, as part of the reform of character. Thus Don Miguel Mañara, as
director of the Holy Charity in the later seventeenth century, got it to pay for
friars to accompany a condemned man in his cell continuously during the interval
between sentence and execution. Among jurists too one notices a greater attention
to reform of the criminal. Castillo de Bobadilla reflected on the way in which
Canon Law had pioneered the idea of prison as a place of correction, where
men, ‘like brute beasts, tied down and restrained, might become peaceful’. But
the secular law still used gaol mainly for those awaiting trial and for debtors.
The galleys, increasingly fashionable from the middle of the sixteenth century,
were hardly an adequate substitute. The zealous reformer Francisco Martínez
de Mata, a kind of lay preacher who went around in Franciscan robes, spent
seven years tending to galley slaves in the 1640s, before he began writing the
treatises on the causes of crime—poverty and economic decline—for which he is
best remembered. In a memorial of 1648, he noted that the galleys were supposed
to be a merciful alternative to the death penalty. But the condemned were being
left there to rot: ‘The aim of the punishment is that the criminal should be
reformed. Well, if you leave him there for life, when does reform come in?’ And
life in the galleys was not anyway conducive to improvement: ‘There is not a
word of good advice given and no sacraments are administered, so that the Devil
takes hold of the soul…’87
The Jesuit Pedro de León’s mission to the prisoners of Seville, Martínez de
Mata’s experiences of the galley slaves of Malaga, were pointers to the future.
But it was not really until the eighteenth century that the slow business of penal
reform would come into its own. The abolition of the galleys in 1748 and of
torture in 1814, the shifting of the gallows away from the centres of towns, were
all signs of a new willingness, in Spain as in the rest of Europe, to ask fundamental
questions about the nature of crime and punishment. ‘Houses of Correction’
were set up throughout the peninsula in the later eighteenth century, accompanied
by a more systematic reclusion of vagrants, as part of a campaign to tackle more
191
OBEDIENCE TO THE LAW
effectively the causes of anti-social behaviour. Castillo de Bobadilla had already
written of the need to do something of the kind. ‘It would be a better form of
government,’ he wrote, ‘to accustom citizens to be virtuous through helpful and
repeated interventions, so that they may easily and enthusiastically obey good
laws, for otherwise laws are only a heavy burden on weak shoulders.’88 This
process of moral reform would require a more general change, though, in social
values, not least in the way families were formed and the way the young were
educated.
192
9
THE POLICING OF THE FAMILY
In Spain, as in the rest of traditional Europe, the individual was enveloped by the
corporate structure of the society. Of these corporate institutions one of the most
powerful was the family. Castillo de Bobadilla noted that the government of the
commonwealth (política) had its counterpart in economics (económica), ‘which deals
with the management of the household, for a well-run family is the very portrait
of the commonwealth’. The distinguished Portguese military expert and writer,
Don Francisco Manuel de Mello, put the same point across in his treatise of 1651
on the topic: ‘a man who knows how to run his house properly would know how
to run the state, for it is true that the city is a large family and the family a city in
miniature’.1
Inculcating self-discipline was of increasing concern to writers during the early
modern period, and those who discussed the well-ordered commonwealth found
it useful to devote at least some of their attention to the family. Some of the leading
Spanish humanists—Luis Vives, Fray Luis de León—devoted entire books to aspects
of the topic. But in their case, as in others of the Renaissance period, advice on
family matters tended to be addressed directly to women, whereas for men it
figured usually as one part of a wider treatise on good citizenship. Alternatively,
as in the case of the famous Cordoban Jesuit Tomás Sánchez, whose ‘Ten Books
of Controversy on the Holy Sacrament of Matrimony’ (1592) became a cornerstone
of marriage law throughout Catholic Europe, the clergy wrote in Latin for confessors.
Admittedly, things were changing in this respect, and the Jesuits—like Sánchez’s
contemporary Gaspar Astete—played a key role in Spain as elsewhere in bringing
the family forward as a topic of discussion in books and preaching. By the eighteenth
century—certainly rather later, one may feel, than in Protestant Europe—the household
was seen as a major source of moral formation of the individual, and the Jesuit
Matías Sánchez’s treatise of 1740 could now carry the significant title: ‘The Father
of a Family Briefly Instructed in his Many Obligations’.
Many of the sources on which we depend for an insight into this rather private,
therefore rather hidden aspect of past life are legal in nature—testaments and marriage
contracts, litigation over inheritance, records of the moral policing exercised by
ecclesiastical tribunals. Historians are sometimes made aware by discrepancies in
193
THE POLICING OF THE FAMILY
this material—if the anthropologist had not already forewarned them—that in an
essentially oral and small-scale society these documents are not always what they
seem, and that the real business is going on in face-to-face discussion outside the
notary’s study or the court. People of the time tell us so, in the precious autobiographies
which have come to light. It is probably true that the confessional in Catholic
countries provided an alternative means of unburdening the soul, so that the range
of written material is not as great as, say, in Puritan England. Nevertheless, similar
promptings could be at work, as in the case of the Valencian priest Juan Martín
Cordero (born in 1531), who wrote his life to show his family ‘the great obligation
I have to be grateful to Our Lord for the innumerable favours I have received
from his blessed hand’. His near-contemporary, the historian Esteban de Garibay
(born 1533), wrote his memoirs for his three sons who were being reared in Castile,
far from their Basque homeland, as a stimulus to their self-improvement, ‘for this
brief life of man, full of misery and upsets, has to be a continual battle on this
earth’. The Catalan peasant Sebastià Casanovas (1710–56?) had a rather similar
philosophy. Battling all his life against misfortune, he resolved to set down for his
offspring an account of the struggle. ‘Most of it I have written by night,’ he told
them, ‘when I got back from work.’ His escape, and that of the family farm, from
disaster, ‘I attribute to the spirits of my ancestors, who were looking down and
took a hand on behalf of the house.’2
At the social level of Casanovas, the more usual source is likely to be a household
book—a journal of accounts, in which the author would note down the hiring of a
servant or the satisfaction of a debt or the payment of a dowry, adding a comment
on the harvest, or some public or private event.3
 Those which have survived have
sometimes followed circuitous routes before reaching a wider public —leaving the
family of origin after the failure of direct heirs, lucky to be preserved in some
convent library, until it too was broken up in the liberal revolutions of the nineteenth
century. Some only survive in copies made by the busy monks, in which private
material may tend to have been edited out to the benefit of comments on public
events. The instability of families—a factor particularly of Castilian life, to which
we shall return—affected one of the most valuable sources of all: the letter. Don
Luis de Requesens, on the eve of his departure for Flanders as governor, drew up
his testament (1573). In view of the confusion and dispersal of his papers, he
asked his brother to go through his letters and burn those which were of no permanent
interest (that is, not relating to administration), with two significant exceptions:
correspondence from King Philip, and from his mother, Doña Estefanía. The latter,
in fact, provides unparalleled insight into the infancy of a nobleman in this period.
Curiously, some of the best material of this kind has come down to us through
the judicial archives, where letters between lovers or between parents and children
were submitted as evidence of parentage and the like. How far these missives
reflect the attitudes of the people, when so many were illiterate, is another question.
The English traveller Joseph Townsend found the professional letter-writer busy
at his trade in the 1780s: ‘When the market square is not taken over by the preachers,
194
THE POLICING OF THE FAMILY
the scribes take up their positions with their tables, near which they sit with ink,
quill and paper to draw up and read out letters of all kinds.’4
In the very mobile society that was early modern Spain—mobile through the
existence of frontier and empire—solidarities existed which provided a framework
for individual lives. In the first place, there was the patria. The Castilian law code
of the thirteenth century, the Siete Partidas, spoke of the natura (the blood) which
unites men, and of the naturaleza (the common homeland) which ‘makes them like
one through long usage of true love’. When two men from the same town find
themselves in a strange place, ‘they enjoy each other’s company and help each
other in the things which are needful’.5
 The correspondence of Spanish emigrants
to the Indies with their folk back home during the sixteenth century makes the
point vividly enough. ‘Certainly my spirit has long desired to see someone from
home here in this land,’ wrote the deputy governor of one Mexican town to his
nephew in Extremadura in 1577.6
 The Granadan chronicler Bermúdez de Pedraza
noted that there was a harmony of humours between a person and the physical
environment where he had grown up: ‘whence it happens that a sick man will
recover his health and cheerfulness not only in his own land but with the sight of
a man who comes from there’.7
Pride in ancestry, as we noted in an earlier chapter on the aristocracy, was an
important feature of this sense of belonging. Something like a clan network stretched
across the face of the empire. It was embodied in the concept of the solar, a
difficult term to translate, but equivalent to the idea of a ‘base’ and often a
tower or a domain associated with a particular family. From the towers of the
Basque Country, Aragon and the Pyrenean region generally, the men of the
Reconquista had fanned out over the peninsula during the Middle Ages, sometimes
establishing new solares for themselves as they acquired land from the Moor and
founding new branches of a clan. The Spanish lineages were thus pyramid-like
in structure; each branch was headed by a pariente mayor (a ‘chief kinsman’),
who might not necessarily be the most powerful man within it. Thus t
